Our
Policies
Terms & Conditions
Promotions & Discounts
Privacy Policy
Copyright & Trademark Policy
Cookie Policy
Terms & conditions
1) TERMS AND CONDITIONS
In using this website, you are deemed to have read and agreed to the following terms and conditions: The following terminology applies to these Terms and Conditions, Privacy Statement and Disclaimer Notice and any or all Agreements: "Client", “You” and “Your” refers to you, the person accessing this website and accepting the Company’s terms and conditions. "The Company", “Ourselves”, “We” and "Us", refers to our Company; Bo and Tee Ltd, Registered in Scotland with the Company number SC563598. Located at Bo and Tee, 175 West George Street, Glasgow, G2 2LB. “Party”, “Parties”, or “Us”, refers to both the Client and ourselves, or either the Client or ourselves. All terms refer to the offer, acceptance and consideration of payment necessary to undertake the process of our assistance to the Client in the most appropriate manner, whether by formal meetings of a fixed duration, or any other means, for the express purpose of meeting the Client’s needs in respect of provision of the Company’s stated services/products, in accordance with and subject to, prevailing English Law. Any use of the above terminology or other words in the singular, plural, capitalisation and/or he/she or they, are taken as interchangeable and therefore as referring to same.
2) SALES CONTRACT
Orders placed by you on the website
www.boandtee.com
(the “Website”) for the products offered by us through the website are only an offer to conclude a sales contract. The sales contract is entered into upon the confirmation of the order by e-mail by us to you.
You are the individual or individuals placing the order (‘you’, ‘your’). You must be 18 years or over to enter into a contract with us by placing an order with us, you confirm that you are 18 years or over.
If you are not yet 18, you agree that you have obtained the bill payer’s permission to enter in to a contract with us.
-This contract is between you and us. No other person shall have any rights to enforce any of its terms. Neither party will need to get the agreement of any other person in order to end the contract or make any changes to these terms.
3) ORDER PLACEMENT
Our shopping pages will guide you through the steps you need to take to place an order with us. Our order process allows you to check and amend any errors before submitting your order to us. Please carefully check your order at each page of the order process.
After you have placed an order, you will receive an e-mail from us acknowledging that we have received your order. Please note that this does not mean that your order has been accepted.
We will confirm our acceptance to you by sending you an e-mail that confirms that the Products have been dispatched (“Dispatch Confirmation”). The Contract between us will only be formed when we send you the Dispatch Confirmation.
If we are unable to verify the delivery or payment information you have supplied we may restrict delivery to the address to which your credit or debit card is registered.
4) PAYMENT
We accept all major credit cards (American Express / MasterCard / Visa) debit cards (Solo / Maestro / Visa Debit / Visa Delta / Visa Electron) and PayPal payments.
Your credit card or other account detailed at 4.1 above will be debited when you click on the “confirm” button.
Any credit card used for payment must be in the name of the person ordering and the same card must be carried at the time of delivery - it may be required for verification and obtaining signature on a credit card charge form for delivery.
All payments are processed through third party payment gateways using PCI Encryption. We do not store credit card details nor do we share customer details with any 3rd parties.
In order to offer you Klarna’s payment methods, we might in the checkout pass your personal data in the form of contact and order details to Klarna, in order for Klarna to assess whether you qualify for their payment methods and to tailor those payment methods for you. Your personal data transferred is processed in line with
Klarna’s own privacy notice.
Please spend responsibly. Borrowing more than you can afford could seriously affect your financial status. Make sure you can afford to make your monthly repayments on time.
Bo and Tee Limited acts as an introducer and not a lender of unregulated credit products provided [exclusively] by Klarna Bank AB (publ). Credit is only available to permanent UK residents aged 18+, subject to status, terms and conditions apply. Please note that the following products are not regulated by the FCA: [Pay in 30 days and Pay in 3 instalments]
5) PRICING AND VAT
All prices include either VAT, GST or sales tax where applicable at the prevailing rate.
Our site contains a large number of Products and it is always possible that, despite our best efforts, some of the Products listed on our site may be incorrectly priced.  We will normally verify prices as part of our dispatch procedures. If we accept and process your order where a pricing error is obvious and unmistakable and could have reasonably been recognised by the average customer as an error, we may end the Contract, refund you any sums you have paid and require return of any products provided to you.
6) DELIVERY
Deliveries are made to the delivery address given at time of order. Customer accepts full responsibility for ensuring accuracy of information provided.
You accept and agree that we will not be held liable for deliveries that are delayed.
You accept and agree that we will not be held liable for deliveries that go missing. However we will make like for like replacements if a delivery goes missing due to the fault of a 3rd party (i.e. courier) after a sufficient time period has elapsed and after you agree to assist us in any subsequent investigations for compensation from said 3rd party.
We do not deliver to PO Box or hotel addresses.
As stated in Clause 10 within this Agreement, we will only refund outbound postage costs for the least expensive common/standard delivery method.  The cost of expedited and priorty services will not be refunded over and above that of the least expensive common/standard delivery method.
Premium Delivery is only eligible for deliveries to the UK. It costs £9.99 per year for Unlimited Priority Delivery for UK customers. You will pay a one-off sum of £9.99 for the year and this will not automatically renew. Once the year has ended, you will need to re-purchase Premium Delivery for £9.99 to receive another year of Unlimited Priority Delivery. You must be signed in to your Bo+Tee account to purchase Premium Delivery and for it to apply to future orders once purchased. You will not have access to this if you check out as a guest on the website. Premium Delivery will only appear on your account once your first order, with the £9.99 shipping fee, has been dispatched. The Premium Unlimited Priority Delivery cut-off time is 10pm GMT/BST Monday – Friday and 2.30pm GMT/BST Saturday – Sunday, so any orders placed after this time will be dispatched the following day. If you have purchased Premium Delivery, this option will appear at checkout for free. You will need to select this delivery method for it to apply. It will not automatically apply at checkout. Bo+Tee reserves the right to change the order cut off time, alter or cancel Unlimited Priority Delivery at our discretion. During busy retail periods (including but not limited to Black Friday weekend and Cyber Monday) delivery times may take longer. From Monday 13th November 2023, to redeem Unlimited Priority Delivery orders must meet the £40 minimum spend. It is the customer’s responsibility to ensure the use of Bo&Tee's Unlimited Priority Delivery is in accordance with the terms and conditions. Customers will be informed of any significant changes to these terms and conditions. Your statutory rights are not affected.
7) WARRANTY
This warranty is valid only to the original purchaser when a new piece is purchased from us.
This warranty is invalidated if you allow a third party to repair or attempt to repair any item.
In the event of a dispute as to the cause of damage, we reserve the right to send the Product to a mutually agreed independent third party assessor to determine the nature of the defect. Only if their judgement indicates a defect in material or workmanship will we repair the item.
This warranty does not cover expenses incurred by you due to a lack of proper care of your product.
Please keep your proof of purchase documents – they will be required for in order to procure warranty service in the event you wish to make a warranty claim.
Please notify Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) within 14 days of purchase in the event that you wish to claim a replacement for a defect.
8) LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
As a condition of use of this Website, you agree to indemnify us from and against any and all liabilities, expenses (including legal fees) and damages arising out of claims resulting from your use of this Website, including without limitation any claims alleging facts that if true would constitute a breach by you of these terms and conditions.
Subject to the following sub clauses, in no event shall the aggregate liability of any party to the other (whether it contract, tort (including negligence) or otherwise) and in respect of all claims, losses and damages arising under or in connection with these Terms and Conditions:
provided that this shall be subject to an overall limit of the total amount paid to Bo and Tee Ltd under a confirmed order in respect of any and all claims, losses and damages arising under or in connection with these terms and conditions.
The above limits on liability shall apply in respect of (any indemnities provided by either party under this Agreement, including without limitation to the indemnities under clauses 12 Intellectual Property)
Each party's liability to the other in contract, tort (including negligence), misrepresentation (whether innocent or negligent), breach of statutory duty or otherwise arising out of or in connection with these terms and conditions shall not extend to any:
loss of profits;
loss of business opportunity;
loss of goodwill;
loss of data;
loss of anticipated savings; or
any special, indirect or consequential loss or damage whatsoever.
The parties agree that the limitations on liability within these terms and conditions are reasonable given their respective commercial positions and ability to purchase relevant insurance in respect of risks.
Notwithstanding the above or other limitations and exclusions of liability set out in these terms and conditions, neither party excludes or limits any liability for:
fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or
any breach of any obligations implied by section 12 of the Sale of Goods Act 1979 or section 2 of the Supply of Goods and Services Act 1982 or Consumer Rights Act 2015; or
any other liability to the extent the same cannot be excluded or limited by law.
We do not compensate you for all losses caused by us or our products.
1. We are not responsible for losses you suffer which are not caused by us breaching this contract or the applicable law. For example, where you have suffered any injury caused by your own negligence or lack of reasonable care in using a product and is not due to any defect in the product.
2. Where you have suffered losses caused by us breaching the contract, we are responsible for losses you suffer UNLESS the loss is:
Unexpected.
It was not obvious that it would happen (so, in the law, the loss was unforeseeable).
Caused by a delaying event outside our control.
Avoidable.
Something you could have avoided by taking reasonable action. For example, any injury suffered which was caused by your own negligence, lack of care (that a reasonable person would have exercised in handling the same item), and/or which you could have reasonably avoided.
A business loss.
Any use of a product for the purposes of your trade, business, craft or profession.
9) FORCE MAJEURE
We will not be liable or responsible for any failure to perform, or delay in performance of, any of our obligations under a Contract that is caused by events outside our reasonable control.
A Force Majeure Event includes any act, event, non-happening, omission or accident beyond our reasonable control and includes in particular (without limitation) the following:
strikes, lock-outs or other industrial action;
civil commotion, riot, invasion, terrorist attack or threat of terrorist attack, war (whether declared or not) or threat or preparation for war;
fire, explosion, storm, flood, earthquake, subsidence, epidemic or other natural disaster;
impossibility of the use of railways, shipping, aircraft, motor transport or other means of public or private transport;
impossibility of the use of public or private telecommunications networks;
the acts, decrees, legislation, regulations or restrictions of any government; and
pandemic or epidemic.
Our performance under any Contract is deemed to be suspended for the period that the Force Majeure Event continues, and we will have an extension of time for performance for the duration of that period.  We will use our reasonable endeavours to bring the Force Majeure Event to a close or to find a solution by which our obligations under the Contract may be performed despite the Force Majeure Event.
10) RETURNS
Our Returns Policy applies to all purchases made on Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) and are incorporated by reference in these Terms.
Returns Policy
RETURN TIMEFRAME
You’re more than welcome to return your unwanted item(s) back to us, following our terms and conditions below. Please take a look to ensure your return is accepted and processed within our returns policy.
Orders must be returned back to us within
30 days (store credit) and 21 days (refund or exchange) for UK customers.
Orders must be returned back to us within
45 days (store credit) and 30 days (refund or exchange) for our international customers.
These timeframes are from the date your order is shipped. We don’t accept returns for unwanted items after our relevant returns period.
ORIGINAL CONDITION
Hygiene and customer safety is really important to us, therefore please do your best to try on, handle and repackage items with care. Items must be returned back to us in their original condition - unworn, undamaged, free of makeup, pet hairs, deodorant, perfume and must have all original tags attached. All items will be inspected upon arrival back to our warehouse and failure to be returned in their original condition may lead to cleaning charges or refusal.
For any items that contain multiple parts such as multipacks and 2-part sets, all parts must be returned within the same return parcel to qualify for a refund pending QC inspection of the returned items. Failure to return these items together may lead to refusal.
NON-RETURNABLE ITEMS
Whilst returns are an important part of the retail process, not all items can be returned back to us. Our non-returnable items include Socks, Face Masks, Headbands, Hair Accessories, Fitness Equipment and Water Bottles. We do require hygiene stickers remain intact, failure to do this will result in the item being non-returnable.
RETURN OUTCOMES
Returned items may be eligible for a refund, store credit or exchange*, providing your return is in line with the rest of our policy.
You can also now opt for our Shop Now return method** which allows you to choose from the below options:
In-line exchange: Exchange for the same item in an alternative size or colour at no additional cost. Subject to price amendments.
Exchange for something different: Exchange your unwanted item(s) for anything across our website, excluding pre-order items. Any additional cost will be paid by the customer upon submitting the return. If the item you choose costs less then the you can decide to receive the remaining amount via a refund or store credit, subject to policies.
*Exchanges are dependant on stock availability. Non-returnable items won't be available for return. Items must be returned within the relevant return timeframes and policies specific to store credit, exchange, Shop Now and refunds. A
ll shop now exchanges will be dispatched once your return has been processed / approved.
**Please note, all return totals displayed during Shop Now are in GBP. These totals will be the equivalent in your country's currency whether you upsell or down-sell your return.
PROCESSING TIME
We aim to process all returns within 10 working days of delivery to us, providing there are no issues with the return. Refunds will be processed back to your original method of payment. Store credit will be issued via gift card. Exchanges will be automatically processed as a new order and shipped out to you on standard delivery.
We'll email you once we've received and processed your return. If you paid part gift card and debit/credit card, then the refund will automatically go to the gift card first. Please use the original gift card code to redeem on your next order.
UNREASONABLE CLAIMS / FAIR USE POLICY
Our team closely monitors unusual return patterns and activity, therefore if we suspect fraudulent activity within your account, we may have to withhold issuing a refund or block your account and any associated accounts entirely.
Fraudulent activity includes but is not exhaustive to: claims relating to orders not being received, items missing,  unusual patterns of returns activity; where we suspect someone isn't just trying their items on, but wearing them for longer periods or returning items worn/used and not matching what was originally ordered.
If you return items that do not match what you originally ordered, we reserve the right to take legal action against you. This includes returning items that are significantly different from what you purchased or attempting to return items that do not belong to the company.
RESPONSIBILITY
Returned items are your responsibility until they reach us, so make sure they're packed up securely and can't get damaged on the way!
As the parcel remains your responsibility until it arrives back with us, ensure that you retain your proof of postage in case you need to contact us about your return.
We're not responsible for any items that are returned to us by mistake. If we're able to locate them (which is not always possible) and you'd like these returned to you, we may ask you to cover the delivery cost.
RETURN FEES
Please note, return fees are priced per return generated.
If you're a new customer, your first return will be free of charge (excluding self post).
UK customers:
If you opt for Exchange or Store Credit then this will be FREE of charge*. If you are returning for a refund, you will be charged £2.99.
Return fees will be deducted from your refund at the time we process it.
*If you're returning part exchange, part refund then your return will only be free if the value of your exchange item(s) outweighs the refund item(s).
International customers:
Return costs may vary. We offer some subsidised return fees and some self-post, depending on the country you're returning from. Refund and store credit fees will be deducted from your refund at the time it's processed. Exchange fees will be charged when submitting your return. You can view all return fees
here.
11) GOVERNANCE
These Terms and Conditions and your use of this site will be governed by and construed in accordance with English Law.
Please note that nothing contained in these Terms and Conditions of Sale in any way affects your statutory rights.
12) CONTACT INFORMATION
Questions about these terms and conditions should be directed to hello@boandtee.com
14) UNREASONABLE CLAIMS
If we suspect fraudulent activity, we may block your account and any associated accounts and/or withhold your refund. Reasons include but are not limited to claims relating to; orders not being received, missing items, damaged items, wrong items, worn items.
If your account is blocked for any of the above reasons and you need to make a valid return within 30 days (UK) / 45 days (International) of purchase, please contact Customer Service. You will need to cover return costs and keep hold of proof of postage until your return is received and processed.
Project assignment conditions
1) DEFINITION AND INTERPRETATION
1.1 In these Conditions the following definitions apply:
"Business Day" means a day other than a Saturday, Sunday or bank or public holiday in England;
"Company" means Bo and Tee Limited a private limited company incorporated in England (Company Number: SC563598) whose registered office is at 175 West George Street, Floor 2, Glasgow, Scotland, G2 2LB;
"Company Products" means those Products which are manufactured by the Company and marketed by Bo and Tee including but not limited to the garments specified in the Project Assignment;
"Competing Products" means any Product other than a Company Product;
"Competitor" means any company listed in clause 1.5 of the Project Assignment;
"Fees" means the sums set out in clause 5 of the relevant Project Assignment;
"Influencer Channels" means the social media, platforms and channels which are controlled by the Influencer and in relation to which the Influencer agrees to distribute the Influencer Materials as further described in the relevant Project Assignment;
"Influencer Materials" means any and all content and materials produced by or on behalf of the Influencer as a result of the performance of the Services featuring, endorsing and/or otherwise referring or relating to the Company and/or its Products (including the copy (including social media posts), blog, vlog, audio visual recording, sound recording, photograph or image described in the Project Assignment) in any medium or in promotional, sponsorship, advertising or marketing material relating to the Company Products in any and all media;
"Influencer Image Rights" means the name, likeness, branding, image, voice or signature of the Influencer, content relating to the Influencer, copyright material, data and biographical details.
"Bo and Tee" means the online fashion business of that name owned and operated by the Company;
"Products" means fashion and leisure wear created, manufactured and sold by Bo and Tee;
"Project Assignment" means a document to be agreed in writing by the parties and which shall set out the detail of the Services to be performed by the Influencer, including the Fees to be paid for the Services;
"Services" means the services to be provided by the Influencer as set out in the relevant Project Assignment(s);
"Term" means the period specified in the Project Assignment);
1.2 In these Conditions:
1.2.1 a reference to this Contract includes its schedules;
1.2.2 the clause, paragraph, schedule or other headings in this Contract are included for convenience only and shall have no effect on interpretation;
1.2.3 a reference to a 'party' includes that party's successors and permitted assigns;
1.2.4 words in the singular include the plural and vice versa;
1.2.5 any words that follow ‘include’, ‘includes’, ‘including’, ‘in particular’ or any similar words and expressions shall be construed as illustrative only and shall not limit the sense of any word, phrase, term, definition or description preceding those words;
1.2.6 a reference to ‘writing’ or ‘written’ includes any method of reproducing words in a legible and non-transitory form [(excluding email)];
1.2.7 a reference to legislation is a reference to that legislation as amended, extended, re-enacted or consolidated from time to time except to the extent that any such amendment, extension or re-enactment would increase or alter the liability of a party under this Contract; and
1.2.8 a reference to legislation includes all subordinate legislation made from time to time under that legislation.
2) ENGAGEMENT
2.1 The Company engages the services of the Influencer in connection with the marketing, advertising and promotion of the Company’s Products in accordance with these Conditions and the relevant Project Assignment. The Influencer shall provide the Services to the Company and create the Influencer Materials. Each Project Assignment signed by duly authorised representatives of each party shall form part of the Contract.
2.2 The Influencer shall ensure that any Influencer Materials distributed by or on behalf of the Influencer on Influencer Channels in connection with the Services shall be reasonably transparent to users as being marketing in accordance with advertising regulations, including by:
2.2.2 where such functionality exists on a social media platform, clicking any relevant box (or use other similar functionality as the social media platform provides) when posting the Influencer Materials to indicate and/or declare that the Influencer Materials are paid-for content; and
2.2.3 including any specific disclosures or form of words set out in the relevant Project Assignment.
3) APPROVAL OF INFLUENCER MATERIALS
3.1 The Influencer shall submit all Influencer Materials to the Company for prior approval and the parties agree that the Company shall have final editorial control over the Influencer Materials provided that the Company shall only be entitled to request amendments to edit the way in which its brand is featured or mentioned in the Influencer Materials and in order that the Influencer Materials comply with all applicable laws and advertising regulations. The Influencer shall not publicly release and/or make available any Influencer Materials which have not been approved by the Company in accordance with this clause 3.1 At any time upon written request, the Influencer shall promptly remove and delete: all Influencer Materials posted by or on behalf of the Influencer in connection with the Services from any or all Influencer Channels (as applicable); and all references to and associations with the Company on the Influencer Channels or elsewhere.
4) INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
4.1 The Company retains ownership of all intellectual property rights subsisting in the Company’s brand and its products. During the Term of this Contract, the Company grants a non-exclusive, worldwide, royalty-free licence to the Influencer to use the intellectual property rights in the Company’s brand, products and any other materials in each case solely as provided by the Company to the Influencer to the extent required for the Influencer to perform the Services.
4.2 The Influencer grants to the Company an exclusive, royalty-free, perpetual licence throughout the world to use, adapt, copy, reproduce, modify and exploit the Influencer Materials in connection with the endorsement, promotion, marketing or advertising of the Company and/or its products, in each case with an appropriate credit given to the Influencer in relation to the applicable Influencer Materials.
4.3 The Influencer grants to the Company all necessary consents under applicable law (including the Copyright, Designs and Patents Act 1988) to enable the Company to make the fullest possible use of the Services, the Influencer Image Rights and the Influencer Materials as contemplated in this Contract.
4.4 The Influencer irrevocably and unconditionally waives, in perpetuity, all moral rights in Influencer Materials and all similar rights under the laws of any jurisdiction whether now existing or conferred in the future.
5) FEES AND EXPENSES
5.1 Subject to the Influencer rendering the Services in accordance with these Conditions, the Company agrees to pay to the Influencer the Fees as set out in the relevant Project Assignment.
5.2 The Fees shall be inclusive of all use fees, residuals, repeat fees, re-use fees, royalties or other payments whatsoever. The Influencer acknowledges and agrees that the Fees are also inclusive of any/all of the Influencer’s travel, accommodation and any other expenses.
5.3 The Company shall pay all undisputed invoices submitted by the Influencer within 10 Business Days of the date of receipt (unless otherwise agreed in writing between the parties).
5.4 All amounts payable under this Contract shall be inclusive of sales, use, value added, goods and services, and all other similar taxes (but not including withholding tax), if any, imposed by a governmental entity for any taxable supply provided under this Contract.
6) WARRANTIES AND INDEMNITY
6.1.1 the Influencer Materials are the Influencer’s original works and use by the Company of the Influencer Materials and Influencer Image Rights in accordance with the terms of this Contract shall not infringe the rights of any third party;
6.1.2 the Influencer is entitled to enter into this Contract and has full power and authority to grant the rights expressed to be granted under this Contract and the Influencer is exclusively entitled to give all assurances, confirmations, waivers and agreements set out in this Contract to enable the Company to exploit the Influencer Image Rights and Influencer Materials as described in this Contract without making any further payment other than as expressly set out in this Contract;
6.1.3 the Influencer Materials shall comply with:
6.1.3.1 all applicable laws (including data protection laws), regulations and binding codes of practice, including advertising regulations; and
6.1.3.2 all terms and conditions and/or terms of use of any social media platforms or other online platforms used by the Influencer in relation to the Services
6.1.4 the Influencer Materials shall not include any personal data (as defined in the General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679) of any third party;
6.1.5 the Influencer shall render the Services diligently, and to the best of the Influencer’s skill and ability in willing co-operation with others and in the manner reasonably required by the Company or by its appointed representatives;
6.1.6 the Influencer shall not be in breach of any agreement with or of any obligation to any third party by reason of entering into this Contract and performing the Services and the Influencer has obtained all necessary consents to enter into this Contract and to grant the rights purported to be granted herein and to perform its obligations set out herein;
6.1.7 the Influencer shall not at any time do or say anything which is or may be considered by the Company to:
6.1.7.1 be detrimental or prejudicial to or to affect adversely the name, image, reputation or business of the Company or any of its products; or
6.1.7.2 bring the Influencer, the Company or any of its products into disrepute;
6.1.8 the Influencer shall not, for the duration of the Term, provide services which are similar to (or the equivalent of) the Services to any direct competitor of the Company, or in relation to any products or services which are similar to or substitutable for the Company’s products or services;
6.1.9 the Influencer shall be solely responsible for all income tax and national insurance contributions due in respect of the Fee; and
6.1.10 the Influencer shall not without the prior written consent of the Company make any statement or disclosure or supply any confidential information to any party relating to the Company or its products within the Influencer’s knowledge by reason of the rendering of Services under this Contract.
6.1.11 The Influencer shall indemnify and hold harmless the Company from and against any and all liabilities, losses, claims, demands, damages, costs and expenses (including reasonable legal costs and expenses and VAT) suffered or incurred directly or indirectly by the Company in consequence of any breach or alleged breach by the Influencer of any warranties contained in this Contract
7) LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
Nothing in this Contract shall limit or exclude either party's liability for death or personal injury resulting from negligence, for fraud, or for any other liability which cannot be excluded by applicable law.
Any unauthorized use of Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee).’s (without limitation) patents, trademarks, service marks, logos, slogans, screen shots, graphics, graphic styles, designs, blog posts, copyrighted materials or any branded features ("Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) Proprietary Property") without the prior written permission of Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) is strictly prohibited. If you infringe upon Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee).’s rights with respect to any Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) Proprietary Property, you will be ordered to cease such illegal activity and you may be liable to Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) for any and all damages (including recovery of legal fees and expenses) which may be suffered and/or incurred as a result of your infringement.
Subject to clause 7.1, and save in relation to any indemnity granted by the Influencer under this Contract (the Influencer’s liability for which shall be unlimited), the aggregate liability of the Influencer in respect of the Company or its affiliates arising out of or in connection with this Contract, whether under contract, tort (including negligence), misrepresentation or otherwise, shall be limited to an amount equal to the Fees.
Subject to clause 7.1, the aggregate liability of the Company in respect of the Influencer and arising out of or in connection with this Contract, whether under contract, delict or tort (including negligence), misrepresentation or otherwise, shall be limited to an amount equal to $5,000.
Gift Cards
*T&Cs apply. Gift cards are excluded from all promotions. Gift cards can be used more than once providing there is still a balance remaining on the card, and more than one gift card can be redeemed on one purchase. You cannot use a gift card to buy another gift card. Gift cards are applied to the final order total including shipping. If you paid part gift card and debit/credit card, then the refund will automatically go to the gift card first. Please use the original gift card code to redeem on your next order.
PRICING AND TAXES
VAT, GST and/or sales tax (the Indirect Taxes) are included in product prices in select jurisdictions only.
Our site contains a large number of Products and it is always possible that, despite our best efforts, some of the Products listed on our site may be incorrectly priced.  We will normally verify prices as part of our dispatch procedures. If we accept and process your order where a pricing error is obvious and unmistakable and could have reasonably been recognised by the average customer as an error, we may end the Contract, refund you any sums you have paid and require return of any products provided to you.
Sale/Promotional codes
1) Cashback x ZIP
These terms and conditions apply to the cashback promotion at Bo+Tee, by purchasing with Zip between 04.02.2022 & 04.05.2022 (the “Cashback offer”). The promoter of this cashback offer is Zip Co Finance UK Ltd (company no. 11502649) with its registered office at 82 St John St London England EC1M 4JN (“Zip”) and Bo and Tee Ltd (company no. SC563598) with its registered office at Floor 2 175 West George Street, Glasgow, Scotland, G2 2LB.
Any customer who makes a purchase £60 or over, using the Zip payment method on the Retailer’s website at [https://boandtee.com/] (“Website”) between 04.02.2022 & 04.03.2022, whose payment is successfully processed by Zip will be eligible for the Cashback offer.
By participating in the Cashback offer, you agree to accept and be bound by these Cashback offer terms and conditions and you confirm that you have read Zip’s and the Retailer’s respective Privacy Policies. These terms and conditions and Zip’s and the Retailer’s Privacy Policies may be updated from time to time so please check these terms and conditions and the Privacy Policies regularly to ensure that you understand the terms that apply at the time that you enter the Cashback offer.
A qualifying customer is a customer who:
makes a purchase on this Website of £60 or over using Zip as the payment method;
is aged 18 years of over;
provides a valid e-mail address; and
is resident in the UK;
The “Participant” is the customer who makes a qualifying purchase on the Website and whose billing details are provided upon order completion.
All purchases must be completed via the Website and multiple entries per person are permitted (if you make more than one qualifying purchase using Zip on the Website, each purchase will be eligible for the Cashback offer).
The opening date for participation in the cashback offer is midnight on 04.02.2022. The closing date of the cashback offer is midnight on 04.03.2022. Purchases made after this time will not be valid.
If for any reason a technical interruption, fault or site failure occurs when purchasing online, the Promoters do not take any responsibility for incomplete purchases and any incomplete purchases will not be considered valid for participation into the Cashback offer. The Promoters do not accept any responsibility for any purchases that are not completed for any reason.
Qualifying purchases of £60 or over will receive cashback of £10
Cashback will automatically apply to the participant’s fourth installment with Zip. The fourth instalment will be reduced by the correct cashback amount within four weeks of the purchase date and no action is required by the participant.
Example: A customer uses Zip to make a purchase totaling £100. Within 4 weeks of this purchase the instalment plan (viewable in your Zip account on web or app) will be automatically updated so that the fourth instalment is reduced by £10 – Instalment 1 (at time of purchase) = £25, 2 = £25, 3 = £25 4 = £15
Failure to pay any of the first three instalments on time will void the cashback offer
The cashback is non-exchangeable, non-transferable and no alternative is offered.
The decision of the Promoters regarding any aspect of the Cashback offer is final and binding and no correspondence will be entered into about it.
The Promoters reserve the right to refuse to award the cashback to anyone in breach of these Cashback offer terms and conditions.
The Promoters reserve the right to hold void, cancel, suspend, or amend the promotion where it becomes necessary to do so.
Insofar as is permitted by law, Zip and the Retailer, their agents or distributors will not in any circumstances be responsible or liable to compensate the participant or accept any liability for any loss, damage, personal injury or death occurring as a result of taking up the prize, except where it is caused by the negligence of Zip or the Retailer (as applicable), its agents or distributors or that of their employees. Your statutory rights are not affected.
As a result of your participation in the Cashback offer, each of the Promoters will collect certain personal data relating to you. Please see Zip’s Privacy Policy and the Retailer’s Privacy Policy located on its Website for information regarding the personal data collected, the purposes for which it is used and your rights. All personal and other data relating to Entrants will be retained by the Promoters for a reasonable period after the Cashback offer closes to assist in operating competitions in a consistent manner and to deal with any queries on the Cashback offer.
These terms and conditions are governed by English law. You can bring proceedings in respect of these terms and conditions in the English courts, however, as a consumer, if you live in another part of the UK you can bring legal proceedings in respect of these terms and conditions in either the English courts or your local courts.
2) ZIP Pay
Terms and conditions apply. 15% off discount applied at checkout upon entering code provided. One time usage. Cannot be used in conjunction with any other discounts, offers or promotions. Excludes outlet, gift cards and delivery charges. Offer valid for a limited time only. Bo & Tee reserve the right to cancel or alter any promotion.
2) Free Next Day Delivery
Terms and conditions apply. Only available in the United Kingdom. Free delivery code sent in email on submission of pop up. One time usage. Cannot be used in conjunction with any other discounts, offers or promotions. Offer valid for 24hrs from time of send only. Bo & Tee reserve the right to cancel or alter any promotion.
T&C's Apply. 20% off code is only applicable to selected styles. Items outwith this grouping are not included for discount. Code cannot be used in conjunction with any other offer. Customer must accept SMS marketing to be applicable to receive 20% off discount code. Bo&Tee reserve the right to alter or cancel this promotion at any time.
Summary & Details
SUMMARY
This section summarises how we obtain, store and use information about you. It is intended to provide a very general overview only. It is not complete in and of itself and it must be read in conjunction with the corresponding full sections of this Privacy Policy.
Data controller: Bo and Tee Ltd, Floor 2, Turnberry House, 175 West George Street, Glasgow, G2 2LB UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) Registration number: 00013472634
How we collect or obtain information about you:
When you provide it to us (e.g. by contacting us , placing an order on our website and
by signing up to our e-newsletter
), from your use of our website, using cookies and similar technologies, and occasionally, from third parties.
Information we collect: name, contact details, IP address, information from cookies, information about your computer or device (e.g. device and browser type), information about how you use our website (e.g. which pages you have viewed, the time when you view them and what you clicked on, the geographical location from which you accessed our website (based on your IP address), company name or business name (if applicable) and VAT number (if applicable).
How we use your information: for administrative and business purposes (particularly to contact you and process orders you place on our website), to improve our business and website, to fulfil our contractual obligations, to advertise our goods and services, to analyse your use of our website, and in connection with our legal rights and obligations.
Disclosure of your information to third parties: only to the extent necessary to run our business, to our service providers, to fulfil any contracts we enter into with you, where required by law or to enforce our legal rights.
Do we sell your information to third parties (other than in the course of a business sale or purchase or similar event)?: No
How long we retain your information: for no longer than necessary, taking into account any legal obligations we have (e.g. to maintain records for tax purposes), any other legal basis we have for using your information (e.g. your consent, performance of a contract with you or our legitimate interests as a business) and certain additional factors described in the main section below entitled How long we retain your information.
For specific retention periods in relation to certain information which we collect from you, please see the main section below entitled How long we retain your information.
How we secure your information: using appropriate technical and organisational measures such as storing your information on secure servers, encrypting transfers of data to or from our servers using Secure Sockets Layer (SSL) technology, encrypting payments you make on or via our website using Secure Sockets Layer (SSL) technology and only granting access to your information where necessary.
Use of cookies and similar technologies: we use cookies and similar information-gathering technologies such as web beacons on our website including essential, functional, analytical and targeting cookies. For more information, please visit our cookies policy section titled: Cookie Policy
Transfers of your information outside the European Economic Area: we will only transfer your information outside the European Economic Area if we are required to do so by law. Where we do so, we will ensure appropriate safeguards are in place,
the third parties we use who transfer your information outside the European Economic Area have self-certified themselves as compliant with the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield
.
Use of automated decision making and profiling: we use automated decision making and profiling.
Web analytics, cookies, web beacons, server log analysis, targeting cookies are used to display advertisements to people who visit our website on other websites around the internet
. Your rights in relation to your information: to access your information and to receive information about its use, to have your information corrected and/or completed, to have your information deleted, to restrict the use of your information, to receive your information in a portable format, to object to the use of your information, to withdraw your consent to the use of your information, not to have significant decisions made about you based solely on automated processing of your information, including profiling, to complain to a supervisory authority
Sensitive personal information: we do not knowingly or intentionally collect what is commonly referred to as ‘sensitive personal information’. Please do not submit sensitive personal information about you to us. For more information, please see the main section below entitled Sensitive Personal Information.
OUR DETAILS
The data controller in respect of our website is Bo and Tee Ltd (company registration number: SC563598) of Floor 2, Turnberry House, 175 West George Street, Glasgow, G2 2LB. You can contact the data controller by writing to Bo and Tee Ltd, Floor 2, Turnberry House, 175 West George Street, Glasgow, G2 2LB. or sending an email to privacy@boandtee.com.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact the data controller.
Information We Collect
INFORMATION WE COLLECT WHEN YOU VISIT OUR WEBSITE
Web server log information
We use a third party server to host our website called AWS, the privacy policy of which is available here:
AWS Privacy Policy
. Our website server automatically logs the IP address you use to access our website as well as other information about your visit such as the pages accessed, information requested, the date and time of the request, the source of your access to our website (e.g. the website or URL (link) which referred you to our website), and your browser version and operating system.
Our servers are located in Ireland.
Use of website server log information for IT security purposes
We AND our third party hosting provider collect(s) and store(s) server logs to ensure network and IT security and so that the server and website remain uncompromised. This includes analysing log files to help identify and prevent unauthorised access to our network, the distribution of malicious code, denial of services attacks and other cyber attacks, by detecting unusual or suspicious activity.
Unless we are investigating suspicious or potential criminal activity, we do not make, nor do we allow our hosting provider to make, any attempt to identify you from the information collected via server logs.
Legal basis for processing: compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject (Article 6(1)(c) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legal obligation: we have a legal obligation to implement appropriate technical and organisational measures to ensure a level of security appropriate to the risk of our processing of information about individuals. Recording access to our website using server log files is such a measure.
Legal basis for processing: our and a third party’s legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interests: we and our third party hosting provider have a legitimate interest in using your information for the purposes of ensuring network and information security.
Use of website server log information to analyse website use and improve our website
We use the information collected by our website server logs to analyse how our website users interact with our website and its features. For example, we analyse the number of visits and unique visitors we receive, the time and date of the visit, the location of the visit and the operating system and browser used.
We use the information gathered from the analysis of this information to improve our website. For example, we use the information gathered to change the information, content and structure of our website and individual pages based according to what users are engaging most with and the duration of time spent on particular pages on our website.
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest: improving our website for our website users and getting to know our website users’ preferences so our website can better meet their needs and desires.
Cookies and similar technologies
Cookies are data files which are sent from a website to a browser to record information about users for various purposes.
We use cookies and similar technologies on our website, including essential, functional, analytical and targeting cookies and web beacons. For further information on how we use cookies, please see our cookies policy section titled: Cookie Policy
You can reject some or all of the cookies we use on or via our website by changing your browser settings or blocking non-essential cookies by not closing out cookie notice, but doing so can impair your ability to use our website or some or all of its features. For further information about cookies, including how to change your browser settings, please visit
All About Cookies
or see our cookies policy.
INFORMATION WE COLLECT WHEN YOU CONTACT US
We collect and use information from individuals who contact us in accordance with this section and the section entitled Disclosure and additional uses of your information.
Email
When you send an email to the email address displayed on our website we collect your email address and any other information you provide in that email (such as your name, telephone number and the information contained in any signature block in your email).
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest(s): responding to enquiries and messages we receive and keeping records of correspondence.
Legal basis for processing: necessary to perform a contract or to take steps at your request to enter into a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: where your message relates to us providing you with goods or services or taking steps at your request prior to providing you with our goods and services (for example, providing you with information about such goods and services), we will process your information in order to do so).
Transfer and storage of your information
We use a third party email providers to store emails you send us.
Our third party email provider is Zendesk, Inc, Located in the The United States of America. Their privacy policy is available here:
Zendesk Privacy Policy
Emails you send us will be stored outside the European Economic Area on our third party email provider’s servers in the USA. For further information please see the section of this privacy policy entitled Transfers of your information outside the European Economic Area.
Contact form
When you contact us using our contact form, we collect
name, email address and IP address
. We also collect any other information you provide to us when you complete the contact form, including any optional information, such as:
phone number, reason for enquiry and your comments
.
If you do not provide the mandatory information required by our contact form, you will not be able to submit the contact form and we will not receive your enquiry.
If you do not supply the optional information required by our contact form,
we will not be able to respond to your enquiry by phone or address your request appropriately
.
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest(s): responding to enquiries and messages we receive and keeping records of correspondence.
Legal basis for processing: necessary to perform a contract or to take steps at your request to enter into a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: where your message relates to us providing you with goods or services or taking steps at your request prior to providing you with our goods and services (for example, providing you with information about such goods and services), we will process your information in order to do so).
Transfer and storage of your information
We use a third party contact form provider to store messages you send us. Our contact form provider is Zendesk, Inc located in The United States of America. Their privacy policy is available here:
Zendesk Privacy Policy
Messages you send to us via our contact form will be stored outside the European Economic Area on our contact form provider’s servers in The United States of America.
For further information about the safeguards used when your information is transferred outside the European Economic Area, see the section of this privacy policy below entitled Transfers of your information outside the European Economic Area.
Phone
When you contact us by phone, we collect your phone number and any information provide to us during your conversation with us.
We occasionally record phone calls for quality and training purposes.
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation)
Legitimate interest(s): responding to enquiries and messages we receive and keeping records of correspondence.
Legal basis for processing: necessary to perform a contract or to take steps at your request to enter into a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: where your message relates to us providing you with goods or services or taking steps at your request prior to providing you with our goods and services (for example, providing you with information about such goods and services), we will process your information in order to do so).
Transfer and storage of your information
Information about your call, such as your phone number and the date and time of your call, is processed by our third party telephone service provider, Zendesk, Inc. which is located in The United States of America. Their privacy policy is available here:
Zendesk Privacy Policy
Information about your phone call will be stored by our third party telephone service provider outside the European Economic Area. For further information about the safeguards used when your information is transferred outside the European Economic Area, see the section of this privacy policy below entitled Transfers of your information outside the European Economic Area.
Post
If you contact us by post, we will collect any information you provide to us in any postal communications you send us.
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation)
Legitimate interest(s): responding to enquiries and messages we receive and keeping records of correspondence.
Legal basis for processing: necessary to perform a contract or to take steps at your request to enter into a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: where your message relates to us providing you with goods or services or taking steps at your request prior to providing you with our goods and services (for example, providing you with information about such goods and services), we will process your information in order to do so).
INFORMATION WE COLLECT WHEN YOU INTERACT WITH OUR WEBSITE
We collect and use information from individuals who interact with particular features of our website in accordance with this section and the section entitled Disclosure and additional uses of your information.
E-Newsletter
When you sign up for our e-newsletter on our website or opt to receive news and offers from us
by entering your name and email address and clicking subscribe or ticking the opt-in box at checkout indicating that you would like to receive your e-newsletter
, we collect
your name and email address.
Legal basis for processing: your consent (Article 6(1)(a) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Consent: you give your consent to us sending you our e-newsletter by signing up to receive it using the steps described above.
Transfer and storage of your information
We use a third party service to send out our e-newsletter and administer our mailing list, Klaviyo, Located in the United States of America. Their privacy policy is available here:
Klaviyo Privacy Policy
Information you submit to subscribe for our e-newsletter to Klaviyo will be stored outside the European Economic Area on our third party mailing list provider’s servers in The United States of America. For further information about the safeguards used when your information is transferred outside the European Economic Area, see the section of this privacy policy below entitled Transfers of your information outside the European Economic Area.
Use of web beacons and similar technologies in emails
We use technologies such as web beacons (small graphic files) in the emails we send to allow us to assess the level of engagement our emails receive by measuring information such as the delivery rates, open rates and click through rates and which our emails achieve. We will only use web beacons in our emails if you have consented to us doing so.
For more information on how we use web beacons in our e-newsletter emails, see our cookies policy which is titled: Cookie Policy
For more information about our third party mailing list provider and they use web beacons, please see their privacy policy which is available here:
Registering on our website
When you register and create an account on our website, we collect the following information:
name, email address, IP address
and any other information you provide to us when you complete the registration form, including any optional information, such as phone number, billing address, shipping address and your birthday.
If you do not provide the mandatory information required by the registration form, you will not be able to register or create an account on our website.
If you do not supply the optional information requested by our registration form,
we will not be able to respond to your enquiry by phone, bill you for an order and ship your order to you.
Legal basis for processing: to take steps at your request prior to entering into a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: creating an account on our website is necessary to allow you to access the goods and services you have purchased from us
Transfer and storage of your information
Information you submit to us via the registration form on our website will be stored within the European Economic Area on our third party hosting provider’s servers in Ireland. Our third party hosting provider is AWS located in Ireland. Their privacy policy is available here:
AWS Privacy Policy
For further information about the safeguards used when your information is transferred outside the European Economic Area, see the section of this privacy policy below entitled Transfers of your information outside the European Economic Area.
INFORMATION WE COLLECT WHEN YOU PLACE AN ORDER ON OUR WEBSITE
We collect and use information from individuals who place an order on our website in accordance with this section and the section entitled Disclosure and additional uses of your information.
Information collected when you place an order
Mandatory information
When you place an order for goods or services on our website, we collect your name, email address, billing address, shipping address, company name (if applicable) and VAT number (if applicable).
If you do not provide this information, you will not be able to purchase goods or services from us on our website or enter into a contract with us.
Legal basis for processing: necessary to perform a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: we need the mandatory information collected by our checkout form to establish who the contract is with and to contact you to fulfil our obligations under the contract, including sending you receipts and order confirmations.
Legal basis for processing: compliance with a legal obligation (Article 6(1)(c) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legal obligation: we have a legal obligation to issue you with an invoice for the goods and services you purchase from us where you are VAT registered and we require the mandatory information collected by our checkout form for this purpose. We also have a legal obligation to keep accounting records, including records of transactions.
Optional information
We also collect optional information from you, such as your phone number, information about how you heard about us. We also ask you if you would like to receive marketing communications from us. For further information, see ‘Marketing communications’ in this section below.
If you do not supply the optional information requested at checkout,
we will not be able to contact you by phone
.
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interests:
to be able to contact you by phone where (if necessary) in relation to your order
AND
Legal basis for processing: your consent (Article 6(1)(a) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interests: you consent to us processing any optional information you provide by submitting that information to us.
Processing your payment
After you place an order on our website you will need to make payment for the goods or services you have ordered. In order to process your payment we use third party payment processors, including
PayPal and Adyen
. Your payment will be processed by the third party payment processor you choose to process your payment via a payment gateway.
the third party payment processor you choose to process your payment collects, uses and processes your information, including payment information, in accordance with their privacy policies. You can access their privacy policies via the following link(s):
Adyen Privacy Policy
Paypal Privacy Policy
Transfer and storage of your information
PayPal is located in the United Kingdom. Information relating to the processing of your payment is stored within the European Economic Area on our third party payment processor’s servers in The United Kingdom.
For further information about the safeguards used when your information is transferred outside the European Economic Area, see the section of this privacy policy below entitled Transfers of your information outside the European Economic Area.
Legal basis for processing: necessary to perform a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: to fulfil your contractual obligation to pay for the goods or services you have ordered from us.
Marketing communications
At checkout you will have the option of receiving marketing communications from us.
Our similar goods and services
You can opt-out from receiving marketing communications in relation to our goods and which are similar to those which you purchase from us, by not checking the newsletter signup box on checkout.
We will send you marketing communications in relation to similar goods and services if you do not opt out from receiving them.
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interests: direct marketing and advertising our products and services.]
Transfer and storage of your information
We use a third party service to administer our mailing list;
MailChimp.  Their privacy policy can be found here:
MailChimp Privacy Policy
Information you submit to subscribe for our e-newsletter will be stored within the European Economic Area on our AWS servers in Ireland.
We use technologies such as web beacons (small graphic files) in the emails we send to allow us to assess the level of engagement our emails receive by measuring information such as the delivery rates, open rates and click through rates where users are clicking on our emails (heat maps).  By signing up to receive our emails you are consenting to us using web beacons for these purposes.
For more information on how we use web beacons in our emails, see our cookies policy which is titled: Cookie Policy
INFORMATION COLLECTED OR OBTAINED FROM THIRD PARTIES
This section sets out how we obtain or collect information about you from third parties.
Information received from third parties
Generally, we do not receive information about you from third parties. The third parties from which we receive information about you will generally include
group companies, affiliates or business partners
.
It is also possible that third parties with whom we have had no prior contact may provide us with information about you.
Information we obtain from third parties will generally be your name and contact details, but will include any additional information about you which they provide to us.
Legal basis for processing: necessary to perform a contract or to take steps at your request to enter into a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: where a third party has passed on information about you to us (such as your name and email address) in order for us to provide services to you, we will process your information in order to take steps at your request to enter into a contract with you and perform a contract with you (as the case may be).
Legal basis for processing: consent (Article 6(1)(a) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Consent: where you have asked that a third party to share information about you with us and the purpose of sharing that information is not related to the performance of a contract or services by us to you, we will process your information on the basis of your consent, which you give by asking the third party in question to pass on your information to us.
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interests: where a third party has shared information about you with us and you have not consented to the sharing of that information, we will have a legitimate interest in processing that information in certain circumstances.
For example, we would have a legitimate interest in processing your information to perform our obligations under a sub-contract with the third party, where the third party has the main contract with you. Our legitimate interest is the performance of our obligations under our sub-contract.
Similarly, third parties may pass on information about you to us if you have infringed or potentially infringed any of our legal rights. In this case, we will have a legitimate interest in processing that information to investigate and pursue any such potential infringement.
Where we receive information about you in error
If we receive information about you from a third party in error and/or we do not have a legal basis for processing that information, we will delete your information.
Information obtained by us from third parties
In certain circumstances (for example, to verify the information we hold about you or obtain missing information we require to provide you with a service) we will obtain information about you from certain publicly accessible sources, both EU and non-EU, such as business directories, media publications, social media, and websites (including your own website if you have one) and Google Maps or Post Code lookups.
Legal basis for processing: necessary to perform a contract or to take steps at your request to enter into a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract: where you have entered into a contract or requested that we enter into a contract with you, in certain circumstances, we will obtain information about you from public sources in order to enable us to understand your business and provide services to you or services to a sufficient standard.
For example, we would obtain and/or verify your email address from your website or from a directory where you ask us to send you information by email but we do not possess the information or we need to confirm that we have recorded your email address correctly.
Legal basis for processing: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interests: in certain circumstances, we will have a legitimate interest in obtaining information about you from public and private sources. For example, if you have infringed or we suspect that you have infringed any of our legal rights, we will have a legitimate interest in obtaining and processing information about you from such sources in order to investigate and pursue any suspected or potential infringement.
OUR USE OF AUTOMATED DECISION-MAKING AND PROFILING
We use automated decision making and profiling on our website. We do not consider that this has any legal effect on you or similarly significantly affects you.
You have the right to object to our use of automated decision making and profiling described in this section. You can do that by opting-out of cookies and similar technologies in accordance with the method described in the relevant section below. If you do not want us to process your actual IP address (usually the IP address assigned to you by your Internet Service Provider) when you visit our website, you can use a Virtual Private Network (VPN) or a free service such as Tor.
You can find out more about our use of cookies and similar technologies (including the legal basis on which we use them) and how to opt out from them in our cookies policy, which is titled: Cookie Policy
Automated decision making
Automated decision making is decision making by technological means (i.e. by a machine) without human involvement.
Use of automated decision making for display advertising
We automate the display advertisements containing our products and services on other websites you visit, you based on the fact that you have visited our website using cookies. For further information on the cookies we use, please see our cookies policy.
Logic involved: automatically displaying advertisements to individuals who have visited our website results in increased efficiencies and costs savings for us than manually displaying advertisements or displaying advertisements by different means.
Significance and envisaged consequences: cookies will be used to recognise the fact that you have visited our website in order to display advertisements to you (unless you have blocked such cookies) and will collect information about your online behaviour.
How to object: you can block these cookies by
using the cookies control management tool on your site (if you use one)
]
e.g. blocking third party cookies using browser settings, or insert specific method e.g. for Google DoubleClick, by opting out of seeing personalised ads by following
these instructions
Uses of information
DISCLOSURE AND ADDITIONAL USES OF YOUR INFORMATION
This section sets out the circumstances in which will disclose information about you to third parties and any additional purposes for which we use your information.
Disclosure of your information to service providers
We use a number of third parties to provide us with services which are necessary to run our business or to assist us with running our business and who process your information for us on our behalf. These include the following:
Telephone provider(s), including BT & TalkTalk. Their privacy policy is available here:
BT Privacy Policy
and
TalkTalk Privacy Policy
Email provider(s), including Gmail. Their privacy policy is available here:
Google Privacy Policy
Hosting provider(s), including AWS. Their privacy policy is available here:
AWS Privacy Policy
Your information will be shared with these service providers where necessary to provide you with the service you have requested, whether that is accessing our website or ordering goods and services from us.
We do not display the identities of [all of] our service providers publicly by name for security and competitive reasons. If you would like further information about the identities of our service providers, however, please contact us directly via our contact form and we will provide you with such information where you have a legitimate reason for requesting it (where we have shared your information with such service providers, for example).
Legal basis for processing
: legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest relied on
: where we share your information with these third parties in a context other than where is necessary to perform a contract (or take steps at your request to do so), we will share your information with such third parties in order to allow us to run and manage our business efficiently.
Legal basis for processing
: necessary to perform a contract and/or to take steps at your request prior to entering into a contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Reason why necessary to perform a contract
: we may need to share information with our service providers to enable us to perform our obligations under that contract or to take the steps you have requested before we enter into a contract with you.
Disclosure of your information to other third parties
We disclose your information to other third parties in specific circumstances, as set out below.
Providing information to third parties such as
Google Inc.
, Google collects information through our use of Google Analytics on our website. Google uses this information, including IP addresses and information from cookies, for a number of purposes, such as improving its Google Analytics service. Information is shared with Google on an aggregated and anonymised basis. To find out more about what information Google collects, how it uses this information and how to control the information sent to Google, please see the following page:
Google Privacy Policy
Legal basis for processing
: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest(s)
: meeting our contractual obligations to Google under our Google Analytics Terms of Service (
Google Analytics Terms of Service
)
You can opt out of Google Analytics by installing the browser plugin here:
Google Analytics Opt Out
Transfer and storage of your information
Information collected by Google Analytics is stored outside the European Economic Area on Google’s servers in the United States of America.
For further information about the safeguards used when your information is transferred outside the European Economic Area, see the section of this privacy policy below entitled
Transfers of your information outside the European Economic Area
.]
Sharing your information with third parties, which are either related to or associated with the running of our business, where it is necessary for us to do so. These third parties include our accountants, advisors, independent contractors, HMRC
. Further information on each of these third parties is set out below.
Legal basis for processing
: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest
: running and managing our business efficiently.
Accountants
We share information with our accountants for tax purposes. For example, we share invoices we issue and receive with our accountants for the purpose of completing tax returns and our end of year accounts.]
Our accountants are located in the United Kingdom
Advisors
Occasionally, we obtain advice from advisors, such as lawyers and public relations professionals.  We will share your information with these third parties only where it is necessary to enable these third parties to be able to provide us with the relevant advice.
Our advisors are located in the United Kingdom.
Independent contractors
Occasionally, we use independent contractors in our business. Your information will be shared with independent contractors only where it is necessary for them to perform the function we have hired them perform in relation to our business.
Our independent contractors are located in the United Kingdom.
Insurers
We will share your information with our insurers where it is necessary to do so, for example in relation to a claim or potential claim we receive or make or under our general disclosure obligations under our insurance contract with them.]
Our insurers are located in the EEA.
Discount Affiliate
[
We make use of Discount Affiliates.  Your information and student status is shared with Discount Affiliates only when it is necessary for them to perform the function for which they are contracted.
Our Discount Affiliate is located in the United Kingdom.
Payment Processor
We make use of Payment Processors and Merchant Banks.  Your information & payment information is shared with Payment Processors only when it is necessary for them to perform the function for which they are contracted; namely approving and capturing a purchase.
Our Payment Processor is located in the United States.
In order to offer you Klarna’s payment methods, we might in the checkout pass your personal data in the form of contact and order details to Klarna, in order for Klarna to assess whether you qualify for their payment methods and to tailor those payment methods for you. Your personal data transferred is processed in line with
Klarna’s own privacy notice.
Sharing your information within our business’ group of companies, including Bo and Tee USA Inc, for internal administrative purposes, including client, customer and employee information.
Legal basis for processing
: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest
: running and managing our business effectively.
Sharing your information with a prospective or actual purchaser or seller in the context of a business or asset sale or acquisition by us, a merger or similar business combination event, whether actual or potential.
Legal basis for processing
: legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest(s)
: sharing your information with a prospective purchaser, seller or similar person in order to allow such a transaction to take place.
We do not display the identities of the other third parties we may share information with by name for security and competitive reasons. If you would like further information about the identities of such third parties, however, please contact us directly[via our contact form or by email and we will provide you with such information where you have a legitimate reason for requesting it (where we have shared your information with such third parties, for example).
Disclosure and use of your information for legal reasons
Indicating possible criminal acts or threats to public security to a competent authority
If we suspect that criminal or potential criminal conduct has been occurred, we will in certain circumstances need to contact an appropriate authority, such as the police. This could be the case, for instance, if we suspect that we fraud or a cybercrime has been committed or if we receive threats or malicious communications towards us or third parties.
We will generally only need to process your information for this purpose if you were involved or affected by such an incident in some way.
Legal basis for processing
: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interests
: preventing crime or suspected criminal activity (such as fraud).
In connection with the enforcement or potential enforcement our legal rights
We will use your information in connection with the enforcement or potential enforcement of our legal rights, including, for example, sharing information with debt collection agencies if you do not pay amounts owed to us when you are contractually obliged to do so. Our legal rights may be contractual (where we have entered into a contract with you) or non-contractual (such as legal rights that we have under copyright law or tort law).
Legal basis for processing
: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest
: enforcing our legal rights and taking steps to enforce our legal rights.
In connection with a legal or potential legal dispute or proceedings
We may need to use your information if we are involved in a dispute with you or a third party for example, either to resolve the dispute or as part of any mediation, arbitration or court resolution or similar process.
Legal basis for processing
: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest(s)
: resolving disputes and potential disputes.
For ongoing compliance with laws, regulations and other legal requirements
We will use and process your information in order to comply with legal obligations to which we are subject. For example, we may need to disclose your information pursuant to a court order or subpoena if we receive one.
Legal basis for processing
: compliance with a legal obligation (Article 6(1)(c) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legal obligation(s)
: legal obligations to disclose information which are part of the laws of, Scotland, England and Walesor if they have been integrated into the United Kingdom’s legal framework (for example in the form of an international agreement which the United Kingdom has signed).
Legal basis for processing
: our legitimate interests (Article 6(1)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation).
Legitimate interest
: where the legal obligations are part of the laws of another country and have not been integrated into the United Kingdom’s legal framework, we have a legitimate interest in complying with these obligations.
HOW LONG WE RETAIN YOUR INFORMATION
This section sets out how long we retain your information. We have set out specific retention periods where possible. Where that has not been possible, we have set out the criteria we use to determine the retention period.
Retention periods
Server log information
: we retain information on our server logs for 120 days.
Order information
: when you place an order for goods and services, we retain that information for six years following the end of the financial year in which you placed your order, in accordance with our legal obligation to keep records for tax purposes.
Correspondence and enquiries
: when you make an enquiry or correspond with us for any reason, whether by email or via our contact form or by phone, we will retain your information for as long as it takes to respond to and resolve your enquiry, and for 6 further months, after which point we will delete your information.
E-Newsletter
: we retain the information you used to sign up for our e-newsletter for as long as you remain subscribed (i.e. you do not unsubscribe) or if we decide to cancel our e-newsletter service, whichever comes earlier.
Criteria for determining retention periods
In any other circumstances, we will retain your information for no longer than necessary, taking into account the following:
[the purpose(s) and use of your information both now and in the future (such as whether it is necessary to continue to store that information in order to continue to perform our obligations under a contract with you or to contact you in the future); whether we have any legal obligation to continue to process your information (such as any record-keeping obligations imposed by relevant law or regulation); whether we have any legal basis to continue to process your information (such as your consent); how valuable your information is (both now and in the future); any relevant agreed industry practices on how long information should be retained; the levels of risk, cost and liability involved with us continuing to hold the information; how hard it is to ensure that the information can be kept up to date and accurate; and any relevant surrounding circumstances (such as the nature and status of our relationship with you).]
HOW WE SECURE YOUR INFORMATION
We take appropriate technical and organisational measures to secure your information and to protect it against unauthorised or unlawful use and accidental loss or destruction, including:
only sharing and providing access to your information to the minimum extent necessary, subject to confidentiality restrictions where appropriate, and on an anonymised basis wherever possible; using secure servers to store your information; verifying the identity of any individual who requests access to information prior to granting them access to information; using Secure Sockets Layer (SSL) software to encrypt any information you submit to us via any forms on our website and any payment transactions you make on or via our website;
pseudonymisation
of stored data and passwords;
Transmission of information to us by email
Transmission of information over the internet is not entirely secure, and if you submit any information to us over the internet (whether by email, via our website or any other means), you do so entirely at your own risk.
We cannot be responsible for any costs, expenses, loss of profits, harm to reputation, damages, liabilities or any other form of loss or damage suffered by you as a result of your decision to transmit information to us by such means.
TRANSFERS OF YOUR INFORMATION OUTSIDE THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA
The majority of your information is stored in the following European Economic Area (EEA) countries; United Kingdom, Ireland, Denmark, Germany.
Other than to comply with any legal obligations to which we are subject (compliance with a court order, for example), we do not intend to transfer your information outside the EEA or to an international organisation. In the unlikely event that we are required to transfer your information outside the EEA (or to an international organisation) for such a purpose, we will ensure appropriate safeguards and protections are in place.
We will also transfer your information outside the EEA or to an international organisation in order to comply with legal obligations to which we are subject (compliance with a court order, for example). Where we are required to do so, we will ensure appropriate safeguards and protections are in place.
Google Analytics
Information collected by Google Analytics (your IP address and actions you take in relation to our website) is transferred outside the EEA and stored on Google’s servers. You can access Google’s privacy policy here:
Google Privacy Policy
Country of storage
: United Kingdom. This country is subject to an adequacy decision by the European Commission.
Safeguard(s) used
: Google has self-certified its compliance with the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield which is available here:
Privacy Shield
. The EU-U.S. Privacy Shield is an approved certification mechanism under Article 42 of the General Data Protection Regulation, which is permitted under Article 46(2)(f) of the General Data Protection Regulation. You can access the European Commission decision on the adequacy of the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield here:
Adequacy of EU US Privacy Shield
Country of Storage:  United States. This country is no subject to an adequacy decision by the European Commission.
YOUR RIGHTS IN RELATION TO YOUR INFORMATION
Subject to certain limitations on certain rights, you have the following rights in relation to your information, which you can exercise by writing to by sending an email to privacy@boandtee.com:
to request access to your information and information related to our use and processing of your information; to request the correction or deletion of your information; to request that we restrict our use of your information; to receive information which you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format (e.g. a CSV file) and the right to have that information transferred to another data controller (including a third party data controller); to object to the processing of your information for certain purposes (for further information, see the section below entitled Your right to object to the processing of your information for certain purposes); and to withdraw your consent to our use of your information at any time where we rely on your consent to use or process that information. Please note that if you withdraw your consent, this will not affect the lawfulness of our use and processing of your information on the basis of your consent before the point in time when you withdraw your consent.
In accordance with Article 77 of the General Data Protection Regulation, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority, in particular in the Member State of your habitual residence, place of work or of an alleged infringement of the General Data Protection Regulation.
For the purposes of the UK, the supervisory authority is the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), the contact details of which are available here:
ICO Contact Page
Further information on your rights in relation to your personal data as an individual
The above rights are provided in summary form only and certain limitations apply to many of these rights. For further information about your rights in relation to your information, including any limitations which apply, please visit the following pages on the ICO’s website:
ICO Individual Rights
and ICO: Is
My Information being used correctly
You can also find out further information about your rights, as well as information on any limitations which apply to those rights, by reading the underlying legislation contained in Articles 12 to 22 and 34 of the General Data Protection Regulation, which is available here:
European Commision: Data Protection
Verifying your identity where you request access to your information
Where you request access to your information, we are required by law to use all reasonable measures to verify your identity before doing so.
These measures are designed to protect your information and to reduce the risk of identity fraud, identity theft or general unauthorised access to your information.
How we verify your identity
Where we possess appropriate information about you on file, we will attempt to verify your identity using that information.
If it is not possible to identity you from such information, or if we have insufficient information about you, we may require original or certified copies of certain documentation in order to be able to verify your identity before we are able to provide you with access to your information.
We will be able to confirm the precise information we require to verify your identity in your specific circumstances if and when you make such a request.
YOUR RIGHT TO OBJECT TO THE PROCESSING OF YOUR INFORMATION FOR CERTAIN PURPOSES
You have the following rights in relation to your information, which you may exercise in the same way as you may exercise by sending an email to privacy@boandtee.com
to object to us using or processing your information where we use or process it in order to carry out a task in the public interest or for our legitimate interests, including ‘profiling’ (i.e. analysing or predicting your behaviour based on your information) based on any of these purposes; and to object to us using or processing your information for direct marketing purposes (including any profiling we engage in that is related to such direct marketing).
You may also exercise your right to object to us using or processing your information for direct marketing purposes by:
clicking the unsubscribe link contained at the bottom of any marketing email we send to you and following the instructions which appear in your browser following your clicking on that link; sending an SMS message containing only the words “OPT OUT” in reply to any marketing communication we send by text message;]
For more information on how to object to our use of information collected from cookies and similar technologies, please see the section entitled
How to accept or reject cookies
in our cookies policy, which is titled: Cookie Policy
SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION
‘Sensitive personal information’ is information about an individual that reveals their racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership, genetic information, biometric information for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual, information concerning health or information concerning a natural person’s sex life or sexual orientation.
We do not knowingly or intentionally collect sensitive personal information from individuals, and you must not submit sensitive personal information to us.
If, however, you inadvertently or intentionally transmit sensitive personal information to us, you will be considered to have explicitly consented to us processing that sensitive personal information under Article 9(2)(a) of the General Data Protection Regulation. We will use and process your sensitive personal information for the purposes of deleting it.
Privacy
CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
We update and amend our Privacy Policy from time to time.
MINOR CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
Where we make minor changes to our Privacy Policy, we will update our Privacy Policy with a new effective date stated at the beginning of it. Our processing of your information will be governed by the practices set out in that new version of the Privacy Policy from its effective date onwards.
MAJOR CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY OR THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH WE PROCESS YOUR INFORMATION
Where we make major changes to our Privacy Policy or intend to use your information for a new purpose or a different purpose than the purposes for which we originally collected it, we will notify you by email (where possible).
We will provide you with the information about the change in question and the purpose and any other relevant information before we use your information for that new purpose.
Wherever required, we will obtain your prior consent before using your information for a purpose that is different from the purposes for which we originally collected it.
CHILDREN’S PRIVACY
Because we care about the safety and privacy of children online, we comply with the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998 (COPPA). COPPA and its accompanying regulations protect the privacy of children using the internet. We do not knowingly contact or collect information from persons under the age of 18. The website is not intended to solicit information of any kind from persons under the age of 18.
It is possible that we could receive information pertaining to persons under the age of 18 by the fraud or deception of a third party. If we are notified of this, as soon as we verify the information, we will, where required by law to do so, immediately obtain the appropriate parental consent to use that information or, if we are unable to obtain such parental consent, we will delete the information from our servers. If you would like to notify us of our receipt of information about persons under the age of 18, please do so by sending an email to privacy@boandtee.com.
CALIFORNIA DO NOT TRACK DISCLOSURES
“Do Not Track” is a privacy preference that users can set in their web browsers. When a user turns on a Do Not Track signal in their browser, the browser sends a message to websites requesting that they do not track the user. For information about Do Not Track, please visit
All About Do Not Track
.
At this time, we do not respond to Do Not Track browser settings or signals. In addition, we use other technology that is standard to the internet, such as pixel tags, web beacons, and other similar technologies, to track visitors to the website. Those tools may be used by us and by third parties to collect information about you and your internet activity, even if you have turned on the Do Not Track signal.
For information on how to opt out from tracking technologies used on our website, see our cookies policy which is available here:
Cookie Policy
COPYRIGHT, CREDIT AND LOGO
This Privacy Policy is based on a General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/769) (GDPR) compliant template provided by GDPR Privacy Policy. For further information, please visit:
GDPR Privacy Policy
The copyright in this Privacy Policy is either owned by, or licensed to, us and is protected by copyright laws around the world and copyright protection software. All intellectual property rights in this document are reserved.
Where we display the GDPR Privacy Policy logo on our website, this is used to indicate that we have adopted a privacy policy template provided by GDPR Privacy Policy as the basis for this Privacy Policy.
Copyright & Intellectual property
COPYRIGHT
This website and its content is copyright of Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee). All rights reserved.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) ("Bo and Tee Ltd") respects and rigorously abides by intellectual property laws. Accordingly, Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) rightfully expects the same of all parties who use our website. Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) and/or its affiliates are owners or lawful licensees of all content (including but not limited to designs, logos, colour schemes, graphics, graphic styles, text, images and video/audio sequences) displayed on this website. Any unauthorized copying, publication, reproduction or distribution of copyrighted works is an infringement of the copyright owners' rights and is therefore prohibited. You may not, except with our express prior written permission (on whatever terms we deem appropriate), distribute or commercially exploit the content. Nor may you transmit it or store it in any other website or other form of electronic retrieval system.
Any unauthorized use of Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee).’s (without limitation) patents, trademarks, service marks, logos, slogans, screen shots, graphics, graphic styles, designs, blog posts, copyrighted materials or any branded features ("Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) Proprietary Property") without the prior written permission of Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) is strictly prohibited. If you infringe upon Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee).’s rights with respect to any Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) Proprietary Property, you will be ordered to cease such illegal activity and you may be liable to Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee) for any and all damages (including recovery of legal fees and expenses) which may be suffered and/or incurred as a result of your infringement.
If you are a legitimate copyright owner who believes that your rights have been infringed upon in any way through the content or services provided on this website, please notify us at:   Bo and Tee Ltd (T/A Bo and Tee), Unit 3, Power Station, Thermal Road, Bromborough, CH62 4YD.
Email:
hello@boandtee.com
We reserve the right to make changes, without prior notice, to any products or services mentioned on this site at any time.
Summary
1)
This cookie policy
explains what cookies are and how Bo and Tee Ltd ("we," “us” or “our”) uses them on www.boandtee.com (our “site”). We encourage you to read the policy in full so that you can understand what information we collect using cookies and how that information is used. By using our site you are agreeing that we can use cookies in accordance with this Cookie Policy.
2)
What are cookies?
A cookie is a text file stored in your browser and only the server that the web site is hosted on will be able to see the contents of that cookie. Cookie files contain some anonymous information, the site name and some text. This helps websites know if the browsing device has visited them before.
3)
What are cookies used for?
Cookies do lots of different jobs, like helping us improve your user experience. These cookies last either for the duration of your visit or for repeat visits and allow functions on a site to work in a more flexible, user-friendly way. Cookies make the interaction between you and the website faster and easier.
4)
Turning off cookies
You can change the settings in your browser to block cookies. Blocking cookies differs from browser to browser, however you can usually enable it in the 'settings' or 'internet options' section of your browser. Cookies can be deleted using your web browser. However, unless they are disallowed they will be reapplied the next time you visit a website, this is something common on all sites. If you want to disable cookies you’d need to change your website browser settings to reject cookies, however this may impact your shopping experience. How you can do this will depend on the browser you use.
Types of cookies used by us
What types of cookies are used by boandtee.com?
The types of cookies used on our site can generally be put into one of the following categories: strictly necessary; analytics; and advertising. You can find out more about each of the cookie categories below.
Strictly Necessary Cookies
These cookies are essential to make our website work. They enable you to move around the site and use its features. Without these cookies, services that are necessary for you to be able to use our site such as accessing secure areas cannot be provided.
Analytics Cookies
These cookies collect information about how people are using our website, for example which pages are visited the most often, how people are moving from one link to another and if they get error messages from certain pages. These cookies don't gather information that identifies you. All information these cookies collect is grouped together with information from other people’s use of our site on an anonymous basis. Overall, these cookies provide us with analytical information about how our site is performing and how we can improve it.
Advertising Cookies
These cookies are used to deliver advertisements that are more relevant to you and your interests. They are also used to limit the number of times you see an advertisement as well as help measure the effectiveness of the advertising campaign. They remember that you have visited a website and this information may be shared with other organisations such as advertising partners. This means after you have been to our site you may see some advertisements about our services elsewhere on the Internet.
COOKIE TABLE
Cookies used by
Boandtee.com
: Strictly Necessary Cookies
Cookie name
First or third party cookie
Cookie Type
Cookie Persistence
Cookie purpose
_cfduid
Third party
HTTP
1 Year
Used by the content network, Cloudflare, to identify reliable web traffic
fronted
First party
HTTP
1 day
Not classified
frontend_cid
First party
HTTP
1 day
Not classified
JSESSIONID
Third party
HTTP
Session
Preserve user status on the different pages of the site
rmuid
Third party
HTTP
1 year
Targeting cookies used by Rakuten Advertising Affiliate Network. Rakuten Advertising Privacy Policy
here
.
Cookie name
First or third party cookie
Cookie Type
Cookie Persistence
Cookie purpose
__distillery
First party
HTTP
1 Year
This cookie is used in a contextualized manner with a video player and allows the cookie, when the visitor interrupts the viewing of a video content, to remember where to start the video when the visitor uploads the video again.
__kla_id
First party
HTTP
2 Year
This cookie is used to gather information on visitor behavior. This information is saved for internal use on the site; statistical analyzes are used to optimize sites or for record if the visitor has subscribed to a newsletter.
_ga
Third party
HTTP
2 Year
Register a unique ID used to generate statistical data on how the visited reuses the website.
_landing_page
_orig_referrer
tracked_start_checkout
_secure_session_id
csrf
checkout_token
checkout
cart
cart_ts
_abv
storefront_digest
_ab
oauth-loop-detector-650f1a14fa979ec5c74d063e968411d4per-user
_y
_shopify_y
_s
_shopify_s
_shopify_fs
_shopify_sa_t
_shopify_sa_p
cart_currency
cart_sig
secure_customer_sig
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.klarna.com/international/privacy-policy/:
Discover Klarna
For Business
Privacy policy
Select your country of residence from the list below to read the appropriate policy.
Klarna
Australia
Austria
Belgium (
fr
/
nl
)
Canada (
en
/
fr
)
Czech Republic
Denmark
Finland (
fi
/
se
)
France
Germany
Greece
Hungary
Ireland
Italy
Mexico
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Poland
Portugal
Romania
Slovakia
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland (
de
/
fr
/
it
/
en
)
United Kingdom
United States (
en
/
es
)
Luxembourg
Bulgaria
Slovenia
PriceRunner
Denmark
Sweden
United Kingdom
Sub-policy 1
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/:
Select your cookie preferences
We use essential cookies and similar tools that are necessary to provide our site and services. We use performance cookies to collect anonymous statistics, so we can understand how customers use our site and make improvements. Essential cookies cannot be deactivated, but you can choose “Customize” or “Decline” to decline performance cookies.
If you agree, AWS and approved third parties will also use cookies to provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content, including relevant advertising. To accept or decline all non-essential cookies, choose “Accept” or “Decline.” To make more detailed choices, choose “Customize.”
Accept
Decline
Customize
We use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") for the following purposes.
Essential
Essential cookies are necessary to provide our site and services and cannot be deactivated. They are usually set in response to your actions on the site, such as setting your privacy preferences, signing in, or filling in forms.
Performance
Performance cookies provide anonymous statistics about how customers navigate our site so we can improve site experience and performance. Approved third parties may perform analytics on our behalf, but they cannot use the data for their own purposes.
Allow performance category
Allowed
Functional
Functional cookies help us provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content. Approved third parties may set these cookies to provide certain site features. If you do not allow these cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Allow functional category
Allowed
Advertising
Advertising cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners and help us deliver relevant marketing content. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less relevant advertising.
Allow advertising category
Allowed
Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of our sites. You may review and change your choices at any time by selecting Cookie preferences in the footer of this site. We and selected third-parties use cookies or similar technologies as specified in the
AWS Cookie Notice
.
We display ads relevant to your interests on AWS sites and on other properties, including cross-context behavioral advertising. Cross-context behavioral advertising uses data from one site or app to advertise to you on a different company’s site or app.
To not allow AWS cross-context behavioral advertising based on cookies or similar technologies, select “Don't allow” and “Save privacy choices” below, or visit an AWS site with a legally-recognized decline signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control. If you delete your cookies or visit this site from a different browser or device, you will need to make your selection again. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
AWS Cookie Notice
.
Cross-context behavioral ads
Allow
Don't allow
To not allow all other AWS cross-context behavioral advertising,
complete this form by email
.
For more information about how AWS handles your information, please read the
AWS Privacy Notice
.
We will only store essential cookies at this time, because we were unable to save your cookie preferences.
If you want to change your cookie preferences, try again later using the link in the AWS console footer, or contact support if the problem persists.
Skip to main content
Privacy Notice
Last Updated: February 21, 2025
To see prior version, click
here
.
This Privacy Notice describes how we collect and use your personal information in relation to AWS websites, applications, products, services, events, and experiences that reference this Privacy Notice (together, “AWS Offerings”).
This Privacy Notice does not apply to the “content” processed, stored, or hosted by our customers using AWS Offerings in connection with an AWS account. See the agreement governing your access to your AWS account and the
AWS Data Privacy FAQ
for more information about how we handle content and how our customers can control their content through AWS Offerings. This Privacy Notice also does not apply to any products, services, websites, or content that are offered by third parties or have their own privacy notice.
Personal Information We Collect
How We Use Personal Information
Cookies
How We Share Personal Information
Location of Personal Information
How We Secure Information
Access and Choice
Children’s Personal Information
Third Party Sites and Services
Retention of Personal Information
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
Examples of Information Collected
Personal Information We Collect
We collect your personal information in the course of providing AWS Offerings to you.
Here are the types of information we gather:
Information You Give Us:
We collect any information you provide in relation to AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information you give us.
Automatic Information:
We automatically collect certain types of information when you interact with AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect automatically.
Information from Other Sources:
We might collect information about you from other sources, including service providers, partners, and publicly available sources. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect from other sources.
How We Use Personal Information
We use your personal information to operate, provide, and improve AWS Offerings. Our purposes for using personal information include:
Provide AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to provide and deliver AWS Offerings and process transactions related to AWS Offerings, including registrations, subscriptions, purchases, and payments.
Measure, Support, and Improve AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to measure use of, analyze performance of, fix errors in, provide support for, improve, and develop AWS Offerings.
Recommendations and Personalization:
We use your personal information to recommend AWS Offerings that might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalize your experience with AWS Offerings.
Comply with Legal Obligations:
In certain cases, we have a legal obligation to collect, use, or retain your personal information. For example, we collect bank account information from AWS Marketplace sellers for identity verification.
Communicate with You:
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to AWS Offerings via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat) and to respond to your requests.
Marketing:
We use your personal information to market and promote AWS Offerings.
Fraud and Abuse Prevention and Credit Risks:
We use your personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, AWS, and others. We may also use scoring methods to assess and manage credit risks.
Purposes for Which We Seek Your Consent:
We may also ask for your consent to use your personal information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you.
Cookies
To enable our systems to recognize your browser or device and to provide, market, and improve AWS Offerings, we and approved third parties use cookies and other identifiers. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
How We Share Personal Information
Information about our customers is an important part of our business and we are not in the business of selling our customers’ personal information to others. We share personal information only as described below and with Amazon.com, Inc. and the affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls that are either subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions Involving Third Parties:
We make available to you services, software, and content provided by third parties for use on or through AWS Offerings. You can tell when a third party is involved in your transactions, and we share information related to those transactions with that third party. For example, you can order services, software, and content from sellers using the AWS Marketplace and we provide those sellers information to facilitate your subscription, purchases, or support.
Third-Party Service Providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples include: delivering AWS hardware, sending communications, processing payments, assessing credit and compliance risks, analyzing data, providing marketing and sales assistance (including advertising and event management), conducting customer relationship management, and providing training. These third-party service providers have access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but may not use it for other purposes. Further, they must process that information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection law.
Business Transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or services. In such transactions, personal information generally is one of the transferred business assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy Notice (unless, of course, the individual consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely event that AWS or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your information will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Us and Others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce or apply our terms and other agreements, or protect the rights, property, or security of AWS, our customers, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud prevention and detection and credit risk reduction.
At Your Option:
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about you might be shared with third parties, and you will have an opportunity to choose not to share the information.
Location of Personal Information
Amazon Web Services, Inc. is located in the United States, and our affiliated companies are located throughout the world. Depending on the scope of your interactions with AWS Offerings, your personal information may be stored in or accessed from multiple countries, including the United States. Whenever we transfer personal information to other jurisdictions, we will ensure that the information is transferred in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection laws.
How We Secure Information
At AWS, security is our highest priority. We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We maintain a wide variety of compliance programs that validate our security controls. Click
here
to learn more about our compliance programs.
We protect the security of your information during transmission to or from AWS websites, applications, products, or services by using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards in connection with the collection, storage, and disclosure of personal information. Our security procedures mean that we may request proof of identity before we disclose personal information to you.
Access and Choice
You can view, update, and delete certain information about your account and your interactions with AWS Offerings. Click
here
for a list of examples of information that you can access. If you cannot access or update your information yourself, you can always contact us for assistance.
You have choices about the collection and use of your personal information. Many AWS Offerings include settings that provide you with options as to how your information is being used. You can choose not to provide certain information, but then you might not be able to take advantage of certain AWS Offerings.
Account Information:
If you want to add, update, or delete information related to your account, please go to the
AWS Management Console
. When you update or delete any information, we usually keep a copy of the prior version for our records.
Communications:
If you do not want to receive promotional messages from us, please unsubscribe or adjust your communication preferences in the
AWS Management Console
or the
AWS Email Preference Center
. If you do not want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification settings in the app or your device.
Cookies Preferences:
You can change your cookie preferences on AWS sites at any time by clicking Cookie Preferences in the footer of the AWS site. You can also manage cookies through your browser settings.
The "Help" feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to remove cookies from your device, how to prevent your browser or device from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether.
Sellers and Amazon Partners:
Sellers and Amazon Partner Network members can add, update, or delete information in the
AWS Marketplace
and
APN Partner Central
, respectively.
Children’s Personal Information
We don’t provide AWS Offerings for purchase by children. If you’re under 18, you may use AWS Offerings only with the involvement of a parent or guardian.
Third Party Sites and Services
AWS Offerings may embed content provided by others or include links to other websites and applications. These companies may collect information about you when you interact with their content or services. We are not responsible for the practices of these companies. Please consult their privacy policies to learn about their data practices.
Retention of Personal Information
We keep your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
If you have any concerns about privacy at AWS, please
contact us
with a thorough description, and we will try to resolve the issue for you.
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services, Inc., our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, ATTN: AWS Legal
Contact details for specific jurisdictions including the European Economic Area, the UK and Switzerland, can be found in “Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions” below.
If you interact with AWS Offerings on behalf of or through your organization, then your personal information may also be subject to your organization’s privacy practices, and you should direct privacy inquiries to your organization.
Our business changes constantly, and our Privacy Notice may also change. You should check our website frequently to see recent changes. You can see the date on which the latest version of this Privacy Notice was posted. Unless stated otherwise, our current Privacy Notice applies to all personal information we have about you and your account. We stand behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our policies and practices to make them less protective of personal information collected in the past without informing affected customers and giving them a choice.
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon Web Services, Inc. participates in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Click
here
to learn more.
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
We provide additional information about our controllers and data protection officers (as applicable), the privacy, collection, and use of personal information of prospective and current customers of AWS Offerings located in certain jurisdictions.
Brazil
Controller of Personal Information
. When Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda., A. Presidente Juscelino Kubitschek, 2.041, Torre E - 18th and 19th Floors, Vila Nova Conceicao, Sao Paulo, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering. The data protection officer for Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. can be contacted at aws-brazil-privacy@amazon.com.
Processing
. We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (ANPD) through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Transfers outside of Brazil
. When we transfer your personal information outside Brazil, we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
Canada
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements; and
lodge a complaint with us regarding our practices related to your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or by mail at 120 Bremner Blvd, 26th Floor, Toronto, Ontario, M5J 0A8, Canada, ATTN: AWS Canada Legal. Further, the Amazon Web Services Canada, Inc. Privacy Officer can be contacted at
aws-canada-privacy@amazon.com
or by mail at the address noted above.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Costa Rica
Your Rights
. With respect to data collected and processed by Amazon Web Services Costa Rica (“AWS Costa Rica”), you have the rights of access, rectification, erasure, restriction, or complaint. When you consent to AWS Costa Rica processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and AWS Costa Rica will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us at Zona Franca America, Edificio C7. 600 norte de Plaza Real Cariari, sobre la paralela a la Autopista General Cañas. San Francisco de Heredia, Costa Rica.
European Economic Area, UK, and Switzerland
Controller of Personal Information.
When Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 Avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxembourg, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is also the authorized representative of Amazon Web Services, Inc. in the EEA.
Processing.
We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Information We Retain After Your Account is Closed.
If you decide to terminate your agreement and close your AWS account, we will retain your content for a period of up to 90 days after account closure, during which you may still access part of the AWS Management Console in order to retrieve your billing documents and to contact customer support. During this period, you may also decide to reopen your AWS account. At the end of this period, we will delete any content remaining in your account.
After account closure, we may need to keep certain information for an additional period of time for legal and legitimate business purposes. For example, we may retain personal information such as your contact information (e.g., name, email address, physical address) and any invoices that AWS has sent to you (e.g., record of purchases, applicable discounts, and tax information) for tax and accounting purposes. If applicable, AWS may also retain records of communications with you, as well as relevant logs (e.g., a log of your account closure) for dispute resolution purposes. We further may keep records for preventing fraud and ensuring security, for example in case of misuse of our services or violation of our terms.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means.
Questions and Contacts.
If you wish to do any of these things or have a data-protection related question, and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
The data protection officer for Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL can be contacted at aws-EU-privacy@amazon.com.
You can also lodge a complaint with our principal supervisory authority, the
Commission Nationale pour la Protection des Données in Luxembourg
, or with a local authority.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Cookies.
Please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
Transfers outside of the EEA.
When we transfer your personal information outside the EEA we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
India
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services India Private Limited (formerly known as Amazon Internet Services Private Limited), our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services India Private Limited, Block E, 14th Floor, Unit Nos. 1401 to 1421, International Trade Tower, Nehru Place, New Delhi, Delhi 110019, India, ATTN: AWS India Legal.
Japan
Controller of Personal Information
Any personal information provided to or gathered by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN.
Any personal information collected by Amazon Web Services, Inc. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services, Inc.
Use of Personal Information
We jointly use your personal information for such purposes as described in this Privacy Notice with domestic and foreign affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls, including Amazon Web Services, Inc., Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, and other global entities that either are subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice. Jointly used personal information includes personal information described under “Personal Information We Collect” and “Example of Information Collected” above. Amazon Web Services, Inc. is the business operator primarily responsible for managing jointly used personal information.
We share personal information with third parties only to the extent described under “How We Share Personal Information” above and in accordance with the Act on Protection of Personal Information.
When we share your personal information with third parties outside of Japan, such as sellers of products on AWS Marketplace and sponsors of AWS events, we require the recipients to adopt personal information security measures to protect your personal information.
Please see
here
for information on the countries where third parties may be located, and the applicable data privacy laws and data protection systems in these countries.
Your Rights
You may have the right to request access to or delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law. If you wish to submit a data subject access request, please
contact us
(for AWS customers) or contact us at our mailing address, Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN, ATTN: AWS Japan Legal (for current or prospective customers of Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. and non-customers in Japan).
Malaysia
A Bahasa Malaysia translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Nigeria
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Nigeria Limited, located at 3-5 Sinari Daranijo Street, Off Ajose Adeogun, Victoria Island, Lagos, Nigeria (“AWS Nigeria”), AWS Nigeria is the data controller.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Nigeria customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
You can also file a complaint with Nigeria’s National Information Technology Development Agency through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Peru
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Peru S.R.L., located at Av. Jorge Basadre 349 San Isidro, Lima (“AWS Peru”), AWS Peru is the data controller and the personal data bank holder of the following data banks: customers, prospective customers, and vendors.
Personal Information.
Depending on how you engage with AWS Peru, we may process one or more of the following kinds of personal information: name, identity card number, Tax ID, contact information (such as address, telephone, email address), profession, banking and credit card details, and physical or electronic signature. For more information about the personal information that we collect, click
here
.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
exercise any other rights afforded by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Peru customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint before the Peruvian National Data Protection Authority through its official channels.
Data Processors and Transfers to Third Parties.
We may share your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice and as permitted by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations, including to Amazon Web Services Inc., located at 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, United States of America, for the purposes of providing services and engaging in marketing, business development, and sales efforts with respect to cloud services that Amazon Web Services, Inc. sells globally; and enabling the provision of data hosting, storage, and processing by Amazon Web Services, Inc. as AWS Peru’s data processor.
Philippines
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Philippines, Inc. (“AWS Philippines”), you may contact the Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) and Data Compliance Officer for Privacy (“COP”)
here
if you are an AWS Philippines customer. If you are not an AWS customer, you may contact the DPO and COP at 21st floor Arthaland Century Pacific Tower, 5th Avenue 1634 Bonifacio Global City, Taguig, Philippines.
South Africa
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services South Africa Proprietary Limited, located at 29 Gogosoa Street, Observatory, Cape Town, South Africa, 7925 (“AWS South Africa”), AWS South Africa is the responsible party.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
object, at any time to the processing of your personal information for purposes of direct marketing other than direct marketing by means of unsolicited electronic communications from AWS which is prohibited unless you give consent to receive such direct marketing;
object, at any time (at which point we will cease processing of your personal information), to the processing of your personal information if you feel the processing of that personal information is not necessary for protection of your legitimate interest/s; proper performance of a public law duty by a public body; or pursuance of the legitimate interests of AWS or of a third party to whom the information is supplied; and
to submit a complaint to the Information Regulator of South Africa regarding interference with the protection of your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS South Africa customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
The Information Regulator Contact Details. The Information Regulator of South Africa is located at: JD House, 27 Stiemens Street, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2001. P.O. Box 31533, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2017. You may direct general enquiries by email to:
enquiries@inforegulator.org.za
. You may direct complaints by email to:
POPIAComplaints@inforegulator.org.za
.
South Korea
AWS does not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 14 without the consent of the child's parent or guardian.
How We Share Personal Information
AWS may share personal information as described in this Privacy Notice, including with affiliates of Amazon Web Services, Inc.
AWS has contracts in place with the following third party service provider(s) (delegatees) to perform functions on behalf of AWS in Korea, and they may have access to your personal information as needed to perform their functions described below:
The details of delegation for event management can be found on the relevant event page.
AWS may share your personal information with the following third party service provider(s) outside of Korea as described below:
If you do not agree with the above-stated overseas transfers, please stop using AWS Services and close your AWS Account.
Deletion of Personal Information
AWS will delete your personal information (including after closure of your AWS account) as described in this Privacy Notice. When deleting personal information, AWS will take standard commercially reasonable measures to make the personal information practically irrecoverable or irreproducible. The specific manner of deletion will depend on the information being deleted, how the information was collected and stored, and your interactions with us. Electronic documents or files containing personal information will be deleted using a technical method that makes recovery or retrieval of such information practically impossible or renders the data no longer personally identifiable. Non-electronic documents or files containing personal information will be shredded, incinerated, or both.
Retention of Personal Information
AWS Korea keeps your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes as may be required by the Framework Act on National Taxes of Republic of Korea or other laws), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
If you have any privacy questions or requests please contact:
AWS Korea Privacy
Email: aws-korea-privacy@amazon.com
Korean translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Turkey
Controller of Personal Information.
When AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi is the provider of an AWS Offering, AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi, located at Esentepe Mahallesi Bahar Sk. Özdilek/River Plaza/Wyndham Grand Hotel Apt. No: 13/52 Şişli/İstanbul, Turkey, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
United States
These additional disclosures are required by certain state privacy laws to the extent they apply to your use of AWS Offerings, and serve as a Notice at Collection under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Categories of personal information collected
. The personal information that we may collect, or may have collected from consumers in the preceding twelve months, fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, alias, address, phone numbers, or IP address, your AWS account log-in information, or a government-issued identifier (such as a state-issued ID number, which may be required to verify your identity when completing certain AWS certification courses, or an ID you provide for identity verification, which in some cases may reflect citizenship or immigration status);
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information;
characteristics of protected classifications under California or US federal law, such as age, race, or gender or gender identity, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis;
commercial information, such as purchase activity;
internet or other electronic network activity information, including content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details;
information used to prevent and detect fraud or other unauthorized activity, including informing customers if such activity were to affect them;
biometric information, such as your voice or appearance, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of a speech or image recognition service;
geolocation data, which may in some cases constitute precise geolocation information, such as the location of your device or computer, for example if you enable location services to enhance your experience through event applications we offer;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, including when you communicate with us by phone or otherwise;
professional or employment-related information, for example data you may provide about your business;
inference data, such as information about your preferences; and
education information, such as information about enrollment status, fields of study, or degrees, honors, and awards received.
We collect this information from you, automatically through your interaction with the AWS Offerings, or from third parties. For more information about the personal information we collect, click
here
. We collect this information for the business and commercial purposes described in the “How We Use Personal Information” section above.
Categories of personal information disclosed for a business purpose
. The personal information that we may have disclosed about consumers for a business purpose in the preceding twelve months fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, address, or phone numbers, for example if we use a third-party carrier to deliver AWS hardware, or government identifier or certain types of ID you provide for identity verification, which may in some cases reflect your citizenship or immigration status, for example if we use a third-party service to verify your identity;
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information, for example if we use a third-party payment processor;
information that may reveal your age, gender or gender identity, race, or other protected classifications under California or US federal law, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis using a third-party service provider;
commercial information, such as the details of a product or service you purchased if a third-party service provider assists in providing that product or service to you;
internet or other electronic network activity information, such as if we use a third-party service provider to help us gather reports for analyzing the health of our devices and services;
information relating to our prevention and detection of unauthorized activity, such as attempted fraud;
biometric information, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of certain AWS services facilitated by a third-party service provider;
geolocation data, which may constitute precise geolocation data, for example if we enable transportation services from a third party in connection with an AWS event;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, for example if a third-party service provider reviews recordings of customer support phone calls for quality assurance purposes;
professional or employment-related information, for example if we provide information to a third-party service provider for verification or registration as part of the AWS Offerings;
education information, for example if we facilitate employment or internship recruitment activities for participants in the AWS Educate program; and
inference data, for example if we use a third-party service provider to store information about your preferences.
For more information about the personal information we may disclose for a business purpose, click
here
.
Your Data Rights
. You may have certain data rights under state privacy laws, including to request information about the collection of your personal information by us, to access your personal information in a portable format, and to correct or delete your personal information. If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, or you are an authorized agent under applicable state law, please contact us
here
or at the address under
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
above. Additionally, you may have the right to appeal the denial of any of these rights by submitting a form that will be provided to you if we deny a data request. Depending on your data choices, certain services may be limited or unavailable.
To ensure the security of your AWS account, we will generally ask you to verify your request using the contact information you have already provided. If you are an authorized agent making a request on behalf of a consumer pursuant to applicable state law, we may ask you to provide information verifying you have proper authority to make the request on behalf of the consumer or we may ask the consumer to verify their identity with us directly.
No sale or sharing of personal information
. We do not sell or share any personal information of consumers, as those terms are defined under the California Privacy Rights Act.
De-identified Data Disclosure.
AWS may use de-identified data in some instances. AWS either maintains such data without attempting to re-identify it or treats such data as personal data subject to applicable law.
California Privacy Rights Act Sensitive Personal Information Disclosure
. The categories of data that we collect and disclose for a business purpose include “sensitive personal information” as defined under the California Privacy Rights Act. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose not expressly permitted by the California Privacy Rights Act.
California Privacy Rights Act Retention Disclosure
. To enable your continued use of AWS Services, we keep your personal information for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this AWS Privacy Notice, as permitted or as may be required by law, or as otherwise communicated to you.
California Privacy Rights Act Non-Discrimination Statement
. We will not discriminate against any consumer for exercising their rights under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Colorado Privacy Act and Oregon Privacy Act Profiling Disclosure
. We do not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act or the Oregon Privacy Act.
Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us
You provide information to us when you:
search for, subscribe to, or purchase AWS Offerings;
create or administer your AWS account (and you might have more than one account if you have used more than one email address when using AWS Offerings);
configure your settings for, provide data access permissions for, or otherwise interact with AWS Offerings;
register for or attend an AWS event;
purchase or use content, products, or services from third-party providers through the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
offer your content, products, or services on or through AWS Offerings or the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
communicate with us by phone, email, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or other information request forms;
post on AWS websites or participate in community features; and
employ notification services.
Depending on your use of AWS Offerings, you might supply us with such information as:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
payment information, including credit card and bank account information;
information about your location;
information about your organization and your contacts, such as colleagues or people within your organization;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
content of feedback, testimonials, inquiries, support tickets, and any phone conversations, chat sessions and emails with or to us;
your image (still, video, and in some cases 3-D), voice, and other identifiers that are personal to you when you attend an AWS event or use certain AWS Offerings;
information regarding identity, including government-issued identification information;
corporate and financial information; and
VAT numbers and other tax identifiers.
Automatic Information
We collect information automatically when you:
visit, interact with, or use AWS Offerings (including when you use your computer or other device to interact with AWS Offerings);
download content from us;
open emails or click on links in emails from us; and
interact or communicate with us (such as when you attend an AWS event or when you request customer support).
Examples of the information we automatically collect include:
network and connection information, such as the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer or other device to the Internet and information about your Internet service provider;
computer and device information, such as device, application, or browser type and version, browser plug-in type and version, operating system, or time zone setting;
the location of your device or computer;
authentication and security credential information;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details, including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads;
AWS Offerings metrics, such as offering usage, occurrences of technical errors, diagnostic reports, your settings preferences, backup information, API calls, and other logs;
the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL) clickstream to, through, and from our website (including date and time) and AWS Offerings, content you viewed or searched for, page response times, download errors, and page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs);
email addresses and phone numbers used to contact us; and
identifiers and information contained in cookies (see our
Cookie Notice
).
Information from Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
marketing, sales generation, and recruitment information, including your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
subscription, purchase, support, or other information about your interactions with products and services offered by us, our affiliates (such as AWS training courses), or third parties (such as products offered through the AWS Marketplace) in relation to AWS Offerings;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links); and
credit history information from credit bureaus.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through AWS Offerings include:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
your subscription, purchase, usage, billing, and payment history;
payment settings, such as payment instrument information and billing preferences;
tax information;
email communication and notification settings; and
if you participate in the AWS Marketplace or Amazon Partner Network (or other similar venues operated or provided by us), your account, your status, subscriptions, and other information.
Customers can access the information above through AWS Offerings, such as the
AWS Management Console
(including the
My Account
,
Billing Dashboard
,
Bills
,
Payment Methods
,
Payment History
,
Preferences
and
Tax Settings
pages), the
AWS Email Preference Center
,
AWS Marketplace
, and
APN Partner Central
.
AWS support for Internet Explorer ends on 07/31/2022. Supported browsers are Chrome, Firefox, Edge, and Safari.
Learn more »
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Sub-policy 2
https://www.zendesk.com/company/customers-partners/privacy-policy/:
Skip to main content
Agreements and Terms
Policies and Guidelines
Trademarks and Intellectual Property
Procurement and Suppliers
Data Protection and Privacy
Customer Agreements and User Terms for Products and Services
Main Services Agreement
Region-Specific Terms
Professional Services Terms
How We Protect Your Service Data (Enterprise Services)
How We Protect Your Service Data (Innovation Services)
Innovation Services List
Application Developer and API License Agreement
Marketplace Terms of Use
Assignments and Transfers
Reseller Subscription Services Agreement
Data Protection and Privacy
Zendesk Trust Center
Privacy Notice
Cookie Notice
Data Processing Agreement
CCPA Addendum PowerForm
LGPD Addendum Powerform
BAA Powerform
Government Data Request Policy
Policies
Data Deletion Policy
Promotional Credits Policy
Regional Data Hosting Policy
Sub-processor Policy
Zendesk User Content and Conduct Policy
Product Terms
Accessibility Policy
In-Product Cookies Policy
Service-Specific Terms
Free Trial and Beta Services Terms
Free Trials
Beta Services
Privacy Notice
Effective Date:
March 10, 2025
For the prior version of our Privacy Notice, click
here
.
For the prior version of our Zendesk Events Policy, click
here
.
Hello! Zendesk is a service-first CRM company that builds software designed to improve customer relationships. We’ve developed this Privacy Notice (“
Notice
”) to explain to you how we collect, use, disclose, and store personal data.
This Notice
only
applies when Zendesk is the Controller of personal data (example: Zendesk website visitors’ personal data and business-to-business contact data).
Zendesk is a
Processor
, not a Controller, of personal data that we process on behalf of our Subscribers when they use Zendesk products and Services. For clarity, this means that this Notice does
not
apply to where Zendesk processes personal data as a processor in its products and Services. If you have questions related to how a Zendesk Subscriber utilizes your personal data, please contact them directly. We are not responsible for the privacy or data security practices of our Subscribers. This Notice also does not apply to personal data about current and former Zendesk employees, job candidates, or contractors and agents acting in similar roles.
Table of Contents:
Introduction
Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
How We Process Personal Data
Sources of Personal Data
Cookies and Tracking Technologies
Security and Retention
Children’s Privacy
External Links
Contact Information
Supplemental Terms for California Residents
Supplemental Information for the EEA, Switzerland, and the U.K.
Supplemental Information for Other Regions
English Version Controls
Zendesk, Inc. Affiliates
1. Introduction
This Notice applies to Zendesk, Inc. and its relevant Affiliates listed in
Section 14
(“
Zendesk
,” “
us
,” “
we
,” or “
our”
). Capitalized terms that we use but are not defined in the Notice (such as Site, Services, Subscriber, Agent, Agent Contact Information, etc.) have the meaning provided in our
Main Services Agreement
. If you are located in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), Switzerland, or the United Kingdom (“
U.K.
”), please refer to
Section 11
of this Notice for more information about which specific entity or entities act as a controller of your personal data.
When Does This Notice Apply?
This Notice only applies to personal data that Zendesk handles as a Controller (meaning where Zendesk controls how and why your personal data is processed). This includes when you:
Visit or interact with the Zendesk.com Site, the Zendesk mobile applications, the Zendesk Marketplace, the Zendesk Developer Portal, our branded social media pages, and other Sites which we operate (collectively, our “
Digital Properties
”);
Register for or participate in our webinars, events, programs, marketing, and promotional activities;
Interact with us in person, such as when you visit our offices; and
Inquire about or engage in commercial transactions with us.
Changes
: We may update this Notice from time to time. Please check back periodically for updates. If you do not agree with any changes we make, you should stop interacting with us. When required under applicable law, we will notify you of any changes to this Notice by posting an update on our Site or in another appropriate manner.
2. Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
The below table describes what personal data we collect about you and to whom we disclose personal data. California individuals: This table includes the parties we disclose personal data to for a business or commercial purpose, as defined by California law.
Categories of Personal Data Collected
Disclosures of Personal Data
Identifiers
, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, and device identifiers (e.g., advertising identifiers and IP address).
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
With third parties that are necessary to complete a transaction, such as credit card processors
Business partners who we partner with to jointly market or sell our products and Services, such as channel partners
With third parties at your direction, such as event sponsors
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, accountants, and auditors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
To which you have consented to the disclosure
Commercial information
, including preferences, such as purchasing history or tendencies and transactional information, such as banking information.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
With third parties that are necessary to complete a transaction, such as credit card processors
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, accountants, and auditors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
To which you have consented to the disclosure
Internet or other electronic network activity information and device information
, such as your browsing history, search history, device information, and other information (whether passive browsing or active engagement) regarding your interactions with us and use of our products, Services, emails, and other Digital Properties.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Geolocation information
, such as approximate location based on your IP address, mobile device location, or information you provide to us (such as city and state you provide through a webform). You may be able to control collection of this data through the settings of your device.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors.
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
Audio, electronic, visual, and other sensory information
, such as CCTV recordings of our premises (e.g., if you visit our offices); recordings of your interactions with our sales or advocacy teams (e.g., for quality assurance or training purposes, in accordance with applicable laws); or customer support chat or messaging logs.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors.
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Inferences as defined by California law
, such as marketing you are likely to react positively to.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as platform vendors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Sensitive Personal Data
, such as proof of vaccination or race and ethnicity (optional) (where permissible under applicable law).
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as platform vendors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
To which you have consented to the disclosure
In addition to the above disclosures, we may share your personal data to respond to lawful requests by law enforcement or other government authorities, including to meet national security requirements, in accordance with our
Government Data Request Policy
. We may also de-identify, anonymize, or aggregate personal data to use or share with third parties for any purpose, where legally permitted.
3. How We Process Personal Data
We may process your personal data for the below purposes:
Purpose of Processing
Lawful Basis
To provide our products, Services, and Digital Properties to you
, including  processing and fulfilling transactions; enabling you to access the Digital Properties and our Services; operating, maintaining, and improving our Digital Properties and Services; communicating with you, such as by completing your support requests or providing security updates; and diagnosing, repairing, and tracking service and quality issues.
Legitimate interests; Contract; Legal obligations
For our own business purposes
, including maintaining internal business records and conducting internal reporting; collecting payments and performing accounting and similar business functions; auditing and managing projects related to our Services; performing IT security management and IT-related tasks, such as administration of our technologies and network; evaluating and improving our business, Services, and Digital Properties; and performing research and development of new products and services; and processing your survey and questionnaire responses.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations
For legal, safety, or security reasons
, including to comply with legal requirements; establish, exercise, or defend against legal claims; protect the safety, security, and integrity of our property and the rights of those who interact with us or others; investigate any content or conduct policy violations; and detect, prevent, and respond to security incidents or other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity.
These safety purposes may also involve collecting and processing special categories of personal data (i.e., health data), for office visits and events where necessary for public health or as required by applicable law.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations; Public interest
For marketing our products and Services or those of third parties, such as our business partners
, including to solicit or publish testimonials or feedback about our products and Services; send you marketing and promotional communications or product recommendations (via email, phone, or other online and offline channels) about our Services or those of third parties; facilitate your participation in a contest or event; assess ad impressions or engage in contextual ad customization.
You may opt out of marketing communications
here
or by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of our marketing communications. You may also manage your email preferences
here
. Note that some of our marketing materials and information may use tracking technologies and analytics tools to help us understand your preferences. For further information, please see
Section 5
below and our
Cookie Notice
.
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
To fulfill a referral request when you use our referral service to tell a friend about our Services
, including by using the name, email address, title, and company name that you provide us to contact the person you are referring.
You must only provide others’ personal data if you have their consent to do so.
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
Diversity, equity, and inclusion
, such as promoting diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives and representation within our business (where authorized by applicable law).
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
Corporate transactions
, such as sales, mergers, acquisitions, reorganizations, bankruptcy, and other corporate events.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations
When you have voluntarily agreed
to have your personal data processed.
Consent
Zendesk will honor data subject rights to the extent required by law. You may have the right to access, correct, update, and, in some cases, request deletion of your personal data (subject to exceptions). You may submit a request
here
.
Zendesk uses a limited number of third-party service providers to assist us in processing data for certain purposes. These third-party providers help support certain site features, perform database monitoring and other technical operations, assist with the transmission of data, and provide data storage services. These third parties may process or store personal data while providing their services. Zendesk maintains contracts with these third parties restricting their access, use and disclosure of personal data in compliance with our obligations under applicable laws and privacy certifications described more fully below.
4. Sources of Personal Data
Information you provide to us directly
, including when you register and communicate with us directly through our Digital Properties, visit our offices, or participate in our events, marketing, and outreach activities.
Information collected from your employer
, coworkers, or friends, including information about representatives or other employees of our current, past, and prospective customers, suppliers, investors, and business partners. We may also receive your information from a friend as part of a referral for our Services.
Information automatically collected
, including technical information about your interactions with our Digital Properties (such as IP address, browsing preferences, and purchase history). More information is available in
Section 5
below and in our
Cookie Notice
.
Information from public sources
, including information from public records and information you share in public forums, such as social media.
Information from other third parties
, including information from third-party service and content providers, entities with whom we partner to sell or promote products and services, and social media networks (including widgets related to such networks, such as the “Facebook Like” button).
We may combine information that we receive from the various sources described in this Notice, including third-party sources and public sources, and use or disclose it for the purposes identified above.
5. Cookies and Tracking Technologies
We use cookies and other tracking technologies and offer you the option to manage these settings as described in our
Cookie Notice
. Some tracking technologies enable us to track your device activity over time and across devices and websites. While some browsers have incorporated Do Not Track or DNT preferences, we do not honor such signals from web browsers at this time.
6. Security and Retention
We maintain appropriate security procedures and technical and organizational measures to protect your personal data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, disclosure, alteration, or use.
Your personal data will be generally retained as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we collected the personal data. Once you and/or your company have terminated the contractual relationship with us or otherwise ended your relationship with us, we may retain your personal data in our systems and records to ensure adequate fulfillment of surviving provisions in terminated contracts or for other legitimate business purposes, such as to evidence our business practices and contractual obligations, to provide you with information about our products and services, or to comply with applicable legal, tax, or accounting requirements. When we have no ongoing legitimate business need nor lawful legal ground to process your personal data, we will delete, anonymize, or aggregate it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal data has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal data and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible. If you want to know more about retention periods applicable to your particular circumstance, please contact us using the details provided in
Section 9
below.
7. Children’s Privacy
Our Sites and Services are not directed to children under the age of 16, and we do not knowingly collect online personal data directly from children. If you are a parent or guardian of a minor child and believe that the child has disclosed online personal data to us, please contact us using the details provided in
Section 9
below.
8. External Links
When interacting with us, you may encounter links to external sites or other online services, including those embedded in third-party advertisements. We do not control and are not responsible for privacy and data collection policies for such third-party sites and services. You should consult such third parties and their respective privacy notices for more information or if you have any questions about their practices.
9. Contact Information
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Notice or about the Zendesk Group’s privacy practices, please contact us by email at
euprivacy@zendesk.com
or
privacy@zendesk.com
, or at:
Zendesk, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Team
181 Fremont Stree
San Francisco, CA 94105, United States
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF,  we commit to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF,  the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
here
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe are provided at no cost to you.
10. Supplemental Terms for California Residents
Pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”), this Section 10 applies to certain personal data collected about California individuals where Zendesk controls how and why the personal data is processed (which the CCPA calls a “business”) and supplements the rest of our Notice above. This Section 10 does not apply to current or former employees, applicants, contractors, or agents.
a. Additional Data Processing Disclosures:
The below table provides the categories of personal data we have sold, shared, or disclosed to third parties, as defined by the California Privacy Rights Act. For reference, the table in
Section 2
provides the categories of personal data collected and our disclosures of personal data.
Categories of Personal Data We Collect
California Privacy Rights Act Details: Categories of Third Parties to Whom Personal Data is “Sold or Shared”
Identifiers
, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, and device identifiers (e.g., advertising identifiers and IP address).
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Business partners who we partner with to jointly market or sell our products and Services, such as channel partners.
Commercial information
, including preferences, such as purchasing history or tendencies and transactional information, such as banking information.
Not applicable
Internet or other electronic network activity information and device information
, such as your browsing history, search history, device information, and other information (whether passive browsing or active engagement) regarding your interactions with us and use of our products, Services, emails, and other Digital Properties.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Geolocation information
, such as approximate location based on your IP address, mobile device location, or information you provide to us (such as city and state you provide through a webform). You may be able to control collection of this data through the settings of your device.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Audio, electronic, visual, and other sensory information
, such as CCTV recordings of our premises (e.g., if you visit our offices); recordings of your interactions with our sales or advocacy teams (e.g., for quality assurance or training purposes, in accordance with applicable laws); or customer support chat or messaging logs.
Not applicable
Inferences as defined by California law
, such as marketing you are likely to positively react to.
Not applicable
Sensitive Personal Data
, such as proof of vaccination or race and ethnicity (optional) (where permissible under applicable law).
Not applicable
Although we have not “sold” or “shared” personal data for money in the past 12 months, we engage in routine practices with our Digital Properties involving third parties that could be considered a “sale” or “sharing” as defined under California law. We do not knowingly sell or share any personal data of minors under the age of 16. We do not collect or process “sensitive personal information,” as defined by California law, to infer characteristics about you. Zendesk only uses sensitive personal information consistent with the exceptions to the right to limit sensitive personal information.
Financial Incentives
: We may offer a benefit or offering in exchange for you providing personal data, such as a discount or coupon to individuals who respond to a survey. As part of these surveys we may collect personal data, such as your name, contact information, preferences, experiences, beliefs, opinions, and other responses to the survey questions. Participation in surveys is governed by the applicable terms and conditions for the survey, which will describe any financial incentives associated with that survey and how to participate. The value of your data is the value of the offer presented to you. We have calculated such value by using the expense related to the benefit. You may withdraw from any financial incentive at any time by emailing us at
privacy@zendesk.com
. If we offer another type of financial incentive, we will share with you the material terms of each offer when we ask you to participate.
b. Your Data Protection Rights:
Subject to legal limitations, certain California residents may have the below rights.
Right to Know.
You have the right to request information about the categories of personal data we have collected about you, the categories of sources from which we collected the personal data, the purposes for collecting the personal data, the categories of third parties to whom we have disclosed your personal data, and the purpose for which we disclosed your personal data (“
Categories Report
”). You may also request information about the specific pieces of personal data we have collected about you (“
Specific Pieces Report
”).
Right to Delete.
You have the right to request that we delete personal data that we have collected from you.
Right to Correct.
You have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal data that we maintain about you.
Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing.
We do not sell personal data to third parties in exchange for money. However, as we explain in
Section 5
, we share information with advertising partners and allow advertising partners to collect information from our Digital Properties. This exchange may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” under California law, and you have the right to opt out of this “sale” or “sharing” of personal data.
California residents may request to exercise the Right to Know, the Right to Delete, and the Right to Correct by using our
webform
. We will not discriminate against you, in any manner prohibited by applicable law, for exercising these rights.
How to Fully Exercise the Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing:
In order to fully exercise the Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing with respect to any “sale” or “sharing” of information, you must undertake both of the following steps:
Submit a Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing request using our
webform
; and
Disable the use of advertising cookies and other tracking technologies by clicking the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link in our website footer. You must complete this step on each of our Sites from each browser and on each device that you use. These steps are necessary so that we can place a first-party cookie signaling that you have opted out on each browser and each device you use.
If you block cookies, we will be unable to comply with your Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing request for device data that we automatically collect and disclose to third parties online using cookies, pixels, and other tracking technologies. If you clear the cookies in your browser, you will need to follow Step 2 above again. To the extent required by California law, we will honor “Do Not Sell or Share” opt-out preference signals sent in a format commonly-used and recognized by businesses at the browser level, such as an HTTP header field or JavaScript object.
Verification:
To process California data protection requests, we will need to obtain information to locate you in our records or verify your identity, depending on the nature of the request. In most cases, we will request information about you, which may include your name, email address, or other information. If you submit a Right to Know “Specific Pieces Report,” we may also request a signed declaration, under penalty of perjury, that you are who you say you are. We may request alternative information under certain circumstances and/or use third parties to help verify your identity.
Authorized Agents:
Authorized agents may exercise California data protection rights on behalf of California individuals, but we reserve the right to verify the individual’s identity directly as described above. Authorized agents must contact us by submitting a request through our
webform
and indicate that they are submitting the request as an agent. We may require the agent to demonstrate authority to act on your behalf by providing signed permission from you. We may also require you to verify your own identity directly with us or to directly confirm with us that you provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Timing:
We will process Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing requests within fifteen business days from the date we received the request. We will respond to Requests to Delete and Requests to Know within forty-five days unless we need more time, in which case we will notify you, and it may take up to ninety days to respond to your request.
11. Supplemental Information for the EEA, Switzerland, and the U.K.
The following terms supplement the Notice with respect to our processing of EEA (i.e., European Union Member States, Iceland, Liechtenstein, and Norway), Swiss, and U.K. personal data. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between the other parts of the Notice and the terms of this Section 11, Section 11 shall govern and prevail with regard to the processing of EEA, Swiss, and U.K. Personal Data, to the extent applicable.
Data Controller:
The Zendesk entity with which you have a primary relationship (such as the entity that concluded the Services contract with you; the entity that has provided you with marketing materials and promotional communications; or the primary entity in the region where you access our Site) is the controller within the scope of this Notice. In the majority of cases, this will be Zendesk, Inc., unless we specifically inform you otherwise.
a. Legal Basis for Processing:
Please see
Section 3
for the legal basis on which we rely for the collection, processing, and use of personal data.
b. Your Data Protection Rights:
Under applicable data protection laws, you may exercise certain rights regarding your personal data:
Right to Access.
You have the right to obtain confirmation from us whether we are processing your personal data and related information, as well as the right to obtain a copy of your personal data undergoing processing.
Right to Data Portability.
You may receive your personal data, that you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly-used, and machine-readable format, and you may have the right to transmit it to other data controllers without hindrance. This right only exists if the processing is based on your consent or a contract, and the processing is carried out by automated means.
Right to Rectification.
You have the right to request the rectification of inaccurate personal data and to have incomplete data completed.
Right to Objection.
You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Restrict Processing.
You may request that we restrict the processing of your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Erasure.
You may request that we erase your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Lodge a Complaint.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we commit to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of  the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF,  the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Right to Refuse or Withdraw Consent.
In case we ask for your consent to process your personal data, you are free to refuse to give it. If you have given your consent, you may withdraw it at any time without any adverse consequences. The lawfulness of any processing of your personal data that occurred prior to the withdrawal of your consent will not be affected.
Right to Not Be Subject to Automated Decision-making.
The types of automated decision-making referred to in Article 22(1) and (4) EU/UK General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) do not take place in connection with your personal data. Should this change, we will inform you about why and how any such decision was made, the significance of it, and the possible consequences of it. You will also have the right to human intervention, to express your point of view, and to contest the decision.
You may exercise these rights by contacting us using the details provided in
Section 9
above. Please note that we may refuse to act on requests to exercise data protection rights in certain cases, such as where providing access might infringe someone else’s privacy rights or impact our legal obligations.
c. International Transfers of Personal Data:
Due to the global nature of our operations, some of the recipients mentioned in
Section 2
of the Notice may be located in countries outside the EEA, Switzerland, or the U.K., which do not provide an adequate level of data protection as defined by data protection laws in the EEA, Switzerland, and the U.K. Transfers within the Zendesk Group or to third parties located in such third countries take place using a valid data transfer mechanism, such as the EU Standard Contractual Clauses and/or the U.K. Addendum to such clauses, approved Binding Corporate Rules, approved codes of conduct and certifications mechanisms, on the basis of permissible statutory derogations, or any other valid data transfer mechanism issued or approved by the EEA, Swiss, or U.K. authorities. More information on (including a copy of) our Binding Corporate Rules is available
here
, and evidence of our Binding Corporate Rules approval is available on the European Data Protection Board’s website
here
. Certain third countries have been officially recognized by the EEA, Swiss, and U.K. authorities as providing an adequate level of protection and no further safeguards are necessary. Please reach out to us using the contact information in
Section 9
above, if you wish to receive further information about how we transfer personal data or, where available, a copy of the relevant data transfer mechanism.
Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce (collectively, the “Principles”).  Zendesk, Inc. FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc.  have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Zendesk, Inc. FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  For complaints regarding EU-U.S. DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf
. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In the context of onward transfers, Zendesk is accountable for the processing of personal data it receives under the Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. Zendesk remains liable under the Principles if Zendesk’s agent processes personal data in a manner inconsistent with the Principles, unless Zendesk proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to damage.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
Data Protection Officer:
The contact details for our data protection officer are as follows: Zendesk, Inc., Attn: Privacy Team and DPO, 181 Fremont Street, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States,
euprivacy@zendesk.com
or
privacy@zendesk.com
.
12. Supplemental Information for Other Regions
Australia:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Commonwealth) and the Australia Privacy Principles. If you are dissatisfied with our handling of a complaint or do not agree with the resolution proposed by us, you may make a complaint to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (“
OAIC
”) by contacting the OAIC using the methods listed on
their website
. Alternatively, you may request that we pass on the details of your complaint to the OAIC directly.
Brazil:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“
LGPD
”). Those individuals who use or access our Sites or Services expressly consent to the collection, use, storage, and processing of their personal data by us for the purposes described in this Notice.
Canada:
Personal data, as defined in the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“
PIPEDA
”) will be collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under PIPEDA.
Japan:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with Japan’s Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“
APPI
”).
Nevada:
We do not presently sell personal data as defined under Nevada law. If you are a Nevada resident, you may nevertheless email us using the information above to exercise your right to opt-out of sale under Nevada Revised Statutes §603A et seq.
New Zealand:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with New Zealand’s Privacy Act 2020 and its 13 Information Privacy Principles (“
NZ IPPs
”).
Singapore:
Personal data collected, stored, used and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“
PDPA
”).
United Kingdom:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Privacy Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under the UK Data Protection Act 2018, as amended by the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc.) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019, as amended, superseded or replaced (“
U.K. GDPR
”).
13. English Version Controls
Non-English translations of this notice are provided for convenience only. In the event of any ambiguity or conflict between translations, the English version is authoritative and controls.
14. Zendesk, Inc. Affiliates
Zendesk, Inc.; Zendesk Brasil Software Corporativo Ltda; Zendesk UK Limited; Zendesk International Limited; Zendesk APS; Zendesk Pty., Ltd; Kabushiki Kaisha Zendesk; Zendesk Incorporated; Zendesk GmbH; Zendesk Singapore Pte. Ltd.; Zendesk France SAS; Base sp. z o. o. (Base spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością); Zendesk Technologies Private Limited; FutureSimple Inc.; Zendesk Korea LLC; Smooch Technologies ULC; Cleverly, Unipessoal, LDA.; ZD Sub Holdings (U.S.); Zendesk Sweden AB.; Smooch Technologies US Inc. (U.S.); Zendesk S. de R.L. de C.V. (Mexico); Zendesk Technologies Spain S.L. (Spain); Zoro TopCo, LP; Zendesk Netherlands B.V.; Zendesk Italy S.r.l.; Tymeshift Inc; Tymeshift doo Novi Sad; Tymeshift Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.zendesk.co.uk/company/customers-partners/privacy-policy/:
Skip to main content
Agreements and Terms
Policies and Guidelines
Trademarks and Intellectual Property
Procurement and Suppliers
Data Protection and Privacy
Customer Agreements and User Terms for Products and Services
Main Services Agreement
Region-Specific Terms
Professional Services Terms
How We Protect Your Service Data (Enterprise Services)
How We Protect Your Service Data (Innovation Services)
Innovation Services List
Application Developer and API Licence Agreement
Marketplace Terms of Use
Assignments and Transfers
Reseller Subscription Services Agreement
Data Protection and Privacy
Zendesk Trust Centre
Privacy Notice
Cookie Notice
Data Processing Agreement
CCPA Addendum PowerForm
LGPD Addendum Powerform
BAA Powerform
Government Data Request Policy
Policies
Data Deletion Policy
Promotional Credits Policy
Regional Data Hosting Policy
Sub-processor Policy
Zendesk User Content and Conduct Policy
Product Terms
Accessibility Policy
In-Product Cookies Policy
Service-Specific Terms
Free Trial and Beta Services Terms
Free Trials
Beta Services
Privacy Notice
Effective Date:
20 February 2024
For the prior version of our Privacy Notice, click
here
.
For the prior version of our Zendesk Events Policy, click
here
.
Hello! Zendesk is a service-first CRM company that builds software designed to improve customer relationships. We’ve developed this Privacy Notice (“
Notice
”) to explain to you how we collect, use, disclose, and store personal data.
This Notice
only
applies when Zendesk is the Controller of personal data (example: Zendesk website visitors’ personal data and business-to-business contact data).
Zendesk is a
Processor
, not a Controller, of personal data that we process on behalf of our Subscribers when they use Zendesk products and Services. For clarity, this means that this Notice does
not
apply to where Zendesk processes personal data as a processor in its products and Services. If you have questions related to how a Zendesk Subscriber utilises your personal data, please contact them directly. We are not responsible for the privacy or data security practices of our Subscribers. This Notice also does not apply to personal data about current and former Zendesk employees, job candidates, or contractors and agents acting in similar roles.
Table of Contents:
Introduction
Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
How We Process Personal Data
Sources of Personal Data
Cookies and Tracking Technologies
Security and Retention
Children’s Privacy
External Links
Contact Information
Supplemental Terms for California Residents
Supplemental Information for the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK
Supplemental Information for Other Regions
English Version Controls
Zendesk, Inc. Affiliates
1. Introduction
This Notice applies to Zendesk, Inc. and its relevant Affiliates listed in
Section 14
(“
Zendesk
”, “
us
”, “
we
”, or “
our”
). Capitalised terms that we use but are not defined in the Notice (such as Site, Services, Subscriber, Agent, Agent Contact Information, etc.) have the meaning provided in our
Master Subscription Agreement
. If you are located in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), Switzerland, or the United Kingdom (“
UK
”), please refer to
Section 11
of this Notice for more information about which specific entity or entities act as a controller of your personal data.
When Does This Notice Apply?
This Notice only applies to personal data that Zendesk handles as a Controller (meaning where Zendesk controls how and why your personal data is processed). This includes when you:
Visit or interact with the Zendesk.com Site, the Zendesk mobile applications, the Zendesk Marketplace, the Zendesk Developer Portal, our branded social media pages, and other Sites which we operate (collectively, our “
Digital Properties
”);
Register for or participate in our webinars, events, programmes, marketing and promotional activities;
Interact with us in person, such as when you visit our offices; and
Inquire about or engage in commercial transactions with us.
Changes
: We may update this Notice from time to time. Please check back periodically for updates. If you do not agree with any changes we make, you should stop interacting with us. When required under applicable law, we will notify you of any changes to this Notice by posting an update on our Site or in another appropriate manner.
2. Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
The below table describes what personal data we collect about you and to whom we disclose personal data. California individuals: This table includes the parties we disclose personal data to for a business or commercial purpose, as defined by California law.
Categories of Personal Data Collected
Disclosures of Personal Data
Identifiers
, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, and device identifiers (e.g. advertising identifiers and IP address).
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
With third parties that are necessary to complete a transaction, such as credit card processors
Business partners who we partner with to jointly market or sell our products and Services, such as channel partners
With third parties at your direction, such as event sponsors
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, accountants, and auditors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
To which you have consented to the disclosure
Commercial information
, including preferences, such as purchasing history or tendencies and transactional information, such as banking information.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
With third parties that are necessary to complete a transaction, such as credit card processors
Professional advisers, such as lawyers, accountants and auditors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
To which you have consented to the disclosure
Internet or other electronic network activity information and device information
, such as your browsing history, search history, device information, and other information (whether passive browsing or active engagement) regarding your interactions with us and use of our products, Services, emails, and other Digital Properties.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Geolocation information
, such as approximate location based on your IP address, mobile device location, or information you provide to us (such as city and state you provide through a webform). You may be able to control collection of this data through the settings of your device.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors.
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
Audio, electronic, visual, and other sensory information
, such as CCTV recordings of our premises (e.g. if you visit our offices); recordings of your interactions with our sales or advocacy teams (e.g. for quality assurance or training purposes, in accordance with applicable laws); or customer support chat or messaging logs.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors.
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Inferences as defined by California law
, such as marketing you are likely to react positively to.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as platform vendors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire or merge all or some of our assets
Sensitive Personal Data
, such as proof of vaccination or race and ethnicity (optional) (where permissible under applicable law).
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as platform vendors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire or merge all or some of our assets
To which you have consented to the disclosure
In addition to the above disclosures, we may share your personal data to respond to lawful requests by law enforcement or other government authorities in accordance with our
Government Data Request Policy
. We may also de-identify, anonymise, or aggregate personal data to use or share with third parties for any purpose, where legally permitted.
3. How We Process Personal Data
We may process your personal data for the below purposes:
Purpose of Processing
Lawful Basis
To provide our products, Services, and Digital Properties to you
, including processing and fulfilling transactions; enabling you to access the Digital Properties and our Services; operating, maintaining, and improving our Digital Properties and Services; communicating with you, such as by completing your support requests or providing security updates; and diagnosing, repairing, and tracking service and quality issues.
Legitimate interests; Contract; Legal obligations
For our own business purposes
, including maintaining internal business records and conducting internal reporting; collecting payments and performing accounting and similar business functions; auditing and managing projects related to our Services; performing IT security management and IT-related tasks, such as administration of our technologies and network; evaluating and improving our business, Services, and Digital Properties; and performing research and development of new products and services; and processing your survey and questionnaire responses.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations
For legal, safety, or security reasons
, including to comply with legal requirements; establish, exercise, or defend against legal claims; protect the safety, security, and integrity of our property and the rights of those who interact with us or others; investigate any content or conduct policy violations; and detect, prevent, and respond to security incidents or other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity.
These safety purposes may also involve collecting and processing special categories of personal data (i.e. health data), for office visits and events where necessary for public health or as required by applicable law.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations; Public interest
For marketing our products and Services or those of third parties, such as our business partners
, including to solicit or publish testimonials or feedback about our products and Services; send you marketing and promotional communications or product recommendations (via email, phone, or other online and offline channels) about our Services or those of third parties; facilitate your participation in a contest or event; assess ad impressions or engage in contextual ad customisation.
You may opt out of marketing communications
here
or by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of our marketing communications. You may also manage your email preferences
here
. Note that some of our marketing materials and information may use tracking technologies and analytics tools to help us understand your preferences. For further information, please see
Section 5
below and our
Cookie Notice
.
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
To fulfil a referral request when you use our referral service to tell a friend about our Services
, including by using the name, email address, title, and company name that you provide us to contact the person you are referring.
You must only provide others’ personal data if you have their consent to do so.
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
Diversity, equity, and inclusion
, such as promoting diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives and representation within our business (where authorised by applicable law).
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
Corporate transactions
, such as sales, mergers, acquisitions, reorganisations, bankruptcy, and other corporate events.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations
When you have voluntarily agreed
to have your personal data processed.
Consent
Zendesk will honour data subject rights to the extent required by law. You may have the right to access, correct, update, and, in some cases, request deletion of your personal data (subject to exceptions). You may submit a request
here
.
Zendesk uses a limited number of third-party service providers to assist us in processing data for certain purposes. These third-party providers help support certain site features, perform database monitoring and other technical operations, assist with the transmission of data, and provide data storage services. These third parties may process or store personal data while providing their services. Zendesk maintains contracts with these third parties restricting their access, use and disclosure of personal data in compliance with our obligations under the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. DPF, including the onward transfer provisions, and Zendesk remains liable if they fail to meet those obligations and we are responsible for the event giving rise to damage.
4. Sources of Personal Data
Information you provide to us directly
, including when you register and communicate with us directly through our Digital Properties, visit our offices, or participate in our events, marketing, and outreach activities.
Information collected from your employer
, colleagues, or friends, including information about representatives or other employees of our current, past, and prospective customers, suppliers, investors, and business partners. We may also receive your information from a friend as part of a referral for our Services.
Information automatically collected
, including technical information about your interactions with our Digital Properties (such as IP address, browsing preferences, and purchase history). More information is available in
Section 5
below and in our
Cookie Notice
.
Information from public sources
, including information from public records and information you share in public forums, such as social media.
Information from other third parties
, including information from third-party service and content providers, entities with whom we partner to sell or promote products and services, and social media networks (including widgets related to such networks, such as the “Facebook Like” button).
We may combine information that we receive from the various sources described in this Notice, including third-party sources and public sources, and use or disclose it for the purposes identified above.
5. Cookies and Tracking Technologies
We use cookies and other tracking technologies and offer you the option to manage these settings as described in our
Cookie Notice
. Some tracking technologies enable us to track your device activity over time and across devices and websites. While some browsers have incorporated Do Not Track or DNT preferences, we do not honour such signals from web browsers at this time.
6. Security and Retention
We maintain appropriate security procedures and technical and organisational measures to protect your personal data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, disclosure, alteration, or use.
Your personal data will be generally retained as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected the personal data. Once you and/or your company have terminated the contractual relationship with us or otherwise ended your relationship with us, we may retain your personal data in our systems and records to ensure adequate fulfilment of surviving provisions in terminated contracts or for other legitimate business purposes, such as to evidence our business practices and contractual obligations, to provide you with information about our products and services, or to comply with applicable legal, tax, or accounting requirements. When we have no ongoing legitimate business need nor lawful legal ground to process your personal data, we will delete, anonymise, or aggregate it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal data has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal data and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible. If you want to know more about retention periods applicable to your particular circumstance, please contact us using the details provided in
Section 9
below.
7. Children’s Privacy
Our Sites and Services are not directed to children under the age of 16, and we do not knowingly collect online personal data directly from children. If you are a parent or guardian of a minor child and believe that the child has disclosed online personal data to us, please contact us using the details provided in
Section 9
below.
8. External Links
When interacting with us, you may encounter links to external sites or other online services, including those embedded in third-party advertisements. We do not control and are not responsible for privacy and data collection policies for such third-party sites and services. You should consult such third parties and their respective privacy notices for more information or if you have any questions about their practices.
9. Contact Information
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Notice or about the Zendesk Group’s privacy practices, please contact us by email at
euprivacy@zendesk.com
or
privacy@zendesk.com
, or at:
Zendesk, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Team
989 Market Street
San Francisco, CA 94103, USA
In compliance with the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. DPF, we commit to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. DPF to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
here
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe are provided at no cost to you.
10. Supplemental Terms for California Residents
Pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”), this Section 10 applies to certain personal data collected about California individuals where Zendesk controls how and why the personal data is processed (which the CCPA calls a “business”) and supplements the rest of our Notice above. This Section 10 does not apply to current or former employees, applicants, contractors, or agents.
a. Additional Data Processing Disclosures:
The below table provides the categories of personal data we have sold, shared, or disclosed to third parties, as defined by the California Privacy Rights Act. For reference, the table in
Section 2
provides the categories of personal data collected and our disclosures of personal data.
Categories of Personal Data We Collect
California Privacy Rights Act Details: Categories of Third Parties to Whom Personal Data is “Sold or Shared”
Identifiers
, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, and device identifiers (e.g. advertising identifiers and IP address).
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Business partners who we partner with to jointly market or sell our products and Services, such as channel partners.
Commercial information
, including preferences, such as purchasing history or tendencies and transactional information, such as banking information.
Not applicable
Internet or other electronic network activity information and device information
, such as your browsing history, search history, device information, and other information (whether passive browsing or active engagement) regarding your interactions with us and use of our products, Services, emails, and other Digital Properties.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Geolocation information
, such as approximate location based on your IP address, mobile device location, or information you provide to us (such as city and state you provide through a webform). You may be able to control collection of this data through the settings of your device.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Audio, electronic, visual, and other sensory information
, such as CCTV recordings of our premises (e.g. if you visit our offices); recordings of your interactions with our sales or advocacy teams (e.g. for quality assurance or training purposes, in accordance with applicable laws); or customer support chat or messaging logs.
Not applicable
Inferences as defined by California law
, such as marketing you are likely to positively react to.
Not applicable
Sensitive Personal Data
, such as proof of vaccination or race and ethnicity (optional) (where permissible under applicable law).
Not applicable
Although we have not "sold" or “shared” personal data for money in the past 12 months, we engage in routine practices with our Digital Properties involving third parties that could be considered a "sale" or “sharing” as defined under California law. We do not knowingly sell or share any personal data of minors under the age of 16 We do not collect or process “sensitive personal information”, as defined by California law, to infer characteristics about you. Zendesk only uses sensitive personal information consistent with the exceptions to the right to limit sensitive personal information.
Financial Incentives
: We may offer a benefit or offering in exchange for you providing personal data, such as a discount or coupon to individuals who respond to a survey. As part of these surveys we may collect personal data, such as your name, contact information, preferences, experiences, beliefs, opinions, and other responses to the survey questions. Participation in surveys is governed by the applicable terms and conditions for the survey, which will describe any financial incentives associated with that survey and how to participate. The value of your data is the value of the offer presented to you. We have calculated such value by using the expense related to the benefit. You may withdraw from any financial incentive at any time by emailing us at
privacy@zendesk.com
. If we offer another type of financial incentive, we will share with you the material terms of each offer when we ask you to participate.
b. Your Data Protection Rights:
Subject to legal limitations, certain California residents may have the below rights.
Right to Know.
You have the right to request information about the categories of personal data we have collected about you, the categories of sources from which we collected the personal data, the purposes for collecting the personal data, the categories of third parties to whom we have disclosed your personal data, and the purpose for which we disclosed your personal data (“
Categories Report
”). You may also request information about the specific pieces of personal data we have collected about you (“
Specific Pieces Report
”).
Right to Delete.
You have the right to request that we delete personal data that we have collected from you.
Right to Correct.
You have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal data that we maintain about you.
Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing.
We do not sell personal data to third parties in exchange for money. However, as we explain in
Section 5
, we share information with advertising partners and allow advertising partners to collect information from our Digital Properties. This exchange may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” under California law, and you have the right to opt out of this “sale” or “sharing” of personal data.
California residents may request to exercise the Right to Know, the Right to Delete, and the Right to Correct by using our
webform
or by emailing us at
privacy@zendesk.com
. We will not discriminate against you, in any manner prohibited by applicable law, for exercising these rights.
How to Fully Exercise the Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing:
In order to fully exercise the Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing with respect to any "sale" or “sharing” of information, you must undertake both of the following steps:
Submit a Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing request using our
webform
; and
Disable the use of advertising cookies and other tracking technologies by clicking the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link in our website footer. You must complete this step on each of our Sites from each browser and on each device that you use. These steps are necessary so that we can place a first-party cookie signalling that you have opted out on each browser and each device you use.
If you block cookies, we will be unable to comply with your Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing request for device data that we automatically collect and disclose to third parties online using cookies, pixels, and other tracking technologies. If you clear the cookies in your browser, you will need to follow Step 2 above again. To the extent required by California law, we will honour “Do Not Sell or Share” opt-out preference signals sent in a format commonly-used and recognised by businesses at the browser level, such as an HTTP header field or JavaScript object.
Verification:
To process California data protection requests, we will need to obtain information to locate you in our records or verify your identity, depending on the nature of the request. In most cases, we will request information about you, which may include your name, email address, or other information. If you submit a Right to Know “Specific Pieces Report”, we may also request a signed declaration, under penalty of perjury, that you are who you say you are. We may request alternative information under certain circumstances and/or use third parties to help verify your identity.
Authorised Agents:
Authorised agents may exercise California data protection rights on behalf of California individuals, but we reserve the right to verify the individual’s identity directly as described above. Authorised agents must contact us by submitting a request through our
webform
and indicate that they are submitting the request as an agent. We may require the agent to demonstrate authority to act on your behalf by providing signed permission from you. We may also require you to verify your own identity directly with us or to directly confirm with us that you provided the authorised agent permission to submit the request.
Timing:
We will process Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing requests within fifteen business days from the date we received the request. We will respond to Requests to Delete and Requests to Know within forty-five days unless we need more time, in which case we will notify you, and it may take up to ninety days to respond to your request.
11. Supplemental Information for the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK.
The following terms supplement the Notice with respect to our processing of EEA (i.e. European Union Member States, Iceland, Liechtenstein, and Norway), Swiss, and UK personal data. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between the other parts of the Notice and the terms of this Section 11, Section 11 shall govern and prevail with regard to the processing of EEA, Swiss, and UK. Personal Data, to the extent applicable.
Data Controller:
The Zendesk entity with which you have a primary relationship (such as the entity that concluded the Services contract with you; the entity that has provided you with marketing materials and promotional communications; or the primary entity in the region where you access our Site) is the controller within the scope of this Notice. In the majority of cases, this will be Zendesk, Inc., unless we specifically inform you otherwise.
a. Legal Basis for Processing:
Please see
Section 3
for the legal basis on which we rely for the collection, processing, and use of personal data.
b. Your Data Protection Rights:
Under applicable data protection laws, you may exercise certain rights regarding your personal data:
Right to Access.
You have the right to obtain confirmation from us whether we are processing your personal data and related information, as well as the right to obtain a copy of your personal data undergoing processing.
Right to Data Portability.
You may receive your personal data, that you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly-used, and machine-readable format, and you may have the right to transmit it to other data controllers without hindrance. This right only exists if the processing is based on your consent or a contract, and the processing is carried out by automated means.
Right to Rectification.
You have the right to request the rectification of inaccurate personal data and to have incomplete data completed.
Right to Objection.
You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Restrict Processing.
You may request that we restrict the processing of your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Erasure.
You may request that we erase your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Lodge a Complaint.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In compliance with the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we commit to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. DPF.
Right to Refuse or Withdraw Consent.
In case we ask for your consent to process your personal data, you are free to refuse to give it. If you have given your consent, you may withdraw it at any time without any adverse consequences. The lawfulness of any processing of your personal data that occurred prior to the withdrawal of your consent will not be affected.
Right to Not Be Subject to Automated Decision-making.
The types of automated decision-making referred to in Article 22(1) and (4) EU/UK General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) do not take place in connection with your personal data. Should this change, we will inform you about why and how any such decision was made, the significance of it, and the possible consequences of it. You will also have the right to human intervention, to express your point of view, and to contest the decision.
You may exercise these rights by contacting us using the details provided in
Section 9
above. Please note that we may refuse to act on requests to exercise data protection rights in certain cases, such as where providing access might infringe someone else’s privacy rights or impact our legal obligations.
c. International Transfers of Personal Data:
Due to the global nature of our operations, some of the recipients mentioned in
Section 2
of the Notice may be located in countries outside the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, which do not provide an adequate level of data protection as defined by data protection laws in the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK. Transfers within the Zendesk Group or to third parties located in such third countries take place using a valid data transfer mechanism, such as the EU Standard Contractual Clauses and/or the UK. Addendum to such clauses, approved Binding Corporate Rules, approved codes of conduct and certifications mechanisms, on the basis of permissible statutory derogations, or any other valid data transfer mechanism issued or approved by the EEA, Swiss, or UK authorities. More information on (including a copy of) our Binding Corporate Rules is available
here
, and evidence of our Binding Corporate Rules approval is available on the European Data Protection Board’s website
here
. Certain third countries have been officially recognised by the EEA, Swiss, and UK authorities as providing an adequate level of protection and no further safeguards are necessary. Please reach out to us using the contact information in
Section 9
above, if you wish to receive further information about how we transfer personal data or, where available, a copy of the relevant data transfer mechanism.
Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. comply with the EU-US. Data Privacy Framework (EU-US. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-US. DPF) as set forth by the US. Department of Commerce. Zendesk, Inc.   FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. have certified to the US. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-US. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-US. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-US. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF. Zendesk, Inc.   FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. have certified to the US. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-US. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-US. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-US. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-US. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-US. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  For complaints regarding EU-US. DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf
. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) programme, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. compliance with the EU-US. Data Privacy Framework (EU-US. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-US. DPF).
Data Protection Officer:
The contact details for our data protection officer are as follows: Zendesk, Inc., Attn: Privacy Team and DPO, 989 Market Street, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA,
euprivacy@zendesk.com
.
12. Supplemental Information for Other Regions
Australia:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Commonwealth) and the Australia Privacy Principles. If you are dissatisfied with our handling of a complaint or do not agree with the resolution proposed by us, you may make a complaint to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (“
OAIC
”) by contacting the OAIC using the methods listed on
their website
. Alternatively, you may request that we pass on the details of your complaint to the OAIC directly.
Brazil:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“
LGPD
”). Those individuals who use or access our Sites or Services expressly consent to the collection, use, storage, and processing of their personal data by us for the purposes described in this Notice.
Canada:
Personal data, as defined in the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“
PIPEDA
”) will be collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under PIPEDA.
Japan:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with Japan’s Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“
APPI
”).
Nevada:
We do not presently sell personal data as defined under Nevada law. If you are a Nevada resident, you may nevertheless email us using the information above to exercise your right to opt-out of sale under Nevada Revised Statutes §603A et seq.
New Zealand:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with New Zealand’s Privacy Act 2020 and its 13 Information Privacy Principles (“
NZ IPPs
”).
Singapore:
Personal data collected, stored, used and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“
PDPA
”).
United Kingdom:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Privacy Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under the UK Data Protection Act 2018, as amended by the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments, etc.) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019, as amended, superseded or replaced (“
UK. GDPR
”).
13. English Version Controls
Non-English translations of this notice are provided for convenience only. In the event of any ambiguity or conflict between translations, the English version is authoritative and controls.
14. Zendesk, Inc. Affiliates
Zendesk, Inc.; Zendesk Brasil Software Corporativo Ltda; Zendesk UK Limited; Zendesk International Limited; Zendesk APS; Zendesk Pty., Ltd; Kabushiki Kaisha Zendesk; Zendesk Incorporated; Zendesk GmbH; Zendesk Singapore Pte. Ltd; Zendesk France SAS; Base sp. z o. o. (Base spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością); Zendesk Technologies Private Limited; FutureSimple Inc.; Zendesk Korea LLC; Smooch Technologies ULC; Cleverly, Unipessoal, LDA.; ZD Sub Holdings (USA); Goldcup 30290 AB (Sweden); Smooch Technologies US Inc. (USA); Zendesk S. de R.L. de C.V. (Mexico); Zendesk Technologies Spain S.L.U. (Spain); Zoro TopCo, LP; Zendesk Netherlands B.V.; Zendesk Italy S.r.l.; Tymeshift Inc; Tymeshift doo Novi Sad; Tymeshift Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
Sub-policy 4
https://www.klaviyo.com/privacy/policy:
___
Home
/
Legal
/
Privacy
/
Privacy notice
Klaviyo Privacy Notice
Updated December 31, 2024
Thank you for your interest in Klaviyo! This Privacy Notice explains how information about you, that directly identifies you, or that makes you identifiable (“
personal information
”) is collected, used, disclosed, and otherwise processed by Klaviyo in connection with our services.
When we use the terms “
Klaviyo
”, “
Klaviyo Group
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, or “
our
” in this Privacy Notice, we are referring to Klaviyo, Inc. and its affiliates. When we use the term “
Service
” or
“Services,”
we are referring to all of the services and product offerings that we offer as a controller, our website
https://www.klaviyo.com/
or any other Klaviyo Group product or service that posts or links to this Privacy Notice.
Klaviyo as a Data Controller
: For purposes of data protection laws, Klaviyo is the “data controller” (or similar term under applicable laws) and is generally responsible for and controls the processing of your personal information collected through your use of our Service. This Privacy Notice applies only to instances where Klaviyo acts as a data controller.
Klaviyo as a Data Processor
:
In providing our Service, our customers may collect data in our products and services, or we may collect data on their behalf, which may include personal information or data about our customers’ end users (“
Customer Data
”). In such instances, Klaviyo acts as a “data processor” (or similar term under applicable laws), and we have contractually committed ourselves to process Customer Data on behalf and under the instruction of the respective customer, who is the data controller. This Privacy Notice does not apply to the processing of Customer Data and we recommend you read the privacy notice of the respective customer if their processing concerns your personal information.
Table of Contents
How We Collect Your Personal Information
How We Use Your Personal Information
How We Share Personal Information
Online Advertising
Control Over Your Information
Privacy Rights
Children
Third Party Websites and Services
Changes to Privacy Notice
Contact Us
Region-Specific Disclosures
Additional Disclosures for Australia Residents
Additional Disclosures for California Residents (United States)
Additional Disclosures for Nevada Residents (United States)
Additional Disclosures for the European Economic Area, United Kingdom, and Switzerland
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles
EU, Swiss, and UK Representative
Back to top ⬆︎
1. HOW WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
When you interact with us, we are collecting personal information about you. Sometimes we collect personal information automatically when you interact with our Services and sometimes we collect the personal information directly from you. At times, we may collect personal information about you from third parties.
Personal Information You Provide
We may collect the following personal information you provide in connection with our Service:
Account Creation and Profile Information for a Klaviyo Account
. We may collect personal information that you provide when you register for an account (where available). This information includes your email and password, company name, company URL, office phone number and office address. You may also add or confirm your name, company industry, tax ID, billing address, time zone and source of contact/lead.
Contract Data
. If your company enters into a contractual relationship with us, we may collect your name, job title, email address, signature (if wet signed or a copy of their autograph is used), customer name and address, and information about how you heard about us.
Payment and Transaction Information
. If you sign up for one of our Services requiring payment, we collect the information provided in connection with such payment. Please note that we use third party payment processors to process payments made to us. As such, all such information is provided directly by you to our third-party processor. The payment processor’s use of your personal information is governed by their privacy notice. We will only receive the last 4 digits of the credit card number along with transaction-related information (i.e., payment date, amount, device type, IP address and card type). If custom billing is arranged, the account contact’s name, email, job title, company and address may be collected as well.
Communications
. When you contact us through any method of communications, including through one of our website “Contact Us”, “Chat” or “Support” functions or you request a demo of the Klaviyo platform, we may collect your name, email address, mailing address, phone number, company/company URL, account ID, type of inquiry, or any other personal information you choose to provide to us, such as how many contacts you have/your company has, which products interest you, what platform is currently being used, and meeting dates and times.
Newsletter, Marketing Emails, and Blog
.
If you sign up to receive news or alerts from us, or subscribe to our blog, we may collect your email and applicable interests and communication preferences.
Klaviyo Academy
. If you sign up for training sessions via the Klaviyo Academy, we ask for your user’s name, email, and password. You may add a profile picture. When using the platform, a user’s history on registrations, courses taken, scores, and product certifications, survey responses and lead status as well as unique identifier are captured.
Klaviyo Community
. If you wish to participate in the Klaviyo network with other account holders and find resources, insights and further support from other used, you may participate in the Klaviyo Community. In this case we may collect the following data: your account credentials, your Klaviyo account ID, email address and partner ID. Your account will also show classifications based on your involvement in the Community and badges based on your involvement/accomplishment (both of which can be managed in the profile settings to be visible or not visible to other users of the Community) as well as all content you share via the Community function. Moreover, you may add your name, username, job title, city, country, profile picture, social media (Instagram and Twitter), and bio/signature details that may be visible to the other users of the Community.
Klaviyo Partner
. If you apply to be a Klaviyo partner, we may collect personal information that you provide when you sign up (where available). This information includes your name, email, title, business phone number, company name, company URL and office address.
Events, Surveys, Feedback and Promotions (including Contests, Sweepstakes, Webinars, and Training Sessions)
. If you fill out any forms or otherwise provide your information to us in connection with Klaviyo events, surveys, or other promotional events (including contests, sweepstakes, webinars, and trainings), as well as when you provide feedback to us, we may collect your contact information (such as your name, email, and phone number), your organization company, your job title, the office address and any other information you provide to us.
Personal Information Automatically Collected
As is true of most digital platforms, we and our third-party providers and partners collect certain personal information automatically when you visit, interact with, or use our Service and emails. Such information is collected through the use of cookies and similar technologies such as pixels and Local Storage Objects (LSOs) like HTML5 (together “
cookies
”). This helps us to provide you with a good experience when you use our Services and also allows us to monitor and analyze how you use and interact with our Services so that we can continue to improve our Services. It also helps us and our partners to determine products and services that may be of interest to you.
Specifically, we may collect the following information:
Log Data
:  Including your internet protocol (IP) address, operating system, browser details such as type, ID, and configuration, unique identifiers, local and language settings; session logging, heatmaps and scrolls; screen resolution, ISP, device type and version, the referring URL, date/time of your visit, the time you spent on our services and any errors that may occur during your visit to our Services.
Analytics Data
:  Including the electronic path you take to our services, through our services and when exiting our services, UTM source, as well as your usage and activity on our services, such as the time zone, activity information (first and last active date and time), usage history (flows created, campaigns scheduled, emails opened, total log-ins) as well as the pages, links, objects, products and benefits you view, click or otherwise interact with. We may also analyze the interaction between you and your customer using our Services.
Digital Behavioral Data
: Web page interactions (clicks, hovers, focus, mouse movements, browsing, zooms and other interactions), referring web page/source through which you accessed the Sites, and statistics associated with the interaction between device or browser and the Sites.
Location Data
:  Including your general geographic location based on the IP address we collect.
Platform Data
: If you have an account to use the services we offer as a processor, we may in addition also collect your name, phone number, email address, company information, status in the sales cycle, lead and commercial details (like platform specifics, initial marketing channel), and user and account ID and other identifiers (such as Salesforce ID and Klaviyo ID), NPS/account sentiments, Klaviyo Academy user profile/history data, account health status, event attendance, status as lead/account, integrations.
For more information about these practices and your choices regarding cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Personal Information from Other Sources and Third Parties
We may also obtain personal information from third parties, which we may combine with personal information we collect either automatically or directly from an individual.
We may receive personal information from the following third parties:
Klaviyo Entities
: We may receive personal information from other companies and brands owned or controlled by Klaviyo Group, and other companies owned by or under common ownership as Klaviyo Group.
Klaviyo
Business and Marketing Partners
. We may also disclose personal information with other business and marketing partners with whom we jointly offer products or services, co-market or host events, or who are part of our partner ecosystem. The information we disclose may include your name, phone number, email address, company name and address, opportunity/interest details of your company, and information on whether your company is a current client of our partner.
Social
Media
: When an individual interacts with us through various social media networks, such as when someone “Likes” us on Facebook or follows us or shares our content on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram or other social networks through, for example, the social media buttons embedded into our website, we may receive some information about individuals that they permit the social network to share with third parties. The data we receive is dependent upon an individual’s privacy settings with the social network. Individuals should always review and, if necessary, adjust their privacy settings on third-party websites and social media networks and services before sharing information and/or linking or connecting them to other services.
Service
Providers
: Our service providers that perform services solely on our behalf, such as chat services, payout processing, and marketing providers, collect personal information and often share some or all of this information with us.
Back to top ⬆︎
2.  HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We may use the personal information we collect for the following purposes:
Fulfill our contractual obligations, to deliver the Services you have requested, including facilitating your messages to other users or groups and for account and contract management (including customer support);
Communicate with individuals, including via email, text message, social media and/or telephone and video calls;
Review our business performance;
Market and sell our Services to individuals, including through email, direct mail, phone, video call,  text message, or through other forms of communications platforms (i.e., WhatsApp);
Send gifts to you;
Administer, improve and personalize our Services, including by recognizing an individual and remembering their information when they return to our Services and analyzing our client-base;
Process payment for our Services;
Conduct market research;
Opportunity tracking, conversion and lead generation;
Test, enhance, update and monitor the Services, or diagnose or fix technology problems;
Help maintain the safety, security and integrity of our property and Services, technology assets and business;
Enforce our
Terms of Service
, resolve disputes, carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and protect our business interests and the interests and rights of third parties;
Prevent, investigate or provide notice of fraud or unlawful or criminal activity;
Process and deliver contest and sweepstakes entry and awards; and
Comply with legal obligations.
Back to top ⬆︎
3. HOW WE SHARE PERSONAL INFORMATION
We may also share, transmit, disclose, grant access to, make available, and provide personal information with and to third parties, as described below.
Service Providers
:
We share personal information with third party contractors and service providers, that are subject to reasonable confidentiality terms, and which may include processing payments, providing web hosting and maintenance services, technology support providers, email and messaging communications providers, analytics providers, data storage providers, and web and video hosting providers and developers. Any such service providers will be subject to confidentiality provisions, and be bound to only process the data on our behalf and under our instructions, unless such service providers act as their own controllers (e.g., in the case we seek advice from lawyers and tax consultants).
Klaviyo Group
:
We may share with other companies and brands owned or controlled by Klaviyo Group, and other companies owned by or under common ownership as Klaviyo Group. These companies will use your personal information in the same way as we can under this Privacy Notice.
Business and Marketing Partners
: We may also disclose personal information with other business and marketing partners with whom we jointly offer products or services, co-market or host events, or who are part of our partner ecosystem. We may obtain your consent where required by applicable law. Our business and marketing partners will use your information in accordance with their own privacy notices.
Advertising Partners
: We may share certain personal information (including information collected through cookies) with our advertising service providers and vendors in order to advertise our Services to you. For more information on how we collect and share this information, please see the
Online Advertising
section of this Privacy Notice.
Corporate Transaction
:
We may transfer any information we collect in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets (including any shares in the company) or any portion or combination of our products, services, businesses and/or assets. Should such a transaction occur (whether a divestiture, merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, reorganization, liquidation, change of control or similar transaction or proceeding), we will use reasonable efforts to ensure that any transferred information is treated in a manner consistent with this Privacy Notice.
Legal Obligations and Rights
:
We may disclose personal information to third parties, such as legal advisors and law enforcement agencies, regulators, other authorities and other third parties for legal reasons if we reasonably believe that such action is necessary:
in connection with the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims;
to comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process;
to protect our rights and property and the rights, personal safety and property of others, including to enforce our agreements and policies;
to detect, suppress, or prevent fraud; or
as otherwise required by applicable law.
The Public/Other Klaviyo Community users, when you post content on the Klaviyo Community portion of the website
:
Remember, our websites allow you to connect and interact with others. In that case, your personal data may be visible to others as set out above under “Klaviyo Community”.
With Your Consent
: We may disclose personal information about an individual to certain other third parties or publicly with their consent or direction. For example, with an individual’s consent or direction we may post their testimonial on our website or service-related publications.
Back to top ⬆︎
4. ONLINE ADVERTISING
We may share (or we may permit these parties to collect) personal information with online advertising networks, social media companies, and other third-party services, including information about your use of our Service over time, so that they may play or display ads that may be relevant to your interests on other websites or apps, or on other devices you may use.  Typically, though not always, the information we share is provided through cookies or similar tracking technologies, which recognize the device you are using and collect information, including hashed data, clickstream information, browser type, time and date you visited the website and other information.  This information is used to display targeted ads on other websites, apps, or services. We or the online advertising networks use this information to make the advertisements you see online more relevant to your interests. We may also display targeted advertising to you through social media platforms, such as LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, Google, and others. These companies have interest-based advertising programs that allow us to direct advertisements to users who have shown interest in our services while those users are on the social media platform, or to groups of other users who share similar traits, such as likely commercial interests and demographics. These advertisements are governed by the privacy policies of those social media companies that provide them. For more information on our online practices specifically in relation to cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Back to top ⬆︎
5. CONTROL OVER YOUR INFORMATION
Email Communications
. From time to time, we may send you emails regarding updates to our Services, products or services, notices about our organization, or information about products/services we offer that we think may be of interest to you. If you wish to unsubscribe from such emails, simply click the “unsubscribe link” provided at the bottom of the email communication. Note that you cannot unsubscribe from certain services-related communications (e.g., account verification, confirmations of transactions, technical or legal notices).
Messaging Platforms
. We may use personal information we collect to communicate with you via messaging platforms (such as WhatsApp), including to market to you or offer you information and updates on products or services we think you may be interested in. We may obtain your consent where required by applicable law. You can unsubscribe from these messages at any time by replying STOP in one of our messages.
SMS Text Messaging
. We may use personal information we collect to communicate with you via text message, including (with your consent) to market to you or offer you information and updates on products or services we think you may be interested in. You can unsubscribe from marketing text messages at any time by replying STOP or clicking the unsubscribe link (where available) in one of our messages. For more information, please see our
Terms of Service
.
Modifying Account Information
. If you have a Klaviyo service account with us, you have the ability to modify certain information in your account (e.g., your contact information and profile picture) through the “Contact Information” tab in the “Account” section in your Klaviyo account. Not all personal information is maintained in a format that you can access or change. If you would like to request access to, or correction or deletion of personal information, you may send your request to us by messaging support in the support portal through your Klaviyo account. We will review your request and may require you to provide additional information to identify yourself, but we do not promise that we will be able to satisfy your request.
Back to top ⬆︎
6. PRIVACY RIGHTS
In accordance with applicable privacy law and the jurisdiction in which you reside, you may be able to exercise some or all of the following rights in relation to the personal information about you that we have collected (subject to certain limitations at law):
Right of access and portability
. You may have the right to obtain access to the personal information we have collected about you and, where required by law, the right to obtain a copy of the personal information.
Right to correction
. You may have the right to require us to correct inaccuracies in your personal information, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of the personal information.
Right to deletion
. You may have the right to request the deletion of your personal information, subject to certain exceptions.
Right to opt-out
. You may have the right to opt-out of certain processing activities. For example, you may have the right to opt-out of the use of your personal information for targeted advertising purposes, or the “sale” of your personal information to third parties in certain contexts. You may also have the right to direct us not to use automated decision-making or profiling for certain purposes. Please note that depending on the nature and scope of your request, we may not be in a position to continue providing our services to you.
Right to exercise control over sensitive personal information
.
You may have the right to exercise control over our collection and processing of certain sensitive personal information.
Right to non-retaliation
. You may have the right to be free from retaliatory or discriminatory treatment for exercising any of the rights described above.
To exercise your rights
:
please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Before processing your request, we will need to verify your identity and confirm you are a resident of a jurisdiction that offers such right(s). In order to verify your identity, we will generally either require the successful authentication of your account, or the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems. This process may require us to request additional personal information from you. In certain circumstances, we may decline a request to exercise the rights described above, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems. If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request. Please note that notwithstanding any exercise of your rights described above by you, we may continue to collect, use, disclose or process your personal information where we are permitted or required to do so by law or requested or ordered to be do so by relevant authorities or law enforcement agencies.
To exercise your right to opt-out
: please submit a request, as follows:
Opt-out of targeted advertising (cookies opt-out), please use our cookie management tool:
Cookie Management Tool
Opt-out of data “sales”, please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Unless you have exercised your right to opt-out, we may disclose or “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or use your information for all the purposes described in this Privacy Notice, including for targeted advertising. The third parties to whom we sell or disclose personal information may use such information for their own purposes in accordance with their own privacy statements.
You do not need to create an account with us to exercise your right to opt-out. However, we may ask you to provide additional personal information so that we can properly identify you to track compliance with your opt-out request. We will only use personal information provided in an opt-out request to review and comply with the request. If you choose not to provide this information, we may only be able to process your request to the extent we are able to identify you in our data systems. We may not process your request if we, in good faith, believe that the request is fraudulent. In such instances, we will send a notice to the requestor explaining our decision.
Back to top ⬆︎
7. CHILDREN
Our Services are not directed to, and we do not intend to, or knowingly, collect or solicit personal information from children under the age of 16. If an individual is under the age of 16, they should not use our Services or otherwise provide us with any personal information either directly or by other means. If a child under the age of 16 has provided personal information to us, we encourage the child’s parent or guardian to contact us to request that we remove the personal information from our systems. If we learn that any personal information we collect has been provided by a child under the age of 16, we will promptly delete that personal information.
Back to top ⬆︎
8. THIRD PARTY WEBSITES AND SERVICES
The Services may contain integrations or links to third party websites or services, including those of our business partners. By interacting with these third parties, you are providing information directly to the third party and not Klaviyo. Please note that Klaviyo is not responsible for the privacy practices of these third parties or any entity that it does not own or control. We encourage you to review the privacy notices and online terms of those third parties to learn more about how they handle your personal information.
Back to top ⬆︎
9. CHANGES TO PRIVACY NOTICE
We reserve the right to change this Privacy Notice from time to time in our sole discretion. We will notify you about material changes in the way we treat personal information by adequately informing you via your account, by placing a prominent notice on our website, or through other appropriate communication channels. It is your responsibility to review this Privacy Notice periodically. All changes shall be effective from the date of publication unless otherwise provided.
Back to top ⬆︎
10. CONTACT US
If you have any questions or requests in connection with this Privacy Notice or other privacy-related matters, please send an email to
privacy@klaviyo.com
.
Back to top ⬆︎
11. REGION-SPECIFIC DISCLOSURES
This Privacy Notice is designed to apply to our website visitors, users of our Service, and other companies and users on a global basis. Please refer below for additional disclosures that may be applicable to you:
Back to top ⬆︎
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR AUSTRALIA RESIDENTS
These additional disclosures for Australian residents (“
Australian Disclosures
”) supplement the information contained in our
Privacy Notice
and applies solely to individuals in Australia (“
you
”).
These Australian Disclosures provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individuals in Australia, either online or offline, within the Australian
Privacy Act 1988
(Cth) and the Australian Privacy Principles (“
APPs
”) found in Schedule 1 of the
Privacy Act
.
Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these Australian Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our
Privacy Notice
or as otherwise defined in the
Privacy Act
.
When we use the term “
personal information
” in this Australian Disclosures notice, we mean information or an opinion about an identified individual or an individual who is reasonably identifiable, whether the information or opinion:
is true or not; and
is recorded in a material form or not.
A. HOW WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
The various ways in which your personal information is collected are described in Section 1 of our Privacy Notice, We may also collect your personal information if we record any phone calls or video calls (with your permission) between you and Klaviyo.
B. OVERSEAS TRANSFERS OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Your personal information may be transferred to and stored in locations outside Australia where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States, where Klaviyo, Inc. is located and the United Kingdom.
In the event of a transfer by Klaviyo to a location outside Australia, we ensure that: (i) personal information is transferred to countries recognized as having an equivalent level of privacy protection to Australia; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as contractual obligations.
C. STORING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal information we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers.
We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting credit or debit card information.
D. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
You have various rights under the APPs.
Right to access and request
You have the right to request access to and/or the correction of your personal information held by Klaviyo. You can exercise these rights by contacting our Privacy Officer at
privacy@klaviyo.com
.
We will respond to your request within a reasonable time. If your request is refused, you will be provided with written reasons for the refusal and information about the mechanisms you can use to complain about the refusal.
Right to complain
You also have a right to make a privacy complaint to our Privacy Officer at
privacy@klaviyo.com
.
Our Privacy Officer will first consider your complaint to determine whether there are simple or immediate steps which can be taken to resolve the complaint. Our Privacy Officer will endeavor to complete the investigation into your complaint promptly. You may be asked to provide further information about your complaint and the outcome you are seeking. Our Privacy Officer will then typically gather relevant facts, locate, and review relevant documents, and speak with individuals involved.
In most cases, our Privacy Officer will investigate and provide a written response to your complaint within 30 days of receipt of the complaint. If the matter is more complex or the investigation may take longer, our Privacy Officer will let you know.
If you are not satisfied with Klaviyo’s response to your complaint, a complaint may be made to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (“
OAIC
”). The OAIC can be contacted by telephone on 1300 363 992 or by using the contact details on the website
www.oaic.gov.au
.
Back to top ⬆︎
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS (UNITED STATES)
These additional disclosures for California residents (“
CA Disclosures
”) supplement the information contained in our
Privacy Notice
and apply solely to individual residents of the State of California (“
consumers
” or “
you
”).
These CA Disclosures provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individual residents of the State of California, either online or offline, within the scope of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (collectively, the “
CCPA
”)
Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these CA Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our
Privacy Notice
or as otherwise defined in the CCPA.
When we use the term “
personal information
” in this CA Notice, we mean information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
A. COLLECTION AND USE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
We collect personal information from and about you for a variety of purposes, as described in the
How We Collect Your Personal Information
and
How We Use Your Personal Information
sections of the
Privacy Notice
.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
. In the last 12 months, we have collected the following categories of personal information:
Identifiers
, such as your first, middle and last name, email address, username, or other similar identifiers;
CA Customer Categories
, such as your name, phone number, and postal address;
Commercial Information
, such as records of services purchased, obtained or considered;
Internet/Network Information
, such as device information, logs and analytics data;
Geolocation Data
, such as approximate location data generated based on your IP address or other information;
Sensory Information
, such as recordings of any phone calls or video calls (with your permission, as applicable) between you and Klaviyo;
Professional/Employment Information
, such as the business or organization you represent, your title with that business or organization and information relating to your role with the business or organization, job application information and other details contained in your resume;
Inferences
about your interests and preferences, generated from your use of our sites; and
Other Personal Information
, including information you submit into the feedback form and any communications between you and Klaviyo, as well as information we receive from social networking sites.
We collect this information from the following sources: directly from you, from our business partners and affiliates, from your browser or device when you visit our App or use our Services, or from third parties that you permit to share information with us. Please see the
How We Collect Your Personal Information
section of the Privacy Notice for more information about the sources of personal information we collect.
B. DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
We share personal information with third parties for business purposes. The categories of third parties to whom we disclose your personal information for a business purpose include: (i) other brands and affiliates in our family of companies; (ii) our service providers and advisors; (iii) analytics providers; (iv) marketing and strategic partners; and (v) social networks.
In the previous 12 months, we have disclosed all of the categories of personal information we collect, explained in the
Collection and Use of Personal Information
section of these CA Disclosures, to third parties for a business purpose, as describe the
How We Share Your Personal Information
section of the Privacy Notice.
C. SALE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
As further described in the
How We Share Your Personal Information
section of the Privacy Notice, we may “sell” or “share” your personal information (as those terms are defined by the CCPA) to third parties, subject to your right to opt out of those sales or sharing (see
Exercise Your Right to Opt-Out
below).
In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of personal information for the purposes described in our Privacy Notice, subject to your settings and preferences and your Right to Opt-Out: Identifiers, such as your name and email address, CA Customer Categories, such as your name and phone number, and Commercial Information, such as records of services purchased, obtained or considered.
The categories of third parties to whom we may sell or share the personal information include:
Business and Marketing Partners
Online Advertising Networks and Analytics Providers
Social Networks
We may also disclose personal information to third parties at your direction or upon your request, in connection with a corporate business transaction, or to comply with legal or contractual obligations, as described in our Privacy Notice.
D. YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
As a California resident, you may be able to exercise the following rights in relation to the personal information that we have collected about you (subject to certain limitations at law):
The Right to Access/Know
You have the right to request any or all of the following information relating to your personal information we have collected and disclosed in the last 12 months, upon verification of your identity:
• The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you;
• The categories of personal information we have collected about you;
• The categories of sources of the personal information;
• The categories of personal information that we have disclosed to third parties for a business purpose, and the categories of recipients to whom this information was disclosed;
• The categories of personal information we have sold about you (if any), and the categories of third parties to whom the information was sold; and
• The business or commercial purposes for collecting or, if applicable, selling the personal information.
The Right to Request Deletion
You have the right to request the deletion of personal information we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
The Right to Correction
You have the right to request that any inaccuracies in your personal information be corrected, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of your personal information.
The Right to Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Personal Information
You have the right to direct us not to “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” your personal information to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
If you are under the age of 16, you have the right to opt in, or to have a parent or guardian opt in on your behalf, to such sales.
The Right to Limit Use and Disclosure of Personal Information
You have the right to direct us to limit the use of your sensitive personal information to certain purposes, subject to certain exceptions.
The Right to Control Over Automated Decision-Making / Profiling
You have the right to direct us not to use automated decision-making or profiling for certain purposes.
The Right to Non-Retaliation
You have the right not to receive retaliatory or discriminatory treatment for exercising these rights.
However, please note that if the exercise of these rights limits our ability to process personal information (such as in the case of a deletion request), we may no longer be able to provide you our products and services or engage with you in the same manner.
“Shine the Light”
California residents that have an established business relationship with us have rights to know how their information is disclosed to third parties for their direct marketing purposes under California’s “Shine the Light” law, or the right to opt out of such practices (Civ. Code §1798.83).
E. HOW TO EXERCISE YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
Exercise Your Right to Access, Right to Know, Right to Correction, and Right to Deletion
To exercise your
Right to Access, Right to Know, Right to Correction, or your Right to Deletion
: please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Before processing your request, we will need to verify your identity and confirm you are a resident of the State of California. In order to verify your identity, we will generally either require the successful authentication of your account, or the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems. This process may require us to request additional personal information from you, including, but not limited to, your email address, phone number, and/or date of last transaction on our Services.
In certain circumstances, we may decline a request to exercise the rights described above, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems. If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request.
Exercise Your Right to Opt-Out of Personal Information Sales or Sharing for Targeted Advertising
Unless you have exercised your
Right to Opt-Out
, we may disclose or “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” your personal information to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. The third parties to whom we sell or share personal information may use such information for their own purposes in accordance with their own privacy policies.
You do not need to create an account with us to exercise your Right to Opt-Out. However, we may ask you to provide additional personal information so that we can properly identify you to track compliance with your opt-out request. We will only use personal information provided in an opt-out request to review and comply with the request. If you choose not to provide this information, we may only be able to process your request to the extent we are able to identify you in our data systems.
To exercise the Right to Opt-Out of personal information “sales,” you may submit a request by clicking the link below:
DO NOT SELL MY PERSONAL INFORMATION
Additionally, as is common practice among companies that operate online, we permit third party advertising networks, social media companies and other third party businesses to collect and disclose your personal information (including preferences, geolocation, commercial information and internet, network and device information) directly from your browser or device through cookies or tracking technologies when you visit or interact with our websites, use our apps or otherwise engage with us. These third parties use this information for the purposes of serving ads that are more relevant, for ad campaign measurement and analytics, and for fraud detection and reporting and may sell or share that information to other businesses for advertising and other purposes. To learn more about how third parties collect information through tracking technologies and what other choices you may have in relation to those activities, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
To exercise the Right to Opt-Out of the sharing of your personal information for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes (targeted advertising), you may submit a request by clicking on the following link to be added to our suppression list:
Cookie Settings
Authorized Agents
In certain circumstances, you may permit an authorized agent to submit requests to exercise your California Privacy Rights on your behalf. The authorized agent must provide a letter signed by you confirming the agent has permission to submit a request on your behalf or must provide sufficient evidence to show that the authorized agent has been lawfully vested with power of attorney.
For security purposes, we may need to verify your identity and confirm directly with you that you have provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request, and it may take additional time to fulfil agent-submitted requests. We may deny a request in the event we are not able to verify the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf. Please note that for privacy and security reasons, we will direct future communications to the data subject on whose behalf the request was made.
“Shine the Light” Disclosures
The California “Shine the Light” law gives residents of California the right under certain circumstances to request information from us regarding the manner in which we share certain categories of personal information (as defined in the Shine the Light law) with third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To opt out of this type of sharing, please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Notice of Financial Incentives
In addition, we may offer you financial incentives for the collection, sale, retention, and use of your personal information as permitted by the CCPA that can, without limitation, result in reasonably different prices, rates, or quality levels. The material aspects of any financial incentive will be explained and described in its program terms. Please note that participating in incentive programs is entirely optional, you will have to affirmatively opt-in to the program and you can opt-out of each program (i.e., terminate participation and forgo the ongoing incentives) prospectively by following the instructions in the applicable program description and terms. We may add or change incentive programs, and/or their terms by posting notice on the program descriptions and terms linked to above, so check them regularly.
Each financial incentive or price or service difference related to the collection and use of personal information is based upon our reasonable, good-faith determination of the estimated value of such information to our business, taking into consideration the value of the offer itself and the anticipated revenue generation that may be realized by rewarding brand loyalty. We calculate the value of the offer and financial incentive by using the expense related to the offer.
Minors
We do not sell the personal information and do not have actual knowledge that we sell the personal information of minors under 16 years of age. Please contact us at
privacy@klaviyo.com
to inform us if you, or your minor child, are under the age of 16.
If you are under the age of 18 and you want to remove your name or comments from our website or publicly displayed content, please contact us directly at
privacy@klaviyo.com
. We may not be able to modify or delete your information in all circumstances.
Back to top ⬆︎
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR NEVADA RESIDENTS (UNITED STATES)
If you are a resident of the State of Nevada in the United States, Chapter 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes permits a Nevada resident to opt out of future sales of certain covered information that a website operator has collected or will collect about the resident. To opt out of this kind of future sales, please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request
.
Back to top ⬆︎
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA, UNITED KINGDOM, AND SWITZERLAND
Klaviyo Group maintains operations in Europe and may direct our services to individuals located in the EEA, UK and Switzerland. In these instances, the following additional disclosures apply to our processing of personal data.
When we use the term “
personal data
” in this section, we mean information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person.
CONTROLLERS
Klaviyo, Inc. is the controller of your personal data.
In addition, Klaviyo Ltd and Klaviyo Ireland Limited are jointly responsible to process your personal data for the following reasons: perform our contractual services, as further described below.
A. LEGAL BASES FOR THE PROCESSING
We use your personal data based on the following legal grounds according to the Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (the “
EU GDPR
”) or, where applicable, the “
UK GDPR
” as it forms part of the law of England and Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland by virtue of section 3 of the UK European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018 GDPR:
Category of Data Subject
Personal Data Processed
Purposes of Processing
Legal Basis for Processing
• Customers, where the customer is a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Email and password, company name, company URL, office phone number and office address. You may also add or confirm your name, company industry, tax ID, billing address, time zone and source of contact/lead
Account creation and profile information for a Klaviyo account
• Performance of a contract
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Name, job title, email address, signature (if wet signed or a copy of their autograph is used), customer name and address, and information about how you heard about us.
• If your company enters into a contractual relationship with us
• Deliver the Services you have requested, including facilitating your messages to other users or groups and for account and contract management (including customer support)
• Performance of a contract
• Customers, if a natural person
We will only receive the last 4 digits of the credit card number along with transaction-related information (i.e., payment date, amount, device type, IP address and card type). If custom billing is arranged, the account contact’s name, email, job title, company and address may be collected as well.
Processing payments for the Services
• Performance of a contract
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Name, email address, mailing address, phone number, company/company URL, account ID, type of inquiry, or any other personal information you choose to provide to us, such as how many contacts you have/your company has, which products interest you, what platform is currently being used, and meeting dates and times, applicable marketing interests and communication preferences
• Communications with customers and users of Klaviyo.
• Marketing and Sales of our Services to individuals, including through email, direct mail, phone, video call, text message, or through other forms of communications platforms (i.e. WhatsApp)
• To send gifts to you
• Conduct marketing research
• Opportunity tracking, conversion, and lead generation
• Legitimate interest to communicate with and market to customers
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Your username, email, and password. You may add a profile picture. When using the platform, a user’s history on registrations, courses taken, scores, and product certifications, survey responses and lead status as well as unique identifier are captured.
To facilitate joining and administration of the Klaviyo Academy
• Legitimate interest in providing the Klaviyo Academy to customers and users
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Your account credentials, your Klaviyo account ID, email address and partner ID. Your account will also show classifications based on your involvement in the Community and badges based on your involvement/accomplishment (both of which can be managed in the profile settings to be visible or not visible to other users of the Community) as well as all content you share via the Community function. Moreover, you may add your name, username, job title, city, country, profile picture, social media (Instagram and Twitter), and bio/signature details that may be visible to the other users of the Community.
Klaviyo Community – to facilitate participation in the Klaviyo network with other account holders and as required to administer the Klaviyo Community.
• Legitimate interest in providing the Klaviyo Community to customers and users
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Personal information that you provide when you sign up (where available). This information includes your name, email, title, business phone number, company name, company URL and office address.
• Participation in the Klaviyo Partner program.
• To process your application to become a Klaviyo Partner and to administer the Klaviyo Partner program.
• Legitimate interest in providing the Klaviyo Partner program to customers and users
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Name, email, and phone number), your company, your job title, the office address and any other information you provide to us.
Events, Surveys, Feedback and Promotions (including Contests, Sweepstakes, Webinars, and Training Sessions).
• Legitimate interest in communicating with customers and users and administering promotions to customers and users
• Consent
• Customers, if a natural person
• Users (who may be customer employees)
Log Data
: your internet protocol (IP) address, operating system, browser details such as type, ID, and configuration, unique identifiers, local and language settings; session logging, heatmaps and scrolls; screen resolution, ISP, device type and version, the referring URL, date/time of your visit, the time you spent on our services and any errors that may occur during your visit to our Services.
Analytics Data:
the electronic path you take to our services, through our services and when exiting our services, UTM source, as well as your usage and activity on our services, such as the time zone, activity information (first and last active date and time), usage history (flows created, campaigns scheduled, emails opened, total log-ins) as well as the pages, links, objects, products and benefits you view, click or otherwise interact with. We may also analyze the interaction between you and your customer using our Services.
Digital Behavioral Data
: web page interactions (clicks, hovers, focus, mouse movements, browsing, zooms and other interactions), referring web page/source through which you accessed the Sites, and statistics associated with the interaction between device or browser and the Sites.
Location Data
:  your general geographic location based on the IP address we collect.
Platform Data:
If you have an account to use the services we may offer as a processor, we may in addition also collect your name, phone number, email address, company information, status in the sales cycle, lead and commercial details (like platform specifics, internal marketing channel), and user and account ID and other identifies (such as Salesforce ID and Klaviyo ID), NPS/account sentiments, Klaviyo Academy user profile/history data, account health status, event attendance, status as lead/account, and integrations
• Administer, improve and personalize our Services, including by recognizing an individual and remembering their information when they return to our Services and analyzing our Customer base
• Test, enhance, update and monitor the Services, or diagnose or fix technology problems Help maintain the safety, security and integrity of our property and Services, technology assets and business
• Enforce our
Terms of Service
, resolve disputes, carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and protect our business interests and the interests and rights of third parties
• Prevent, investigate or provide notice of fraud or unlawful or criminal activity
• Review our business performance
• Legitimate interest in enhancing and improving the Klaviyo Services
• Consent
• Performance of a Contract
• Comply with Legal Obligations
B. HOW LONG WILL WE STORE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
We will usually store the personal data we collect about you for no longer than necessary for the purposes as set above, and in accordance with our legal obligations and legitimate business interests.
The criteria used to determine the period for which personal data about you will be retained varies depending on the legal basis under which we process the personal data:
Contract
.
Where we are processing personal data is based on contract, we generally will retain your personal data for the duration of the contract plus some additional limited period of time that is necessary to comply with law or that represents the statute of limitations for legal claims that could arise from our contractual relationship.
Legitimate Interests
.
Where we are processing personal data based on our legitimate interests, we generally will retain such information for a reasonable period of time based on the particular interest, taking into account your fundamental interests and your rights and freedoms.
Consent
.
Where we are processing personal data based on your consent, we generally will retain your personal data until you withdraw your consent, or otherwise for the period of time necessary to fulfil the underlying agreement with you or provide you with the applicable service for which we process that personal data.
Legal Obligation
.
Where we are processing personal data based on a legal obligation, we generally will retain your personal data for the period of time necessary to fulfil the legal obligation.
Legal Claim
. We may need to apply a “legal hold” that retains information beyond our typical retention period where we face threat of legal claim or intent to establish a claim. In that case, we will retain the information until the hold is removed, which typically means the claim or threat of claim has been resolved.
In all cases, in addition to the purposes and legal bases, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, as well as the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data.
C. MARKETING AND ADVERTISING
From time to time we may contact you with information about our services, including sending you marketing messages and asking for your feedback on our Services. Most marketing messages we send will be by email or via messaging platform. For some marketing messages, we may use personal data we collect about you to help us determine the most relevant marketing information to share with you.
We may send you marketing messages if you have given us your consent to do so or where we have relied on the soft opt-in rule (where applicable).  If you wish to unsubscribe from such communication, please see the details set out above under “Control over Your Information”.
D. STORING AND TRANSFERRING YOUR PERSONAL DATA
Security
. We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal data we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers. We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting credit or debit card information.
International Transfers of your Personal data
. The personal data we collect may be transferred to and stored in countries outside the EEA, UK and Switzerland in countries where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States, where Klaviyo, Inc. is located.
In the event of a transfer by Klaviyo, we ensure that: (i) the personal data is transferred to countries recognized as offering an equivalent level of protection; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission.
If you wish to enquire further about these safeguards used, please contact us using the details set out under the “
Contact Us
” section of the Privacy Notice.
E. YOUR RIGHTS IN RESPECT OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
In accordance with applicable privacy law, you may have the following rights in respect of your personal data that we hold:
Right to deletion
. You have the right to request the deletion of personal information we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
Right of access
. You have the right to obtain certain information about our processing of your personal data which includes:
confirmation of whether, and where, we are processing your personal data;
information about the categories of personal data we are processing, the purposes for which we process your personal data and information as to how we determine applicable retention periods;
information about the categories of recipients with whom we may share your personal data; and
a copy of the personal data we hold about you.
Right of portability
. You have the right, in certain circumstances, to receive a copy of the personal data you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format that supports re-use, or to request the transfer of your personal data to another person.
Right to rectification
. You have the right to obtain rectification of any inaccurate or incomplete personal data we hold about you without undue delay.
Right to erasure
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to erase your personal data without undue delay, such as if the continued processing of that personal data is not justified.
Right to restriction
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to limit the purposes for which we process your personal data, such as where the accuracy of the personal data is contested by you.
Right to withdraw consent
. There are certain circumstances where we require your consent to process your personal data. In these instances, and if you have provided consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. If you withdraw your consent, this will not affect the lawfulness of our use of your personal data before your withdrawal.
You also have the right to object to any processing based on our legitimate interests. There may be compelling reasons for us continuing to process your personal data, and we will assess and inform you if that is the case. You can object to marketing activities for any reason at any time
.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint to your local data protection authority. If you are based in the EU, information about how to contact your local data protection authority is available
here
. If you are based in:
the UK, your local data protection authority is the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (
https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us/
).
Switzerland, your local data protection authorities is the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home/the-fdpic/contact/address.html
).
Ireland, your local data protection authority is the Data Protection Commission (
https://www.dataprotection.ie/en/contact/how-contact-us
).
If you wish to exercise one of these rights, please submit a request by filling out our
P
rivacy Rights Request Form
.
Due to the confidential nature of data processing, we may ask you to provide proof of identity when exercising the above rights to verify your identity.
12. EU-US DATA PRIVACY FRAMEWORK, UK EXTENSION TO THE EU-US DPF, AND THE SWISS-US DATA PRIVACY FRAMEWORK PRINCIPLES
Klaviyo complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Klaviyo has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“EU-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Klaviyo has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Klaviyo’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
In the context of an onward transfer, Klaviyo has responsibility for the processing of personal information it receives under the EU-U.S. DPF and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf.  Klaviyo shall remain liable under the Principles if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the Principles, unless Klaviyo proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
In compliance with the EU-U.S DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S DPF, and the Swiss-U.S DPF Principles, Klaviyo commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the EU-U.S DPF, the UK extension to the EU-U.S DPF, and the Swiss-U.S Data Privacy Framework Principles. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints should first contact:
Privacy@klaviyo.com
Klaviyo has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the Data Privacy Framework program to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
here
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration through the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information on this option, please see Annex I of the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles,
here
.
13.  CONTACT US
If you have any questions or concerns about how Klaviyo uses your personal data, you can contact us:
Directly at
privacy@klaviyo.com
.
Via our appointed EU Representative, the European Data Protection Office (“
EDPO
”), by contacting the EDPO
on their online webform at:
Ireland (EU GDPR):
https://edpo.com/gdpr-data-request/
UK GDPR:
https://edpo.com/uk-gdpr-data-request/
Swiss FADP:
https://edpo.com/swiss-data-request/
by mail at the applicable address set forth below:
Ireland (EU):
EDPO
Ground Floor
71 Lower Baggot Street
Dublin D02 P593
IRELAND
United Kingdom:
EDPO UK
8 Northumberland Avenue
London WC2N 5BY
UNITED KINGDOM
Switzerland:
EDPO Switzerland
Rue de Lausanne 37
1201 Geneva
SWITZERLAND
Back to top ⬆︎
Previous versions:
October 10, 2023
June 29, 2023
December 9, 2022
December 30, 2019
Sub-policy 5
https://www.adyen.com/policies-and-disclaimer/privacy-policy:
Transaction
Compliance obligations
Embedded financial products
Security
Marketing
Website
Other
Privacy Statement
Please read this privacy statement if you would like to know more about the way Adyen and its
group companies around the world
(hereinafter referred to as “Adyen” or “we”) collect and process your personal data. This privacy statement applies to the processing activities in which Adyen acts as a data controller.
It is important to us that your personal data is handled carefully, and that you are well informed about the way we process your personal data. This privacy statement tells you what data we process – including how, why and how long we process it for – and informs you of your data privacy rights.
Adyen reserves the right to update its privacy statement at any time. Such updates will be made and posted on our publicly available website
https://www.adyen.com/privacy-policy
.
Version as of June 4, 2024.
Download as PDF
Hi there,
We have updated our Privacy Statement as of the June 4, 2024. To read the previous (March 2023) version, please click
here
.
General information
Adyen is a financial technology company operating under a banking license. This means that Adyen provides its customers with payments and other financial products, including payments processing for its customers and platforms via credit card, bank transfer, and other payment methods, card issuing, (merchant) bank accounts, fraud detection, and other financial services. It is also important to note that Adyen N.V. is supervised by the Dutch Central Bank as a regulated bank under Dutch law. In addition, Adyen and its group companies are supervised by various regulators and authorities, as applicable, around the globe.
You may have seen Adyen on your bank statements if you have bought something, automatically renewed a subscription, or received a payout from one of Adyen’s customers. If you would like more information about any of these charges, you can use
Adyen’s Look Up Charge Tool
.
If you would like to exercise your
data subject rights
(outlined below) under data privacy law, please use
Adyen’s Privacy Form
.
You may have the following rights regarding your personal data, subject to to certain exceptions:
Right to access
: You may have the right to ask us for the specific personal data that we have collected from you in a portable and (where technically possible) usable format.
Right to know
: You may have the right to verify that we have collected personal data about you, as well as know what personal data we have collected about you. This includes, as applicable, the categories of personal data we have collected, the sources from which we collected that personal data, the business or commercial purposes for which we collected, “sold”, and “shared” that personal data, the categories of personal data that we “sold”, “shared”, or disclosed to third parties for business purposes and the categories of third parties to whom we “sold”, “shared”, or disclosed personal data. You can also contact us if you want to know more about the data we process for our legitimate interests.
Right to deletion
: You may be entitled to request that we delete the personal data that we have collected from you. We will use all commercially reasonable efforts to honor your request, in compliance with applicable laws. Please note, however, that we may need or be required to keep such information, such as for our legitimate business purposes, or to comply with applicable laws.
Right to opt-out of sales and sharing of personal data to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising:
You are entitled to opt-out of sales of your personal data to third parties and to opt-out of the sharing of your personal data to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising, if applicable. You can opt-out of sales and sharing of your personal data by visiting our Cookies Policy and disabling the ‘Sale or Share of Personal Data’ toggle in the Cookies Preference Center,  or by contacting us using one of the methods below. If you have enabled the Global Privacy Control mechanism on your browser, device, or platform, you will automatically be opted out of any “sharing” when you use our website. Adyen seamlessly processes the Global Privacy Control (GPC) signal if enabled on your browser, device, or platform. Please visit
this page
to learn more about enabling the GPC.
Right to object to the processing of your personal data:
You are entitled to object to us processing your personal data. In addition, where you have given your consent for us to process personal data, you can withdraw this consent at any time. Please note that Adyen maintains a record of withdrawals of consent to ensure that we do not contact you in the future.
Right to opt-out of profiling:
As defined under privacy laws, Adyen may profile customers to determine their eligibility for certain financial products, or to offer them certain financial services. Please note that opting-out of profiling will mean that you are no longer eligible for these financial products or services.
Right to correct your personal data:
You may have the right to update inaccurate information that we process about you.
Right to exercise rights without discrimination
: You have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment if you exercise the rights conferred to you by applicable privacy laws.
These rights may be limited under applicable laws, and are also subject to technical feasibility. For example, if we collect your personal data in our role as a service provider to one of our customers, you will need to contact that customer directly to exercise your rights.
Please note that we may require additional information from you to verify your identity and process your request. Alternatively, you can submit a request through an authorized representative using the contact methods described below. If you use an authorized representative, we may require a copy of their signed permission to act on your behalf. We may also need to verify your identity directly and ask you to confirm the representative’s authority.
To exercise your rights, your information will be disclosed to our privacy management third-party service provider. Please be informed that Adyen has implemented the appropriate safeguards to ensure your information is adequately protected.
Some of the information you send us may be disclosed to other Adyen group companies outside of the European Economic Area ("EEA"). These countries encompass the countries in which we have operations (you can find a full list
here
).
If you are a resident in Quebec, some of the information you send us may be disclosed to Adyen group companies outside of Quebec.
To protect your data when it is transferred to countries outside of the EEA, we have implemented appropriate safeguards. When we transfer data to our Adyen group companies, the transfers are protected by an intragroup agreement containing Standard Contractual Clauses. For transfers to our services providers located outside of the EEA, we rely on Standard Contractual Clauses. If you would like to know more about these safeguards, you can contact us using the details below, under “Contact us”.
We use third parties to offer you our website, as well as our products and services. Where necessary, we will disclose your information to our service providers and professional advisers (e.g. IT providers, KYC partners, CRM providers, marketing support providers (such as agencies that manage our social media accounts), social media providers such as LinkedIn, analysts, customer service providers, business development providers and legal service providers). We have established agreements with our service providers to protect your personal data.
If our business is sold or integrated with another business, your details will be disclosed to our advisers and any prospective purchaser’s advisers, and will be passed to the new owners of the business.
We may disclose information to third parties in connection with legal claims, or when we have a legal obligation to do so. We may also disclose information with your permission (such as if we wish to disclose your details with another group company for their recruitment purposes).
The table below provides a summary of the categories of personal data that we collect and disclose to service providers and other third parties.
Name, date of birth, contact information, bank account number, tax identification number, nationality and national identification number, and job title, including biometric data. Birth certificates for parents or guardians of minors (children ages 13-17).
When you sign up for Adyen services. We are legally obliged to collect this information.
Adyen discloses this information to identity and verify providers and screening partners, including credit reference agencies, and may disclose this information to regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting. Adyen may disclose this information to payment schemes, local payment providers, debt collecting agencies, and other third-party service providers, depending on the services acquired. Adyen may also make such information available to Platform customers you have signed up with.
Your name, business email, phone number, company name, and website.
When you fill out our sales form and when we  communicate with you. Adyen collects this information for marketing purposes, and for providing our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information with our customer relationship management (“CRM”) service providers so they can reach out and further build a relationship.
Name, bank account numbers and credit card numbers.
When you sign up for Adyen services. Adyen is legally obliged to collect this information, and it also helps us to provide our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information with customers for our embedded financial products, card printing partners for our  Issuing product, and with law enforcement agencies in compliance with legal orders.
Credit card details, debit card details, transaction amount, date and time of transaction.
When you purchase a good  or a service from an Adyen customer. Adyen collects this information for the purpose of providing our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information to our customers in our Customer Area, to authorities pursuant to legal orders, and to the selected payment schemes, such as Visa and Mastercard, and local payment methods upon request. Adyen may disclose this information to regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting.
Cookies
When you visit Adyen’s website. Adyen collects this information for marketing purposes.
Adyen discloses this information to IT providers, CRM providers, social media providers, and advertising networks for its own advertising purposes.
Social Security number, driver’s license, or identification document, and passport.
When you sign up for Adyen services. Adyen is legally obliged to collect this information.
Adyen discloses this information to identity verification providers, including credit reference agencies, to tax authorities as legally required, and regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting.
Adyen does not use or disclose this sensitive personal information for any other purpose.
Adyen does not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal data of individuals under 16 years of age.
We reserve the right to use de-identified or aggregated data for any purpose without limitation, and we will not attempt to re-identify the information.
We will only keep your data for as long as we reasonably need to for the purposes listed above, or as otherwise required by law.
Questions, comments, requests, or complaints concerning this privacy statement or the way we process your personal data are welcomed and can be addressed to our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@adyen.com
or  Simon Carmiggeltstraat 5-60, 1011 DJ Amsterdam, the Netherlands, or to
lgpd@adyen.com
if you are located in Brazil.
If you would like further details on any of the third parties your personal data is “sold” to or “shared” with, would like to know the purpose of their data processing, the manner in which data is processed, or how you can communicate with such third party to exercise your data privacy rights, please contact
dpo@adyen.com
, or
lgpd@adyen.com
if you are located in Brazil.
If you have a complaint about the way we handle your personal data, you also have the right to address this to the data protection authority of the country in which you live or work, or the country in which we are located.
Learn more
Transaction
Compliance obligations
Embedded financial products
Security
Marketing
Website
Other
Cookie Policy
You can read more about how we use cookies, how we share your data with our partners, and how you can change your settings on our Cookie Policy. To learn what personal information we collect about you, the purpose we process your data for, and how you can opt-out of the sales or sharing of your personal information, please see our
Accept All Cookies
Reject All
Cookies Settings
Your Opt Out Preference Signal is Honored
Cookie Preference Center
When you visit our website, we may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to do. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer. For more information, please see our
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Social Media Cookies
We only place social media cookies if you have given us your permission to do this. Social Media cookies collect information about your browsing habits in order to make our content and advertising as relevant to you and your interests as possible. These cookies are also used to help us measure the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns by tracking the number of clicks. The cookies are usually placed by third party advertising networks. They remember the websites you visit and use this information to give you access to interesting and exciting content on our website and to show you more personalized adverts when you visit other websites. These cookies also help improve your browsing experience, for example by helping to prevent the same advertisement from reappearing to you. Additionally, social media platforms such as Facebook and Twitter can use cookies to see if you are logged in and allow you to "like" content or forward it to your friends. Depending on your settings, these third parties may use your information for their own purposes, such as advertising. If you would like to know more how these social media platforms use data, please refer to the privacy notices of these platforms.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 6
https://www.paypal.com/uk/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Back To Home Page
PayPal Privacy Statement
1. Overview
2. PayPal’s role as a data controller
3. Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
4. Categories of Personal Data We Collect about You
5. What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
6. Do We Share Personal Data, and why?
7. How long does PayPal store your Personal Data?
8. International Transfers of Personal Data
9. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
10. Your Data Protection Rights
11. Specific information about automated decision-making and profiling
12. Why do we share your Personal Data with credit reference agencies?
13. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
14. Can Children Use Our Services?
15. Updates to this Privacy Statement
16. Users in the UK
17. Definitions
18. Our Contact Information
Status disclosure
Download Printable PDF
PayPal Privacy Statement
Last updated on 1 February 2025
Please contact us if you have any questions regarding this Privacy Statement or in general questions regarding your Personal Data. Your information will be used to provide the Services and in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal
User Agreement
.
1. Overview
PayPal UK Ltd (“we,” “our,” “us,” “PayPal”) provides this Privacy Statement to describe our use of your Personal Data when you use your PayPal account, Xoom account, visit our websites, apply for, or use our services (collectively, the “
Services
”). This Privacy Statement does not apply to Other Services, such as Hyperwallet. We encourage you to read this Privacy Statement and to use it to help you make informed decisions.
Certain capitalized terms that are not otherwise defined in the Statement are explained in the “
Definitions
” section below.
2. PayPal’s role as a data controller
In the United Kingdom (UK),
PayPal UK Ltd
is the data controller for the Personal Data collected and processed in connection with Personal Data obtained when you visit our website, during the registration and application process, and throughout your continued use of the services.
Some of the third-parties that we share Personal Data with are independent data controllers. This means that we are not the ones that dictate how the data that we share will be processed. Examples are authorities, credit bureaus, acquirers, and other financial institutions. When your data is shared with independent data controllers, their data policies will apply. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
For more information about how we protect your Personal Data when transferred outside of the UK, please see Section 8, (“
International Transfers of Personal Data
”).
For most of our Services, we act as a “data controller”, however there are some products and features where PayPal may also act as a “data processor” when providing services to our Partners and Merchants.  The “data controller” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that has the control over the purposes and means by which the data processing is performed.  The “data processor” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that processes the Personal Information for the data controller, for the data controller’s specific purposes, and as otherwise permitted under applicable data protection laws.
3. Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
Our Services may be accessed by individuals without a PayPal or Xoom account. We will collect Personal Data from you even if you are a non-account holder when you use our Services, such as when you use our Pay Without a PayPal account, use Unbranded Payment Services (e.g. Braintree), use PayPal Groups, use a Fastlane profile, or when you receive a payment through our Services from account holders (“Recipient”). If you use Pay Without a PayPal account, we may link your transaction information with your PayPal account, if you have one at the time you use the Service without logging in, or if you create a PayPal account later. We use the term “User” to apply to account and non-account holders. If you are a non-account holder, your Personal Data will be used to provide the Services and in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal
User Agreement
.
With a Fastlane profile, individuals can store their payment methods and other Personal Data with PayPal so that they can complete the checkout process faster, create a store or loyalty account, or facilitate other transactions at participating Partners and Merchants with payment card, contact information, shipping data or other data they save in their Fastlane profile as relevant to the specific interaction, participating Partner or Merchant, all without having to manually input payment method details and other Personal Data each time they check out (“Fastlane”).
When you create a Fastlane profile, PayPal will store your Personal Data, including your name, email, phone number, address information,  billing information and payment method details, and other data that will be relevant to specific Partner or Merchant interactions, and pre-populate that information in the checkout flows or other interactive features of participating Partners and Merchants so that you can enjoy a faster Partner and Merchant experience by not having to manually input your payment or other information. We will also collect transaction and other Partner or Merchant data related to your purchases and other Partner and Merchant interactions when you use Fastlane. If you have a Fastlane profile, we may recognize you as a Fastlane user when you shop on the participating Partners and Merchants sites and we may prompt you to engage in participating Partner or Merchant interactions, such as register for a store or loyalty account  using your Fastlane profile information. If you choose to interact with participating Partners or Merchants through Fastlane, you agree to let PayPal disclose your Fastlane profile information to the Participating Partners and Merchants and their service providers, and to facilitate your transaction and shopping experience on the participating Partners and Merchants sites.
When you shop on Partner and Merchant sites, the Partner and Merchant may disclose Personal Data with PayPal that we will use in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal user agreement.
4. Categories of Personal Data We Collect about You
We collect the following categories of information about you to provide our Services, continually improve your user experience, manage and improve our business. The types of Personal Data we collect about you are described below.
Categories of Personal Data
collected from you
,
including from your interactions with us and use of the Services:
Registration and Contact Information
. Depending on the Services you choose, we will collect your name, mailing address, email, income, telephone number, tax ID, Payment Information, profession, employment or business information, and other information necessary to establish an account or profile and use our Services.
Identification and Signature Information
. Depending on the Services you choose, we will collect information to verify your name, address, email, phone number, government- issued identification, age and biometric data as well as to create and issue your electronic signature.
Payment Information
. Information such as amount you send or request, your payment instrument, card, or financial or funding account used in connection with the Services, including issuer name, card type, country code, payment account number, CVV, username, and IBAN information.
Information about your imported contacts
. If you choose to import your contact lists, we will collect Information you enter or import about your contacts, such as name, address, phone number, images, email address or usernames associated with the contacts you import or enter manually.
Information in your PayPal Account Profile.
Information you choose to enter such as your username, email, mobile number, profile picture, preferred language, or personal description which may include sensitive Personal Data that reveals religious beliefs, political or philosophical views, disability, sexual orientation as well as biometric data. You can set your profile to “Private” at any time.
Information you provide when you contact us
. Information you disclose when you respond to surveys, or contact our customer support teams, such as Services you have used, recorded conversations, chat conversations with us, email correspondence with us, account or profile status, repayment history, voice identification. This may include information about others if you choose to share it with us.
Device Information.
Information that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Site or Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device IP address; information about your device’s web browser and internet connection you use to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data.
Inferred data.
We may derive inferences from your transactions and personal data when you use the Services. We do this, for example, to help keep your account and profile secure and protect your use of the Services from fraud. We may draw inferences that reflect your behaviour patterns and personal preferences, browsing and purchasing habits, and creditworthiness.
Categories of Personal Data
collected from third parties,
including from identity verification vendors, data brokers, vendors that help us with fraud detection, your bank, Partners and Merchants or third party platforms you engage with using our Services:
Information from your connected third party accounts
. If you choose to connect non-financial or financial account such as your personal email, social media, or bank or credit accounts, we will collect information consistent with the disclosed purpose for which it was linked. For example, if you choose to participate in
Open Banking
, we will collect account credentials, account balances, account transactions, and information about your financial standing from your linked accounts. You may change your mind about use of this feature and unlink your connected accounts at any time.
Information from Credit Reporting Agencies
. Where permitted by law, we collect credit-related information such as outstanding and historical debt, repayment history, previous credit approvals, current employment relationship, and relationship with other financial institutions within the framework of your use of our Services.
Transaction Information
. Information about your order details and purchases, such as item description, quantity, price, currency, shipping address, online shopping cart information, seller and buyer information, and Payment Information. This includes information from your transactions where you use our Services without a PayPal account (e.g. Guest checkout).
Information related to legal requirements
. Consistent with applicable law (such as anti-money laundering laws), this may include information from external sanction lists such as name, date of birth, place of birth, occupation, and the reason why the person is on the list in question.
Third party applications
. Information from others from your use of third-party applications, such as the Apple App Store or Google Play Store, social networking sites, such as name, your social network ID, Location Information, email, device ID, browser ID, and profile picture. Your use of third-party applications is subject to the privacy notice and terms of service for such applications.
Categories of Personal Data automatically collected about you, including through your access to our website or mobile app, from cookies and similar tracking technologies, and your devices:
Technical Usage Data
. Information about response time for web pages, download errors and date and time when you used the service, such as your IP address, statistics regarding how pages are loaded or viewed, the websites you visited before coming to the Sites and other usage and browsing information collected through Cookies (“
Technical Usage Data
”).
Information from your device
. Information about your language settings, IP address, browser ID, device ID, cookie preferences, time zone, operating system, platform, screen resolution and similar information about your device settings, and data collected from cookies or other tracking technologies,
Location Information
. Information from IP-based geolocation such as latitude and longitude data, and Global Positioning System (GPS) information when you give us permission through your device settings.
Inferred data
. Inferences drawn to create a profile about you that may reflect behavior patterns and personal preferences, such as gender, income, browsing and purchasing habits, and creditworthiness.
5. What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
We may
process
your Personal Data for a variety of reasons that are permitted under data protection laws applicable in the UK and in accordance with the lawful bases below:
We collect the following Personal Data we consider
necessary to fulfil our pre-contractual and contractual obligations
to you and without which you will not be able to use the Services.
Necessary categories of Personal Data include:
Registration and Contact Information
Identification and Signature Information
Payment Information
Information related to legal requirements
Information you provide when you contact us
Transaction information
Package Tracking
Service-specific Personal Data
Information from credit reporting agencies and financial institutions
Information from your connected financial accounts
Information from your use of the Services
Technical usage data
Device information
Location data
These activities include
:
to provide our Services, to fulfil relevant agreements with you and to otherwise administer our business relationship with you. If you are using Fastlane, we will also use your Personal Data and payment method details to determine whether the payment you are making with a participating Partner or Merchant is authorised by you and likely to be successfully authorised by the payment method you choose to use when you make a purchase using details from your Fastlane profile.
to administer your payment for products and the customer relationship.
to assess your creditworthiness in connection with your application, confirm your identity and your contact information, and protect you and others from fraud.
to confirm your identity, also through the use of electronic signature, and verify your personal and contact details.
to prove that transactions have been executed.
to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim or collection procedures.
to comply with internal procedures.
to assess which payment options and services to offer you, for example by carrying out internal and external credit assessments.
for customer analysis, to administer our Services, and for internal operations, for example troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research and statistical purposes.
to communicate with you in relation to our Services.
to comply with applicable UK laws, such as anti-money laundering and booking keeping laws and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks.
We have a legitimate interest in ensuring that PayPal remains a secure financial service and continuing to offer services that are innovative and of interest to you. We do this where
our legitimate interests are not outweighed by your right not to have your data processed for this purpose
.
These activities include:
to ensure that content is presented in the most effective way for you and your device.
to prevent misuse of our Services as part of our efforts to keep our platform safe and secure.
to determine your eligibility for and to communicate with you about Services for which you may qualify or that may be of interest to you, for example by carrying out internal credit assessments.
to carry out risk analysis, fraud prevention and risk management.
to improve our Services and for general business development purposes, for example improving risk models to minimize fraud, develop new products and features and explore new business opportunities.
To keep your account, profile and financial information accurate and up to date.
for marketing, product and customer analysis, including testing, for example to improve our product range and optimize our customer offerings.
to comply with applicable laws, such as anti-money laundering, bookkeeping laws, regulatory capital adequacy requirements, and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks. For example, when we process Personal Data for know-your-customer (“KYC”) requirements, to prevent, detect and investigate money laundering, terrorist financing and fraud. We also carry out sanction screening, report to tax authorities, police enforcement authorities, enforcement authorities, supervisory authorities where we are not compelled by UK law but where we have a good faith belief that sharing the information is necessary to comply with applicable law.
to facilitate your participation in competitions, offerings, and events.
to conduct financial risk management obligations such as credit performance and quality, insurance risks and compliance with capital adequacy requirements under applicable law
to process information about your contacts to make it easy for you to find and connect them and improve payment accuracy.
By providing us with information about your contacts you certify that you have permission to provide that information to PayPal for the purposes described in this Privacy Statement.
to provide you with information, news, and marketing about our Services, including where we partner with others to offer similar services.
to associate information about you to identify your use of Services without a PayPal account (e.g. Pay Without a PayPal account), and to associate such transactions with your PayPal account, if you have one or later establish an account.
to remember your preferences for the next time you use the Services, such as which of your payment methods you prefer or whether you choose to receive digital receipts via email or text when you checkout.
We have a legal obligation under UK laws to conduct certain processing activities.
We do this where it is necessary to comply with applicable laws
.
These activities include:
to provide our Services and products.
to certify your identity, also for signature purposes, and verify your personal and contact details.
to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim or collection procedures.
to prevent misuse of our Services as part of our efforts to keep our platform safe and secure.
to carry out risk analysis, fraud prevention and risk management.
to comply with applicable laws, such as anti-money laundering and bookkeeping laws and regulatory capital adequacy requirements and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks. For example, when we process Personal Data for know-your-customer (“KYC”) requirements, to prevent, detect and investigate money laundering, terrorist financing and fraud. We also carry out sanction screening, report to tax authorities, police enforcement authorities, enforcement authorities, supervisory authorities.
We rely on your explicit and voluntary consent
to process your Personal Data to participate in certain features that while not necessary for use of the Services may be of interest to you, such as syncing your contact list to your account, providing biometric data, targeted advertising, linking your email account for package tracking or connecting to a third-party platform. You may change your mind about use of these features at any time through your account settings. Note that withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we have conducted prior to your withdrawal. Please refer to Section 10 (“
Your data protection rights
”) for more information on your right to withdraw your consent.
6. Do We Share Personal Data, and why?
We will share your Personal Data with third parties where there is a lawful basis to do so.
This includes:
With other Other Services
, in order to provide you with the Services and for our own legitimate interests in conducting our business. These interests are described further in Section 5 (“
What Personal Data is used and for which legal basis?
”)
.
With authorities
, to the extent we are under a legal obligation to do so. Such authorities include tax authorities, police authorities, enforcement authorities and supervisory authorities in relevant countries. We may also be required to provide competent authorities information about your use of our Services, for example revenue or tax authorities, which may include your name, address and information regarding card transactions processed by us on your behalf through our Services. The legal basis for complying with disclosure obligations under UK law is legal obligation and where acting under non-UK law, on the basis of our legitimate interest to comply with relevant laws to deter illegal conduct.
With other financial institutions and card networks
, for example to facilitate payment processing, to jointly offer a product or to add cards to your electronic wallet. For payment transactions with Fastlane, your Personal Data will be shared with the provider of the payment services for the participating Partner and Merchant to enable the processing of the payment transaction. The payment provider for the Partner and Merchant may be PayPal or a third party payment provider. The legal basis for our disclosure is performance of our contract with you. These parties may also access your Personal Data for other legitimate purposes such as identity verification, fraud prevention and risk management. The legal basis for this processing is the legitimate interest of ourselves and our Partners and Merchants to deter fraudulent and illegal conduct.
With fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
, for example to assist us in detecting activities suggestive of fraud. The legal basis for this processing is the legitimate interest of ourselves and our Partners and Merchants to deter fraudulent and illegal conduct.
With debt collection agencies,
for example to collect unpaid overdue debts through a third party such as a debt collection agency. We do this on the basis of our legitimate interest to conduct business and recover debts. Please be aware that these parties’ privacy notice applies to the processing of Personal Data that you share directly with them, and they may report your unpaid debts to credit reporting agencies which may affect your creditworthiness or ability to secure future credit.
With service providers
that operate at our direction and on our behalf to perform services we outsource to them, such as marketing, IT development, maintenance, hosting and support and customer service operations. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of our contractual obligations to you.
With other Users in accordance with your account settings
. You may display or make certain information available to other Users, such as your profile photo, first and last name, username, or city in accordance with your account settings. The legal basis for this processing is your consent. Please note that you can change your profile settings at any time and at no cost to you.
With financial institutions in connection with your participation in Open Banking
, for example when you initiate an account connection with another bank, card account, or aggregator. We do this to check if you have sufficient funds or confirm your ownership of the account. When you choose to link your account the legal basis for accessing your account data is performance of our contractual obligations to you.
With Partners and Merchants, their service providers and others involved in a transaction
, for example when you use the Services to initiate online purchases, save your payment information with Fastlane, pay other Users, use the Services, or return goods we may share information about you and your account or Fastlane profile with the other parties (or their service providers) involved in processing your transactions. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of our contractual obligations to you and for our legitimate interests. We may also disclose Personal Data to Partners and Merchants to enable their use of our Services to facilitate your transactions. For example, when you visit a participating Merchant site or app, the Merchant can check whether you are a user of PayPal services and present a recommended payment method to you to simplify your checkout process. If you choose to interact with participating Partners and Merchants through Fastlane, we will disclose your Fastlane profile information with the participating Partners and Merchants and their services providers, and facilitate your transaction, shopping experience or other interaction on participating Partners and Merchants sites.
Please note that Personal Data shared with Partners and Merchants (or their service providers) involved in a transaction is subject to the Partners and Merchants’ own privacy policies and procedures.  We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of Partners and Merchants.
With third parties that are independent data controllers
, for example when we share Personal Data to credit reference agencies, acquirers and other financial institutions, or security products to prevent bots from accessing our Services.
Please be aware that these parties’ privacy notice applies to the processing of Personal Data that you share directly with them
. For example, we use Google’s reCAPTCHA to prevent misuse of our Services, when you access our mobile application. Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
apply to the processing of Personal Data you share with them. For more information specific to credit reference agencies we partner to assess your creditworthiness, see Section 12, (“
Credit Reference Agency Information Notice
”).
With buyers or in connection with business transfer
, for example if we sell business or assets, we may share your Personal Data to a buyer of those business or assets. If PayPal or a significant portion of PayPal’s assets are acquired by a third party, Personal Data may also be shared. PayPal has a legitimate interest in being able to carry out these transactions.
7. How long does PayPal store your Personal Data?
We retain Personal Data for as long as needed or permitted in context of the purpose for which it was collected and consistent with applicable law.
The criteria used to determine our retention period is as follows:
Personal Data used for the ongoing relationship between you and PayPal is stored for the duration of the relationship plus a period of 10 years
Personal Data in relation to a legal obligation to which we are subject is retained consistent with the applicable law, such as under applicable bankruptcy laws and AML obligations.
We retain Personal Data for the least amount of time necessary where retention is advisable in light of litigation, investigations, audit and compliance practices, or to protect against legal claims.
8. International Transfers of Personal Data
We operate in many countries, and we (or our service providers) may move your data and process it outside the country where you live. We use third-party service providers to process and store your information in the United States and other countries. These countries do not always afford an equivalent level of privacy protection. We have taken specific steps, in accordance with UK data protection laws, to protect your Personal Data. For transfers of Personal Data from the EU within PayPal and Other Services, we rely on Binding Corporate Rules approved by competent Supervisory Authorities (available
here
). For transfers of personal data from the UK, these are based on the UK Addendum (approved by the Information Commissioner’s Office) to the EU standard contractual clauses, approved by the European Commission, to help ensure your information is afforded a high standard of protection and that your privacy rights are respected.
9. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you interact with our Services, open email we send you, or visit a third-party website for which we provide Services, we and our partners use cookies and other tracking technologies such as pixel tags, web beacons, and widgets (collectively, “
Cookies
”) to recognise you as a User, customise your online experiences and online content, including to serve you interest-based advertising, perform analytics; mitigate risk and prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Sites and Services. Certain aspects and features of our Services and Sites are only available through the use of Cookies, so if you decline certain Cookies, your use of the Sites and Services may be limited or not possible.
We use Cookies to collect your device information, internet activity information, and inferences as described above.
Cookies help us to do the following:
Remember your information so you do not have to re-enter it
Track and understand how you use and interact with our online services and emails
Tailor our online services to your preferences
Measure how useful and effective our services and communications are to you
Otherwise manage and enhance our products and services
Do Not Track (DNT) is an optional browser setting that allows you to express your preferences regarding tracking by advertisers and other third parties. At this time our Sites are not designed to respond to DNT signals or similar mechanisms from browsers.
Please review our
Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies
to learn more about our use of Cookies.
10. Your Data Protection Rights
Under applicable data protection law, you have certain rights to control our collection and use of your Personal Data. Your rights include:
Access, rectification, deletion, objection, portability, and restriction of your Personal Data
We recognize the importance of your ability to control use of your Personal Data and provide several ways for you to exercise your rights to access (right to know), rectification (correction or update), deletion (erasure), objection, portability (transferring), and to restrict process in whole or in part.
If you have an account you can exercise your data protection rights by accessing “Data and Privacy” from account settings in the PayPal app. If you, or an authorised agent, want to exercise any of your rights relating to your Personal Data in your Fastlane profile, contact us at the number provided in the Our Contact Information section or submit your request from your Fastlane profile management portal.
Even if you do not you have a PayPal account (for example, where you use Pay without a PayPal account), you can submit a request for access, modification, correction, or deletion of your information Personal Data by contacting us at the number provided in the Our Contact Information section. You can submit a request related to someone else’s information, if you are their authorised agent, by contacting us. Please note that we may require you to provide additional information for verification.
Your right to object to the Automated Decisions and profiling
If you are not approved under the Automated Decisions described below, you will not have access to our services, such as our payment methods. PayPal has several safety mechanisms to ensure the decisions are appropriate. These mechanisms include ongoing overviews of our decision models and random sampling in individual cases. If you have any concern about the outcome, you can
contact us
, and we will determine whether the procedure was performed appropriately.
You have the right to object to an Automated Decision with legal consequences or decisions which can otherwise significantly affect you (together with the relevant profiling) by
contacting us
. We will then review the decision, taking into account relevant additional circumstances.
Consent
Generally, if we use your Personal Data with your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your Personal Data conducted in reliance on a lawful processing ground other than consent.
Right to object to Direct Marketing
If we use your Personal Data for direct marketing, you can always modify your permissions, object and opt out of future direct marketing messages using the unsubscribe link in electronic communications or through your account or profile settings.
Right to object to Legitimate Interest processing
If we use your Personal Data to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third-party, you have the right to object to our use for that purpose. See Section 5 (“
What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
”)
How do you exercise your rights and how can you contact us or the data protection authority?
If you are unhappy with our processing of your Personal Data for any reason, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority for data protection in your country.
By contacting our Data Protection Officer, please see Section 18 (“
Our Contact Information
”).
You may also seek a remedy through
local courts
if you believe your rights have been breached.
You may also lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority, which in the UK is the Information Commissioner’s Office: website: https://ico.org.uk/, address: Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF.
11. Specific information about automated decision-making and profiling
“
Automated-decision making”
is the process of making a decision by fully automated means without human involvement. In some cases these decisions
could have a legal or similarly significant
effect on you as an individual. “
Profiling
” means analysis of an individual's personality, behaviour, interest and habits to make predictions or decisions about them. Where authorised under UK law or where necessary for the entry into or performance of a contract, we may in some cases use automated decision-making or profiling for decisions. An example of our use of automated decision making is evaluation of your creditworthiness to assess your suitability for certain credit products.
We believe that by making such decisions automatically, PayPal increases its objectivity and transparency in deciding which services to offer you. We deploy several safety mechanisms to ensure the decisions are appropriate. These mechanisms include ongoing overviews of our decision models and random sampling in individual cases. You can always ask for a manual decision-making process instead, express your opinion or contest decision making based solely on automated processing, including profiling, if such a decision would produce
legal effects or otherwise similarly significantly affect you
. You can find out more about how to object to these decisions in Section 10
(“Your data protection rights”)
.
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
if you require more information on our use of Automated-decision making or Profiling.
12. Why do we share your Personal Data with credit reference agencies?
If you have applied for or use our credit Services, in order to process your application, we may supply your Personal Data to credit reference agencies (CRAs) and they will give us information about you, such as your financial history. We do this to assess creditworthiness and product suitability, check your identity, trace and recover debts and prevent criminal activity.
The legal bases for such transmissions are found in Article 6, paragraph 1, letter b (contractual) and Article 6, paragraph 1, letter f (legitimate interest) of the UK General Data Protection Regulation (“UK GDPR”).
We will also continue to exchange information about you with CRAs on an ongoing basis, including about your settled accounts and any debts not fully repaid on time. This information may be supplied by CRAs to other organizations to perform similar checks and to trace your whereabouts and recover debts that you owe.
Your data will also be linked to the data of any joint applicants or other financial associates.
How to Find Out More
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
for details of which CRA we have used for a specific search.
The list of CRAs used in the UK and EEA, can be found
here
, including identities of the CRAs used in each relevant country, and a link to their privacy notice from which you can determine the ways in which they use and share Personal Data, including how long they will retain such Personal Data. You can contact the credit reference agencies operating in the country in which you live directly if you have any questions regarding their services, your credit score or the information they have stored about you, or if you wish to exercise your data subject rights towards them.
13. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Data against loss, misuse, unauthorised access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centres, and information access authorisation controls. While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s) and account/profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Data we maintain about you is accurate and current. We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Data that we share with a third-party based on an account connection that you have authorised.
14. Can Children Use Our Services?
We do not knowingly collect information, including Personal Data, from children under the age of 16 or other individuals who are not legally able to use our Sites and Services. If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Data from someone not allowed to use our Services, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data.
Please
contact us
if you believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from someone not allowed to use our Services.
15. Updates to this Privacy Statement
We revise this Privacy Statement from time to time to reflect changes to our business, Services, or applicable laws. If the revised version requires notice in accordance with applicable law, we will provide you with 30 days prior notice by posting notice of the change on the "
Policy Updates
" or "
Privacy Statement
" page of our website, otherwise the revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date. If you are a new User or are receiving this Privacy Statement for the first time and there is an upcoming change described on the
Policy Updates
or Privacy Statement page at the time you receive this Privacy Statement, such upcoming change will apply to you on the indicated effective date.
16. Users in the UK
In order to provide the PayPal Services, certain of the information we collect (as set out in this Privacy Statement) may be required to be transferred to other PayPal related companies or other entities, including those referred to in this section in their capacity as payment providers, payment processors or account holders (or similar capacities). You acknowledge that according to their local legislation, such entities may be subject to laws, regulations, inquiries, investigations, or orders which may require the disclosure of information to the relevant authorities of the relevant country.
Specifically, you acknowledge that PayPal may do any and all of the following with your information:
Disclose necessary information to: the police and other law enforcement agencies; security forces; competent governmental, intergovernmental or supranational bodies; competent agencies, departments, regulatory authorities, self-regulatory authorities or organisations and other third parties, including PayPal Group companies, that (i) we are legally compelled and permitted to comply with, including but without limitation laws implementing the US Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act (“FATCA”) and OECD Common Reporting Standard (“CRS”); (ii) we have reason to believe it is appropriate for us to cooperate with in investigations of fraud or other illegal activity or potential illegal activity, or (iii) to conduct investigations of violations of our User Agreement (including without limitation, your funding source or credit or debit card provider).
If you are covered by FATCA or CRS, we are required to give you notice of the information about you that we may transfer to various authorities.
We and other organisations, including parties that accept PayPal, may also share, access and use (including from other countries) necessary information (including, without limitation the information recorded by fraud prevention agencies) to help us and them assess and to manage risk (including, without limitation, to prevent fraud, money laundering and terrorist financing). Please contact us if you want to receive further details of the relevant fraud prevention agencies.
Disclose account Information to intellectual property right owners if under applicable law they have a claim against PayPal for an out-of-court information disclosure due to an infringement of their intellectual property rights for which PayPal Services have been used.
Disclose necessary information in response to the requirements of the credit card associations or a civil or criminal legal process.
Disclose your name and PayPal link in the PayPal user directory. Your details will be confirmed to other PayPal users in response to a user searching using your name, email address or telephone number, or part of these details. This is to ensure people make payments to the correct user. This feature can be turned off in the PayPal profile settings.
If you as a Partner and Merchant use a third party to access or integrate PayPal, we may disclose to any such third party necessary information for the purpose of facilitating and maintaining such an arrangement (including, without limitation, the status of your PayPal integration, whether you have an active PayPal account and whether you may already be working with a different PayPal integration partner).
Disclose necessary information to the payment processors, auditors, customer services providers, credit reference and fraud agencies, financial products providers, commercial partners, marketing and public relations companies, operational services providers, group companies, agencies, marketplaces and other third parties listed here. The purpose of this disclosure is to allow us to provide PayPal Services to you. We also set out in the list of third parties, under each "Category", non-exclusive examples of the actual third parties (which may include their assigns and successors) to whom we currently disclose your account information or to whom we may consider disclosing your account information, together with the purpose of doing so, and the actual information we disclose (except as explicitly stated, these third parties are limited by law or by contract from using the information for secondary purposes beyond the purposes for which the information was shared).
Disclose necessary information to your agent or legal representative (such as the holder of a power of attorney that you grant, or a guardian appointed for you).
Disclose aggregated statistical data with our business partners or for public relations. For example, we may disclose that a specific percentage of our users live in Manchester. However, this aggregated information is not tied to Personal Data.
Share necessary account information with unaffiliated third parties (listed here) for their use for the following purposes:
Fraud Prevention and Risk Management: to help prevent fraud or assess and manage risk.
Customer Service: for customer service purposes, including to help service your accounts or resolve disputes (e.g., billing or transactional).
Shipping: in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using PayPal.
Legal Compliance: to help them comply with anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing verification requirements.
Service Providers: to enable service providers under contract with us to support our business operations, such as fraud prevention, bill collection, marketing, customer service and technology services. Our contracts dictate that these service providers only use your information in connection with the services they perform for us and not for their own benefit.
17. Definitions
Device Information means data that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Site or Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device IP address; information about your device’s web browser and internet connection you use to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data.
Other Services means companies or separate brands, affiliates or subsidiaries of PayPal, Inc., and who process Personal Data in accordance with their terms of service and privacy policies. Examples include Honey Science LLC, Paidy Inc., and Hyperwallet.
Geolocation Information means information that identifies, with precise specificity, your location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through your GPS, or your device settings.
Location Information means information that identifies, with reasonable specificity, your approximate location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through GPS or Wi-Fi or cell site triangulation.
Partner and Merchant means the merchant or business that our Users transact with for the purpose of obtaining goods or services.
Pay Without a PayPal account means our Services may be accessed by individuals without using a PayPal account, a Fastlane profile, or the Unbranded Payment Services.
PayPal means PayPal UK Ltd, which offers PayPal, Xoom, Unbranded Payment Services and Fastlane profile services.
Personal Data means information that can be associated with an identified or directly or indirectly identifiable natural person. “Personal Data” can include, but is not limited to, name, postal address (including billing and shipping addresses), telephone number, email address, payment card number, other financial account information, account number, date of birth, government-issued credentials (e.g., driver’s license number, national ID, passport number), and biometrics.
Processing means any method or way that we handle Personal Data or sets of Personal Data, whether by automated means, such as by collection, recording, categorization, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, and consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction of Personal Data.
Services  means any PayPal Unbranded Payment Services, Pay Without a PayPal account, PayPal Groups, Fastlane, Xoom, credit products and services, content, features, technologies, or functions, and all related websites, applications and services offered to you by PayPal, with the exception of the Other Services. Your use of the Services includes use of our Sites.
Sites means the websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which PayPal offers the Services and which has posted or linked to this Privacy Statement.
Unbranded Payment Services means you are interacting with and making payments to Partners and Merchants using our card and/or direct debit payment services that do not carry the PayPal brand, or when you use our Braintree services.
User is any person who uses the Services as a consumer for personal or household use. For the purposes of this Notice, “User” includes “you” and “your”.
18. Our Contact Information
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
or offline at PayPal UK Ltd at 5 Fleet Place, London, United Kingdom, EC4M 7RD.
Click
here
to contact us about your PayPal Account or Service or Unbranded Payment Services.
Click
here
to contact us about your Xoom Account or Service.
To contact us about your Fastlane profile: visit your Fastlane profile management portal.
Status disclosure
PayPal UK Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) as an electronic money institution (firm reference number 994790); in relation to its regulated consumer credit activities (firm reference number 996405); and for the provision of cryptocurrency services (firm reference number 1000741). Some products and services, such as PayPal Pay in 3 and PayPal Working Capital, are not regulated by the FCA and may offer a lower level of protection. Please read product terms for further details. PayPal UK Ltd's company number is 14741686. Its registered office is 5 Fleet Place, London, United Kingdom, EC4M 7RD.
Sub-policy 7
https://mailchimp.com/legal/privacy/:
Privacy & Security
Your Privacy
Your Privacy
Protect Your Privacy
Do Not Call Policy
Privacy Statements
Privacy Statements
For Consumers
For Consumers
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
For Applicants & Employees
For Applicants & Employees
English
Français
Español
For Contingent Workers
For Contingent Workers
English
Français
Español
Intuit Financial Services
Intuit Financial Services
English
Security Center
Security Center
Our Security Practices
Account Security Checklist
Online Safety Tips
Security Notices
Responsible Disclosure
Responsible AI
FAQ
hide
Contact Us
Privacy & Security
Your Privacy
Protect Your Privacy
Do Not Call Policy
Privacy Statements
For Consumers
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
For Applicants & Employees
English
Français
Español
For Contingent Workers
English
Français
Español
Intuit Financial Services
English
Security Center
Our Security Practices
Account Security Checklist
Online Safety Tips
Security Notices
Responsible Disclosure
Responsible AI
FAQ
hide
Contact Us
GLOBAL PRIVACY STATEMENTS
You deserve transparency into our data use
Select your preferred language
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
Intuit Global Privacy Statement
Last Updated: September 8, 2024
See previous Privacy Statements
Expand All
Collapse All
Scope of this Privacy Statement and our role
Intuit responsibly leverages technology to power prosperity around the world. We believe that everyone has a right to privacy. As a financial services and technology company, we’re providing this Global Privacy Statement (
“Privacy Statement”
) to explain how we, Intuit Inc. and the
Intuit group companies
(collectively
“Intuit,” “we,” “us,” or “our”
), collect, use, share, or otherwise process information that we collect through our services. These services include, as applicable, our websites, mobile applications, social media pages, marketing activities, and other activities described in this Privacy Statement, or when other businesses provide us your personal information (collectively, the
“Services”
). This Privacy Statement is global, meaning it applies to all Intuit Services. We may provide additional or supplemental privacy statements for certain products or services.
This Privacy Statement describes our privacy practices when we process:
Personal information for the purposes of preparing a tax return or in connection with the preparation of a tax return (collectively, “
Tax Preparation Information
”) as part of providing TurboTax tax preparation services;
Personal information for the purposes of providing the benefits of our websites and the Intuit platform, which includes all of Intuit’s services, sites, experiences and software (including through our mobile applications and desktop applications) other than Tax Preparation Information (the “
Intuit Platform
”); and
Personal information as necessary to manage, run, improve, and develop our business and personalize your experience while interacting with the Intuit Platform. Depending on your settings, this may include showing you personalized ads or recommending certain Intuit products based on your interests.
Intuit determines the purposes and means of the processing of your personal information as described in this Privacy Statement, and therefore acts as a ‘data controller’ (or equivalent/similar terms under applicable data privacy laws) of such information. We may share your personal information within the
Intuit group companies
and conduct processing activities as controllers or joint controllers for the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement.
In certain circumstances, there may be more than one data controller processing your personal information. For example, your employer or a financial partner may also act as a data controller. In these situations, we act as an independent data controller over our processing activities. This means we determine how your personal information will be processed independently from the other data controllers. The other data controllers have their own obligations under applicable data privacy laws. Intuit is not responsible for other data controllers’ processing activities, and you should contact them directly for questions about how they process your personal information and about how to exercise your privacy rights in relation to such processing.
This Privacy Statement does not apply to certain processing activities where we are not the controller. For example, where Intuit processes personal information as a processor or service provider on behalf of our customers, including when we process personal information on behalf of customers of our professional tax software products. When we act as a processor or service provider, the privacy statement of the customer who uses our Services applies, instead of this Privacy Statement, and our processing of such personal information is governed by our agreements with such customers. If you have concerns about personal information that we process on behalf of a customer, or wish to exercise your privacy rights regarding such personal information, please contact the customer directly.
This Privacy Statement also does not apply to Intuit Financial Services or Intuit’s processing of education records subject to state or federal laws or children’s data in our education curriculum products. You may find the privacy statement for Intuit Financial Services
here
, and the privacy statement for Intuit for Education
here
.
If you have any questions about how Intuit processes your personal information, please see How to contact us below.
The Intuit platform
The Intuit Platform and your personal information
When we say “platform,” we mean that when you choose to share data with us, or bring over information from third parties (like a bank or loan provider), Intuit uses that data together, not just within the individual offering(s) you’re using. This means that, for example, we may use your bookkeeping details from QuickBooks, contact and purchase history details from Mailchimp, and/or recommendations from Credit Karma. The personal information we use in this centralized way may relate to you as an end user of our Services or as a customer or vendor of an Intuit customer whose personal information has been included in the Intuit Platform.
Business account information
Some experiences and services within the Intuit Platform allow you to interact with a business (such as your employer). If you are granted access to a business account (for example, in QuickBooks), the business owner or a designated administrator may control and administer details of your account, for example, by deciding your access rights; making decisions about your personal information (such as details about your payroll); or requiring you to take certain actions (for example, use location tracking to clock in for a shift). If the owner or designated administrator changes your access rights, then you may lose access to the information the business controls.
Your use of the Intuit Platform as part of a business account may be subject to the business’s policies, which may differ from this Privacy Statement. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of other businesses, and you should consider both the business’s policies and whether you are comfortable giving the business access to your personal information before connecting to their services.
Personal information we collect
The personal information that we collect or otherwise receive about you depends on the context of your interactions with Intuit, how you configure your account, and the choices you make, including your privacy settings. The way we process your personal information may also depend on the particular Services, functionalities, or experiences you use, your location, and applicable law.
Information you provide to us
You may provide us with your information as follows:
Contact data and account profile data.
We collect information when you (or your organization) create an account, activate a subscription, and/or upload information to the Intuit Platform. Personal information may include your name, previous name(s) and/or nicknames, title and honorifics, professional title and company name, education, billing and mailing addresses, phone number and email address, profile photo, billing information (your payment information), purchase history, demographic information, preferences, subscription data, and your username and account credentials.
Identity verification information.
We collect information to verify your identity, including your name, date of birth, social security number, social insurance number, driver’s license number, passport number, government-issued identification details, and similar information to verify your identity and to help you file your tax return.
Communications, feedback and survey data, and related data.
We may collect personal information such as your name, email address, telephone number and any other personal information you choose to share when you reach out to us for support, give us feedback, participate in optional surveys, attend our events, participate in product research or training, or otherwise interact or communicate with us. This information may include: call center recordings and call monitoring records, chat and text records, voicemails, photographs, and video images.
Marketing data.
You may provide us with your contact information and preferences for receiving marketing communications.
Social and community content.
We receive content you post on our social media pages and our community pages.
Business and financial information.
We may receive information about your business, your finances, expenses, invoices, financial statements, details of your financial transactions, payroll details, payment details, tax return details, details about your customers, vendors, or employees, income and wage information, and/or investment information.
Interactions with experts.
The Intuit Platform provides many opportunities for you to connect with live experts, including, for example, accountants or tax preparers. When you interact with these experts, we may receive information about the questions you ask, the details of your accounts, and the guidance provided to you.
Interactions with chatbots.
We may receive information from you through your use of chatbots, digital assistants, or other interactive bots across the Intuit Platform.
Device and contact data.
If you grant permission in your device settings, certain features may have access to your device and contacts.
Business connection data.
We may collect information about you when you interact with the Intuit Platform through our customers. If you are a customer, vendor or prospect of an Intuit customer and interact with the Intuit Platform (for example, to pay an invoice, make a purchase, interact with an email, provide contact details or complete a survey), we will use this information to make recommendations about you to our customers. Our customers may also provide business connection data directly about you to us; this is described below under ‘Other users’.
Third-party sources
The Intuit Platform is designed to help you connect with other people and businesses. As a result of those connections, others may be able to input personal information about you, including other customers using the Intuit Platform. For example, an Intuit customer may share personal information about you with us in order to use and benefit from the Intuit Platform. You also may be able to input or process personal information about others, for example, if you are an account administrator of one of our products or use Intuit to manage customer lists. If you input information about others into the Platform, you must only do so if you have first provided sufficient notice and received any required permissions, and have an appropriate legal basis if required by applicable law.
We may also receive personal information about you from other third parties where you have provided consent or where permitted by applicable law. We protect and process the personal information obtained from those third parties as described in this Privacy Statement, consistent with any additional restrictions imposed by the source of the information. Our third-party sources may vary over time and depend upon how you use the Intuit Platform. For example, we receive information from:
Linked third-party services.
If you choose to sync a non-Intuit account/service with your Intuit account, we will receive information from that account/service according to your settings with that account/service. This may include details of your bank account information, social media information, purchase history or your business’s sales records through a point of sale application.
Supplemental information and identity verification providers.
We work with certain third parties to help us verify your identity, the specifics of your business, and/or supplement the personal information you have provided and ensure the accuracy of your personal information. For example, we use third-party providers to validate your contact information (e.g., name, mailing address, email address, phone number) or to provide additional details about your business. These providers may include, for example, your financial institution, telecommunications provider, or email provider.
Customer support providers.
We receive personal information about you or your interaction with the Intuit Platform from certain third parties for troubleshooting purposes. For example, we may obtain information about your interaction(s) with customer support and information about technical issues you have raised, including call center recordings, call monitoring records, voicemails, photographs and chat records.
Credit bureaus and related third parties.
Many Intuit features rely on information we receive from credit bureaus and related third parties. For example, in some countries, we may offer free credit reports and credit scores. We request these reports and credit scores on your behalf from credit bureau partners, like TransUnion, Experian and Equifax. These partners may also provide personal information such as employment or income data, social security number, vehicle or driver information, or information about special offers available based on your credit profile so we can make more personalized recommendations for you.
Other users.
As described above, we may receive personal information about you from other Intuit Platform users, such as your accountant, bookkeeper, tax preparer, spouse, employer, or other business customers using the Intuit Platform (e.g., businesses from which you buy products or services, or with which you otherwise interact). We may also collect such personal information through features like member referral programs.
Risk management, cybersecurity & anti-fraud providers.
We may receive personal information from third parties that help us assess risks associated with our offerings, including to help combat fraud and illegal activity and to help protect your personal information.
Data providers.
We may receive information from information services and data licensors that provide demographic and preference information to us.
Content providers.
We may receive personal information from companies that make user-generated content from their service available to others, such as local business reviews or public social media posts.
Joint offering partners.
We may offer co-branded services or experiences or engage in joint-marketing activities with others, including through our conferences or live events.
Government agencies.
We receive information from government agencies, including from various tax agencies, such as your tax filing confirmation from the IRS.
Public information.
We collect individual and household demographic information and preference information from publicly available sources, such as open government databases, social media platforms, and others.
Automatic data collection
We, our service providers, and our business partners may automatically log personal information about you, your computer or mobile device, and your interaction over time with the Services, such as:
Device information.
We may collect information about your device(s) such as IP addresses, log information, error messages, device type, and unique device identifiers. For example, we may collect IP addresses from you as part of our sign in and security features.
Usage information.
We may collect information about your use of the Intuit Platform, such as the pages you viewed, the services and features you used or interacted with, your browser type, and details about any links or communications with which you interacted.
Location information.
Certain features in the Intuit Platform may collect your precise location information, device motion information, or both, if you or your organization grant(s) us permission to do so through your device settings (for example, if you use QuickBooks’ time-tracking service, participate in Karma Drive, or use CK Money to locate nearby ATMs).
Information stored locally.
Some of our web-enabled desktop services and offerings synchronize with the information on your computer. In doing so, we may collect information such as device information, product usage, and error reports. We may also store personal information locally on your device.
Communication interaction data.
We or our third-party service providers may collect information from email providers, communication providers and social networks, such as your interactions with our email, text or other communications (e.g., whether you open and/or forward emails) – we may do this through use of pixel tags (which are also known as clear GIFs), which may be embedded invisibly in our emails.
Online behavioral data
. We may automatically collect certain personal information about your use and interactions with our websites, customers’ websites or e-commerce stores, social media websites, and marketing campaigns that we or our customers organize, including device information (such as your IP address and unique device IDs), page view information and search results, links, and if you are a customer contact, whether or not a campaign presented or sent to you using our offerings has been viewed, delivered, opened, clicked on, whether it has bounced or was treated as spam.
Cookies and similar technologies
Intuit and our service providers may use commonly used tools such as cookies, web beacons, pixels, local shared objects and similar technologies (collectively “cookies”) to collect information about you (“
Cookie Information
”) so we can provide the experiences you request, recognize your visit, track your interactions, and improve your and other customers’ experiences. For example, we may use session-replay technologies,
such as those provided by FullStory and Medallia, that employ software code to record users’ interactions with the Services in a manner that allows us to watch video replays of those user sessions. The replays include users’ clicks, mobile app touches, mouse movements, scrolls and keystrokes/key touches during those sessions. These replays help us diagnose usability problems and identify areas for improvement. You can learn more about FullStory at
https://www.fullstory.com/legal/privacy-policy
and you can opt-out of session recording by FullStory at
https://www.fullstory.com/optout/
. You can learn more about Medallia at
https://www.medallia.com/privacy-policy/
.
You have control over some of the information we collect from Cookies and how we use it. Please see Your Personal Information Rights and Choices section for more information. For full details on how we use cookies and similar technologies please see our
Intuit Cookie Policy
. For full details on how we use cookies and similar technologies when you use or interact with our Mailchimp offerings, please also see our
Mailchimp Cookie Statement.
Biometric Information
Certain parts of the Intuit Platform make use of biometric personal information (“
Biometric Information
“). We will not collect your Biometric Information without first providing notice and obtaining your consent. For more details about how we use Biometric Information, please see our
Biometric Notice
.
How we use personal information
We may use your personal information in a number of ways or as otherwise described at the time of collection:
Service delivery and operations. We may use your personal information to:
Provide you with the Intuit Platform, create your account and manage our relationship with you
Run and manage our business, including resolving billing and financial disputes
Evaluate your eligibility for marketing offers, products and services
Provide features to you, such as your free credit reports and scores
Provide a product or service that you have requested through the Intuit Platform
Connect you with experts and other users
Communicate with you, such as sending you electronic notifications concerning your financial privacy
Understand your needs and interests, and personalize your experience with the Services and our communications.
Provide you with support and resolve disputes
Authenticate your identity
Manage event registrations and attendance, including sending related communications to you
Register visitors to our offices for security reasons and manage non-disclosure agreements that visitors may be required to sign
Research and development. We may use your personal information to:
Improve and develop our products and services by analyzing how they are used and interacted with, by training our artificial intelligence models and other machine learning models, as well as by assessing the use of and interactions with our Platform and certain content our customers send or display through the Platform, including by conducting data analytics to develop insights about you, your needs, and your preferences, so we can make more informed predictions, recommendations, and products for our customers.
Please note any data obtained through Google Workspace APIs is not used to develop, improve, or train any generalized AI and/or ML models. Any data originating from the Google Workspace API is instead ingested only by Intuit’s and our third-party providers’ artificial intelligence tools to deliver services on the customer’s behalf and to ensure safety, not for model retraining.
Combine and anonymize information about your interactions with Intuit to create aggregate, anonymized statistics for use in research (including by contracting with academic institutions) and for marketing, promoting, improving, and developing our platform.
Marketing and advertising. We, our service providers and our third-party advertising partners may collect and use your personal information for marketing and advertising purposes to:
Market services, products and experiences, including to deliver gifts and promotional materials, product recommendations and other non-transactional communications via email, post, telephone, SMS or push notifications, in accordance with your marketing preferences.
Personalize your experience and tailor recommendations, advertising, and offers presented to you, including through the development of insights about you and your needs based on your interactions with the Intuit Platform’s products, services, and offerings. These advertisements may be displayed to you on Intuit’s digital properties, including our websites and mobile apps, media platforms, connected devices, or other third-party platforms and channels.
Whistleblower Reporting.
When you report any concern of non-compliance, unethical conduct, or other alleged violation of our
Code of Conduct and Ethics
, personal information you provide will be processed as a part of the investigation of the allegations and retained in accordance with our internal policies until the investigation is complete. While we make every effort to maintain confidentiality, depending on the investigation, disclosing your identity to other individuals may be necessary.
Compliance and protection. We may use your personal information to:
Protect against misuse or abuse of our Services and ensure compliance with our Terms of Service, including in relation to content our customers send or display through the Platform
Comply with legal and regulatory requirements
Protect the rights, property, safety or security of the Intuit Platform, our customers, employees or others and prevent fraudulent or illegal activity
Exercise our rights in the course of judicial, administrative, or arbitration proceedings
Enforce, remedy, or apply our Terms of Service or other agreements
With your consent.
In some cases, we may specifically ask for your consent to use your personal information, such as when required by law.
We may process your personal information for other purposes that are compatible with the above purposes where permitted by applicable law.
Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Automated processing
When you use or interact with features on the Intuit Platform like chatbots, digital assistants, or other digital conversational experiences powered by artificial intelligence, we may process your personal information using automated and manual (human) methods. For example, when we use automated processing on your personal information to provide a more personalized and enhanced experience in the Intuit Platform, you may see instantly tailored recommendations and insights to manage your cash flow and grow your business. Or when we analyze personal information and transactions we have collected or received about you, we can provide you with personalized advice, predictions, recommendations and experiences, including showing your largest tax deductions, sharing how to get your largest tax refund, and providing personalized recommendations for credit products. Certain laws may provide you with the right to object to the automated processing of your personal information. Please review these rights in the “Region and state-specific terms” section below.
How we share your personal information
When you interact with our services.
We may share your personal information in the following circumstances:
For certain product features
. We may use third party API services, such as YouTube and Twilio, for certain product features. If you choose to use those features, you acknowledge and agree that you are also bound by the third party’s privacy policy. You may manage your YouTube API data by visiting Google’s security settings page
here
. You may make choices about your Twilio API data by visiting Twilio’s privacy notice
here
.
When you connect with an Intuit Platform partner.
You may be provided with offers, products, and services from third-party companies who integrate with our Intuit Platform. If you choose to interact with a platform partner, apply for their services or offerings, or otherwise link or sync your account to a platform partner’s product or service, you consent and direct us to share your personal information to the platform partner providing the service or offering. For example, when we send your personal information to partners in order to generate offers for you to review, when we send your application information directly to our partners, or when we send you to the partner’s site for you to provide the information directly to them.
In some cases, if you click through to go to a platform partner’s site, you will automatically be sending your personal information to that platform partner. When this happens, you will still have to submit your application on the platform partner’s site. Remember that any information you provide to a platform partner, whether through us or on your own, will be subject to their privacy practices and terms and conditions.
When you connect to your social media account.
Some of our features enable you to connect to a social media account or share information on social media platforms, like Facebook and Twitter. Any information you choose to share on social media may potentially be visible to a global audience and will be subject to the social media provider’s privacy policies (not this Privacy Statement). You should take care only to share information on social media that you are comfortable sharing.
For joint features, sales, promotions and events.
With your consent we may share your personal information with third parties who are jointly providing features, sales initiatives, promotions or events with us.
When you publicly post the information.
We may provide opportunities for you to publicly post reviews, questions, comments, suggestions, or other content that may include personal information, such as your name or username. Anything you share in a public forum is public, and you should think carefully before you decide to share.
With your wireless carrier.
When you use your wireless device in connection with the Intuit Platform, you authorize your wireless carrier to use or disclose information about your account and your wireless device, if available, to Intuit or its service provider for the duration of your business relationship, solely to help them identify you or your wireless device and to prevent fraud.
When you participate in the short code program
. Personal information collected through the short code program (i.e., when you sign up for SMS texts), will not be shared, sold, or rented to affiliated or unaffiliated third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Other circumstances.
We also share your personal information with third parties in the following circumstances.
For research.
With appropriate controls, we may share information with third parties, such as academic institutions, government and non-profit organizations, for research purposes or to publish academic or policy-related materials. We only share information in a way that does not identify any individual.
With financial services providers.
In connection with our financial products, we may share personal information with collection agencies, credit bureaus and loan services providers, and payment card association members. We may also share your personal information with other companies, lawyers, credit bureaus, agents, government agencies, and card associations in connection with issues related to fraud, credit, defaults, or debt collection.
With service providers or agents.
We share personal information with our service providers or agents who provide services on our behalf for the purposes described in this Privacy Statement. Service providers or agents are required to implement reasonable privacy and information protection controls to maintain the privacy and security of information provided to them consistent with the privacy practices outlined in this Privacy Statement. Service providers or agents may include companies that assist us with our advertising, marketing, and sales efforts, help us with our technology offerings (such as a hosting, security or anti-fraud providers) and help us run our business. Service providers or agents also include AI providers, including generative AI providers.
For mergers and acquisitions.
If we are involved with a merger, asset sale, financing, liquidation, bankruptcy, or the acquisition of all or part of our business to another company, we may share your personal information with that company and its advisors before and after the transaction date.
With our affiliates and subsidiaries and your right to limit information sharing.
We may share your personal information with our affiliates and subsidiaries for everyday business purposes as described in this Statement, including for marketing purposes, for improving and developing our offerings, and for personalizing your experience on our Platform. Certain laws may provide you with the right to limit our information sharing activities in certain circumstances. Please review these rights in the “Region and state-specific terms” section below.
For advertising and analytics.
Intuit may use advertising networks and other providers to display advertising on our Intuit Platform or on other sites. Intuit may share personal information with advertising networks and other providers to tailor advertising and offers presented to you based on your interactions with the Intuit Platform’s products, services, and offerings. Our advertising partners may place cookies on unaffiliated websites in order to serve advertisements that may be relevant to you based on your browsing activities and interests and determine the effectiveness of such advertisements. See also the “Region and state-specific terms” section below for additional information.
Intuit (excluding Credit Karma) responds to the Global Privacy Control signal for US residents, as described further in the United States section below. However, we do not respond to “Do Not Track” signals because there is no formal “Do Not Track” standard.
For legal reasons.
We may share your personal information with third parties for legal reasons without your consent, and as permitted by law, including:
When we reasonably believe disclosure is required in order to comply with a subpoena, court order, or other applicable law, regulation or legal process;
To protect the rights, property, or safety of Intuit, TurboTax, the Intuit Platform, our customers or others;
To protect or defend against attacks;
To enforce, remedy, or apply our Terms of Service or other agreements;
To prevent fraud, cybersecurity attacks or illegal activity;
For debt collection; and
With regulatory agencies, including government tax agencies, as necessary to help detect and combat fraud and/or protect our customers, users and/or the Intuit Platform, or in required institutional risk control programs.
Your personal information rights and choices
Your choices
At Intuit, we believe that you have choices about information that pertains to you or your business.
We provide all customers, including those in the EU, UK (and Gibraltar), and Switzerland, with options to manage the privacy of their personal information.
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Correct your personal information.
You can edit and correct certain personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Access your personal information.
You may download a copy of the personal information we have about you by visiting your account, the
Intuit Privacy Center
, or by calling us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
(for US members), the
Credit Karma UK Help Centre
(for Credit Karma UK members), or the
Credit Karma Canada Help Centre
(for Credit Karma Canada members). If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Delete your personal information.
You may ask us to delete your personal information by visiting your account settings or the
Intuit Privacy Center
or calling us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
(for US members), the
Credit Karma UK Help Centre
(for Credit Karma UK members), or the
Credit Karma Canada Help Centre
(for Credit Karma Canada members). If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, please visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of interest based advertising by visiting the
NAI Opt-Out Page
or the
Choices Opt-Out Page
(or the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada Opt-Out Page
, if you are based in Canada) or by visiting the
Intuit Privacy Center
. If you reside in California, Connecticut, Colorado, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah or Virginia, please refer to the relevant sections below under Region and state-specific terms for more information about opting out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes,or opting-out of sales and/or sharing.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings or you may use the links below. You may also unsubscribe using the link found at the bottom of all marketing and promotional emails. If you receive marketing text messages from us through Intuit’s SMS shortcode program, you may opt out of receiving further marketing text messages from us by replying STOP to the message.
For more information, please visit:
Intuit
communications preferences
Credit Karma US
and
Credit Karma UK
communications preferences
Mailchimp
communications preferences
Your Rights
Depending on where you live, you may also have certain state- or country-specific rights with respect to your personal information. Please see the Region and state-specific terms section for your country, below.
Verification
To help protect privacy and the security of your personal information, you may be asked to provide additional information to verify your identity and/or ownership rights before we can fulfill your data rights request. If we cannot verify your identity or your ownership rights to the data, we may not be able to service your request until you provide proper documentation.
Data retention
Unless you specifically ask us to delete your personal information, we retain your personal information as long as it is necessary to comply with our data retention requirements and provide you with services and the benefits of the Intuit Platform and successfully run our business. Even if you submit a deletion request, we may be required to maintain your personal information for as long as necessary to:
comply with our legal or regulatory compliance needs (e.g., maintaining records of transactions you have made with us);
to exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and/or
to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on our service.
This means we may keep different information for different periods. If your account is canceled because you haven’t used it for a long time, we may delete this information immediately.
There may be occasions where we are unable to fully delete, anonymize, or de-identify your personal information due to technical, legal, regulatory compliance, or other operational reasons. Where this is the case, we will take reasonable measures to securely isolate your personal information from any further processing until such time as we are able to delete, anonymize, or de-identify it.
International data transfers
Unless you have provided us with consent to transfer your personal information, US Tax Preparation Information shall be processed and stored in the United States in accordance with applicable law.
With the exception noted above, Intuit reserves the right to store and process your personal information in the United States and in any other country where Intuit or its affiliates, subsidiaries, or service providers operate facilities in accordance with and as permitted by applicable laws and regulations. Some of these countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective).
When we transfer, store or process personal information outside of your jurisdiction (including to or in the United States, as described above), we take appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information remain protected in accordance with this Privacy Statement and applicable law.
Some of these recipients of your personal information are located in countries for which the European Commission, the UK (and Gibraltar) Government, and the Swiss Government (as and where applicable) have issued adequacy decisions, which means that these countries are recognized as providing an adequate level of data protection under applicable UK (and Gibraltar), European, and Swiss data protection laws and the transfer is therefore permitted under Article 45 of the GDPR.
Other recipients of your personal information are located in countries outside the EEA and/or the UK that are not the subject of an adequacy decision. In these cases, we may use the Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission or, as may be applicable, the International Data Transfer Agreement approved by the UK Government, to help ensure your personal information is protected. For more information on the transfer safeguards we rely on, please contact us by using the details in the “How to contact us” section below.
Intuit (excluding Credit Karma) and Mailchimp comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Union (EU), the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar), and Switzerland to the United States. Intuit and Mailchimp rely on the EU-U.S. DPF to transfer data and will rely on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF once approved by the appropriate authorities. We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission. You can find more information about Intuit’s and Mailchimp’s Data Privacy Framework certification
here
.
Security of your personal information
We use reasonable physical, technical and organizational safeguards that are designed to protect your personal information. However, despite these controls, we cannot completely ensure or warrant the security of your personal information. You can find out more about how we protect your personal information
here
.
Changes to our Privacy Statements
From time to time we may change or update our Privacy Statement. We reserve the right to make changes or updates at any time. If we make material changes to the way we process your personal information, we will notify you by posting a notice in the Intuit Platform or on a community post; by sending you a notification; or by other means consistent with applicable law.
You can see when this Privacy Statement was last updated by checking the “last updated” date at the top of this Privacy Statement. Please review this Privacy Statement periodically to stay informed about how Intuit protects your privacy.
Children
Our services are not intended for or directed to children under the age of 13. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children. If you believe we may have information from a child, please contact us.
How to contact us
If you have questions or comments about this Privacy Statement or our practices, please contact us.
You can submit Intuit privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
You can submit Credit Karma privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
You can submit Mailchimp privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
If you have an unresolved privacy or information use concern or complaint that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Region and state-specific terms
Additional terms may apply to you based upon the country you reside in or the products you use. Please click the region or state that applies to you to learn more about additional terms and rights that may apply to you.
Expand All
Collapse All
United States
If you are a resident of the United States, you may have the following rights and choices:
US Tax Preparation Information
Except as necessary to provide you with tax preparation services or as authorized by law, we will not use or disclose your Tax Preparation Information – including to Intuit’s affiliates and subsidiaries – unless you consent.
If you agree to share your Tax Preparation Information for purposes other than tax preparation services, including by sharing it with the Intuit Platform, your Tax Preparation Information will be handled in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act
Intuit is a financial institution subject to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA).
By using, accessing, or interacting with the Intuit Platform, you are consenting to receive notices about your financial privacy electronically.
Please find our GLBA Notice
here
.
California Residents
Scope.
This section applies only to California residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Information of California residents in our capacity as a “business” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”) and your rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, the term “
Personal Information
” has the meaning given in the CCPA, but does not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of personal information and certain Intuit companies from all or certain parts of the CCPA, such as information subject to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA) and other data protection laws. In some cases, we may provide a different privacy notice to certain categories of California residents, such as employees and job applicants, in which case that notice will apply instead of this section.
Personal Information that we collect, use, and disclose.
The chart
here
summarizes the Personal Information we collect by reference to the categories of Personal Information specified in the CCPA, and describes our practices currently and during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Statement. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described in this chart.
Your California privacy rights. As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Access.
You may request that we provide the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information during the past 12 months:
○              the categories of Personal Information we have collected about you,
○              the sources from which that information was collected,
○              the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, and/or sharing your Personal Information,
○              the categories of personal information we shared or sold about you,
○              the categories of third parties to whom we shared or sold personal information about you,
○              the categories of personal information we disclosed for a business purpose, and
○              the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed personal information about you for a business purpose.
Request a copy of your Personal Information.
You may request a copy of the Personal Information in
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Correction.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the personal information you have provided to us. You may delete your personal information in the Privacy section of
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Opt-out of Sales and/or Sharing.
Like many companies, Intuit and Mailchimp use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you as described above. The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) may classify our use of some of these services as “sharing” your Personal Information with the advertising partners that provide the services. You can opt-out of the “sharing” of your personal information by visiting the “Your California Privacy Rights” link in the footer of the Intuit website.
In addition, if you have enabled a recognized opt-out mechanism on your browser, device, or platform, you will automatically be opted out of any “sharings” when you interact with our Services. Please go here to learn more about enabling one such preference signal, the Global Privacy Control:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#download
. Intuit and Mailchimp do not sell personal information under the CCPA. Credit Karma does not sell or share personal information subject to the CCPA, and therefore does not offer a “Your California Privacy Rights” link on its website. We do not knowingly sell or share the personal information of individuals under 16 years of age.
Limit processing of sensitive personal information.
Some of the personal information that we may collect are considered sensitive personal information under the CCPA. We collect sensitive personal information for the purposes allowed by law or with your consent. We only use sensitive personal information as necessary for our (1) Service delivery and operations, (2) compliance and protection, (3) research and development, or (4) Service improvement and analytics purposes in accordance with CCPA. If we use sensitive personal information outside the permitted purposes of the CCPA, we will provide you with the right to limit processing of sensitive personal information.
California Shine the Light.
Customers who are California residents may request certain information concerning the categories of personal information (if any) we disclose to third parties or affiliates for their direct marketing purposes. If you would like more information, please submit a written request to us using the contact information provided below.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination or retaliation related to your exercise of any of your California privacy rights.
Verification.
In order to protect your personal information from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional personal information for verification. For Credit Karma members, we may require that you confirm certain pieces of personal information that we have on file and/or log into your Credit Karma account. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
Authorized agents.
You may use an authorized agent to submit a rights request. If you do so, the authorized agent must present signed written authorization to act on your behalf, and you will also be required to independently verify your own identity directly with us and confirm with us that you provided the authorized agent permission to submit the rights request. This verification process is not necessary if your authorized agent provides documentation showing that the authorized agent has power of attorney to act on your behalf under Cal. Prob. Code §§ 4121 to 4130.
Learn more about instructions for authorized agents.
We may deny a request from an agent that does not submit adequate proof that they have been authorized by you to act on your behalf.
Transparency matters.
Learn more about the requests we process by viewing our
Privacy Rights Transparency Report
.
Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia Residents
Scope.
This section applies only to the residents of Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, and Virginia. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Data of state residents described in this subsection in our capacity as a business or controller under the corresponding state privacy laws, including Colorado Privacy Rights Act, Connecticut Data Privacy Act, Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act, Oregon Consumer Privacy Act, Texas Data Privacy and Security Act, Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (collectively, “Applicable State Privacy Laws”), and your rights with respect to that Personal Data. For purposes of this section, the term “Personal Data” has the meaning given in the Applicable State Privacy Laws but does not include information or entities exempted from the scope of the Applicable State Privacy Laws, such as those subject to GLBA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of personal information and certain Intuit companies from all or certain parts of the Applicable State Privacy Laws.
Personal Information that we collect, use, and disclose
. The chart
here
summarizes the Personal Information we collect and describes our practices currently and during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Statement. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described in this chart.
Your privacy rights.
As a resident of Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah or Virginia, you may have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Access
. You may request a copy of the Personal Information in
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Correction
. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the personal information you have provided to us. You may delete your personal information in the Privacy section of
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes
. You can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Manage Cookies” or “Privacy Settings” link in the footer of the Intuit website. For Mailchimp, you can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Cookie Preferences” link in the footer of the
Mailchimp website
. Intuit, Mailchimp and Credit Karma do not otherwise “sell your Personal Data to third parties for monetary consideration.
Opt-out of profiling
. You can opt-out of the automated processing of your Personal Data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements, to the extent this results in decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects.
Sensitive Personal Data
. Some of the personal information that we may collect may be considered sensitive personal information under certain state privacy laws. We will not process your sensitive personal data without your consent.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination related to your exercise of any of your privacy rights.
Appeal
. If we decline to take action on any request that you submit in connection with the rights described above, you may ask that we reconsider our response by submitting a written request to us using the contact information provided below. We will inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the appeal is denied, we will also provide you with an online mechanism, if available, or other method through which you may contact your state attorney general’s office to submit a complaint.
Authentication.
In order to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect that your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional personal information for verification. For Credit Karma members, we may require that you confirm certain pieces of personal information that we have on file and/or log into your Credit Karma account. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
Transparency matters.
Learn more about the requests we process by viewing our
Privacy Rights Transparency Report
.
United States contact information:
Intuit Inc.
Attention: Privacy
2800 E Commerce Center Place
Tucson, AZ 85706
You can contact the Intuit Data Protection Officer
here.
Credit Karma LLC
Attention: Legal Department
PO Box 30963
Oakland CA 94604
legal@creditkarma.com
Mailchimp
The Rocket Science Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp
Attn: Privacy Officer
405 North Angier Ave. NE,
Atlanta, GA 30308
You can contact the Mailchimp Data Protection Officer
here
.
Australia
If you are a resident of Australia, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services. To make a request for access or deletion of your personal information, contact us through the link below.
Objection and Restriction.
You may object to our processing of your personal information, including for marketing purposes, or ask us to restrict processing of your personal information. To object to data processing or request a restriction, contact us through the link below. If you request that we stop processing some or all of your personal information or you withdraw (where applicable) your consent for our use or disclosure of your personal information for purposes set out in this privacy notice, we might not be able to provide you all of the Services and customer support offered to our users and authorized under this Notice.
Australia contact information:
Visit the QuickBooks Australia website to learn how to contact their support team.
Go to QuickBooks Australia
Intuit Australia Pty. Limited
Level 34, 1 O'Connell St.
Sydney, NSW 2000 Australia
Canada
While we take steps to maintain protection of your personal information, your personal information may be disclosed in response to valid demands or requests from governments, regulators, courts and law enforcement authorities in those other jurisdictions or countries.
If you are a resident of Canada, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings. You may also click unsubscribe at the bottom of the marketing emails.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of interest based advertising by visiting the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada Opt-Out Page
,
NAI Opt-Out Page
and the
Choices Opt-Out Page
.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may make a request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information (provided we no longer have a business need to retain your personal information). You may request a copy of the Personal Information or delete the personal information in
your Intuit account
. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services. Even if you request for your personal information to be deleted, certain aspects may be retained for us to: meet our legal or regulatory compliance (e.g. maintaining records of transactions you have made with us); exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on the Intuit Platform. Data retained for these purposes will be handled as described in “Data Retention”.
Withdraw consent.
You can withdraw your consent at any time to collection, use and disclosure of your personal information. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint.
You have the right to file a complaint with the applicable Privacy Commissioner about our collection and processing of your personal information.
Canada contact information:
Intuit Canada
Attention: Privacy
8 Spadina Ave.
Suite 1900
Toronto, Ontario
M5V 0S8
You can contact the Intuit Data Protection Officer
here
.
Credit Karma LLC
Attention: Privacy Officer
PO Box 30963
Oakland CA 94604
legal@creditkarma.com
If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, you can visit the
Credit Karma Help Centre
.
You can also email the Credit Karma Canada Privacy Officer by writing to
legal@creditkarma.ca
.
The Rocket Science Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp
Attn: Privacy Officer
405 North Angier Ave. NE,
Atlanta, GA 30308 USA
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you can visit the
Mailchimp Help Centre
,
or submit a question
here
.
India
Where data of Indian individuals are involved, you hereby agree that the “reasonable security practices and procedures” under section 43A Explanation (ii) of the Information Technology Act, 2000 means this Intuit’s Privacy Statement and such data security procedures that Intuit may implement from time to time and which may, in Intuit’s discretion, be informed to you from time to time.
What you can do to manage your privacy
You have choices when it comes to managing the privacy of your personal information.
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings.
Correct your personal information.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
India contact information
Visit the QuickBooks India website to learn how to contact their support team.
Go to QuickBooks India
Intuit Technology Services Private Limited
Campus 4A, PrITech Park (Ecospace)
7th and 8th Floor, Belandur Village
Varthur Hobli, Bangalore East Taluk
Bangalore - 560 103 India
United Kingdom (and Gibraltar)(UK), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland
Personal Information
References to “personal information” in this Privacy Statement are equivalent to “personal data” governed by EU and UK data protection laws. Essentially, “personal data” is information about an individual, where that individual is either directly identified or can be identified. It does not include ‘anonymous data’ (i.e., information where the identity of an individual has been permanently removed).
Legal Basis of Processing
We use your personal information only as permitted by law. Applicable EEA, UK(and Gibraltar) and Swiss data protection law requires us to have a “legal basis” for each purpose for which we collect your personal information. Our legal basis for collecting and using the personal information described in this Privacy Statement will depend on the type of personal information and the specific context in which we collect it. However, we will normally process personal information from you when:
We have your consent to do so;
We have a contract with you and it is necessary to process your personal information to perform our contract with you, including to provide you with the benefits of the Intuit Platform and operate our business;
The processing is in our legitimate business interests, such as operating our businesses, improving and developing the Intuit Platform, communicating with you, marketing our offerings and services and personalizing your experience, and to detect illegal activities; and/or
To comply with legal requirements, including applicable laws and regulations.
For residents in the UK searching for financial or other products (including energy, internet, or mobile phone offers) through the Intuit Platform, we may share your personal information, including your contact details, date of birth, as well as the information you give us about your employment, income, and housing and employment expenses with third parties, including HD Decisions, Capital One, Monevo, CarFinance 247, and Decision Tech. You can find more information about their data protection practices in their privacy policies:
HD Decisions
Capital One
Monevo
CarFinance 247
Decision Tech
If you are a resident of the UK(and Gibraltar), the EEA or Switzerland you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information.
You may request a copy of your personal information in the Privacy tab of your account or by visiting our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU&Switzerland). If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma UK, you may request a copy of your personal information by visiting Credit Karma’s
Help Centre
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you may request a copy of your personal information by visiting
Mailchimp’s Privacy Rights Request page
.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
You may request for us to delete your personal information in the Privacy tab of your account or through our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland). If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma UK, you may request for us to delete your personal information by visiting Credit Karma’s
Help Centre
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you may request for us to delete your personal information by visiting
Mailchimp’s Privacy Rights Request page
. Please note that even if you request for your personal information to be deleted, certain aspects may be retained for us to: meet our legal or regulatory compliance (e.g. maintaining records of transactions you have made with us); exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on our Service. Data retained for these purposes will be handled as described in the section “Data Retention”.
Objection and Restriction.
You may object to our processing of your personal information or ask us to restrict processing of your personal information.
Portability.
You may request portability of your personal information.
Withdraw Consent.
If we process your personal information with your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint.
You have the right to file a complaint with a supervisory authority about our collection and processing of your personal information. You can find your data protection regulator
here
.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings or visit our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland) or
edit your email preferences for Mailchimp using the instructions found here.
. You may also click unsubscribe at the bottom of the marketing emails.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of such interest-based advertising by visiting
Network Advertising Initiative
or
Your Online Choices
or by visiting our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland). For Mailchimp, you can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Cookie Preferences” link in the footer of the
Mailchimp website
.
UK, EEA and Swiss Representative
In the EEA: Intuit Inc., Intuit Limited and Mailchimp have each appointed Intuit France SAS as its Representative in the European Union in accordance with Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (the "GDPR") (contact details can be found in the section below).
In the UK: Intuit Inc., and Mailchimp have each appointed Intuit Limited as its Representative in the UK in accordance with UK GDPR (contact details can be found in the section below)
United Kingdom, EEA and Switzerland contact information
Intuit Limited
Attention: Intuit Data Protection Administration,
Cardinal Place, 80 Victoria Street, London,
United Kingdom, SW1E 5JL
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/uk/gdpr/
Credit Karma UK Limited
4th Floor
One New Oxford Street
London WC1A 1NU
Intuit France SAS
Intuit Data Protection Administration
﻿7 Rue Meyerbeer 75009 Paris, France
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/fr/gdpr/
or
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/eu/gdpr/
If you have questions or concerns that have not been addressed by this Privacy Statement, you can contact the Intuit and Mailchimp Data Protection Officer
here
,
the Credit Karma Data Protection Officer by writing to
dpo@creditkarma.com
.
Cookies and Tracking Technologies
Intuit digital properties use cookies, pixels, tags and similar technologies to provide you the best possible experience on and off our sites. You may opt-out of the use of cookies and trackers that may share some limited personal information with our third party advertising partners using the option below. For more information on how we use Cookies and Tracking Technologies, please review our
Cookies Policy.
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are strictly necessary to provide you with the services and features  available through our site. Because these cookies are strictly necessary to deliver the site, you cannot refuse them without impacting how the site functions.
Advertising (Targeting) Cookies
These cookies are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you and your interests. They also perform functions like preventing the same ad from continuously reappearing, ensuring that ads are properly displayed, and in some cases selecting advertisements that are based on your interests.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 8
https://www.bt.com/privacy-policy/:
It's time to update your browser
You're using an old version of your internet browser, which is fine for browsing but no longer secure enough for online payments.
Don't worry, updating to the latest and most secure version is quick and easy.
Update and learn more
Our Privacy policy
This policy sets out how we handle the information we receive from customers and everyone who uses our products and services. We take this seriously and will always treat this information with the utmost respect and care.
Our Privacy policy
This policy sets out how we handle the information we receive from customers and everyone who uses our products and services. We take this seriously and will always treat this information with the utmost respect and care.
Consumer Privacy Policy
Business Privacy Policy
Welcome
As a communications provider, using personal information is fundamental to what we do – from connecting calls to developing and promoting our services. We believe that it is very important that our customers trust us with their personal information.
This privacy notice explains what personal information we collect about you and how we use it during our relationship with you. You can also find details of what rights you have (including the right to object to some of the data handling we carry out), as well as how to exercise those rights in the "
Your rights
" section below.
Technology is a fast-changing area and can be complicated. We’ve included a
glossary
which explains the meaning of any technical terms we use.
Who are we?
Where we use the words “We” or “Our” we mean either British Telecommunications plc or EE Limited – both part of the BT Group.
This privacy notice explains how we use the personal information collected from or about you when you are one of our customers or when you contact us or use our services.
The company that is responsible for your personal information will be the company that is named in any terms and conditions or messages sent to you.
In some circumstances BT plc and EE Ltd are jointly responsible for deciding what personal information is collected, used and stored.  This happens where we work together to give you the best customer experience and to be more efficient across our businesses to:
Provide assistance through our customer service teams;
Understand how people interact with us;
Understand how people use our products and services; and
Carry out checks for fraud and credit risk.
We will also share your personal information with other companies in the BT Group. You can find out more details about this in the "
sharing your information
" section below.
What does this privacy notice cover?
This notice applies to the products and services we provide you (such as mobile, TV and broadband), your use of our apps and our websites and where we pass your details on to insurance or finance providers as part of your payment for our products or services.
It also applies even if you’re not one of our customers, but you interact with us as part of us running our business, for example by:
using one of our products or services – paid for by someone else
acting with authorisation on behalf of one of our customers
taking part in a survey or trial
entering a prize promotion
calling our helpdesk
generally enquiring about our services
If you need to give us personal information about someone else in relation to our products and services, this privacy notice will also apply to their information. If we need the permission of the other person to use that information, we’ll ask you to check they are OK with this.
We have separate privacy notices in the BT Group that apply if you buy products or services directly with other companies in the group or if you are a business customer (which applies if you are a sole trader, partnership, or company). You can find links to our other BT Group privacy notices below:
Plusnet plc
Openreach
Business customers –
BT plc
and
EE Limited
This notice doesn’t cover other third party companies or organisations collecting and using your personal information to provide you with products and services, including those who use cookies, tags and other technologies to offer relevant online advertisements to you. You can find more details about how those third parties use your data by visiting their privacy notices on their own websites. You should review their privacy notices before giving them your information.
Your Rights
You can ask us to provide you with a copy of your personal data at any time. If you have given us your personal information because you have a contract with us or because you have consented to us handling it, you are entitled to ask us for a copy of this information in a structured, commonly used and machine readable format so that you can reuse it or share it with other organisations.
In some circumstances (including where we rely on ‘legitimate interests’), you have the right to object to our processing of your data and can ask us to restrict our use of your data and to delete it.  You also have the right to ask us to correct your information if it’s inaccurate and, as described below, to object to automated decision making.
We aim to provide our products and services in a way that protects information and respects your request. Because of this, when you delete or change (or ask us to delete or change) your information from our systems, we might not do so straight away from our back-up systems or copies on our active servers. And we may need to keep some information to fulfil your request (for example, keeping your email address to make sure it’s not on our marketing list).
Where we can, we’ll confirm any changes. For example, we’ll check a change of address against the Postal Address File, or we might ask you to confirm it.
There are some exceptions to these rights, for example we might not be able to delete your data if we need it to fulfil your contract or we are required to keep it by law. We also might not be able to provide you with information if it would infringe someone else’s rights. We’ll always try to help you with your request and if we believe we are unable to fulfil your request we will always explain why.
Where you have given consent for us to handle your personal information or permission to provide a service, you can change your mind and withdraw this consent at any time. It only applies to how we use your personal information in the future, not what we’ve done in the past (for example if we’ve run a credit check at the start of your contract).
How do I make a request?
You can exercise any of your rights by using the
online forms here
.
Once we’ve looked at your request, we’ll let you know when you can expect to hear from us. It will normally take us up to one month to complete your request, but it could take longer (up to a further two months) if it’s a complicated request or you send us a lot of requests at once.
Want your bill information?
If you want a copy of your
billing information
, the quickest way to access this information is by logging into your EE or BT account or, for your mobile billing information, by calling 150 from your mobile and we’ll send it to you (you must be the account holder to ask for this information.) If you want to see what contact information we hold about you, you can also log in to your account. It’s quick and simple to access it this way.  If you would like to request any other personal information you can do this by clicking the link above.
Want to change your cookies, marketing or consent preferences?
If you want us to stop using personal information we’ve collected via
cookies
on our website or apps, you should either
change your cookie settings
or change the settings for your app.
You can change your
marketing preferences
by following the
unsubscribe link
in any email or text marketing that we send you. If you are a BT customer, you can change your preferences in your BT account.
Alternatively, you can give us a call and let us know whether you’re happy to hear from us by email, text, post or telephone. Please contact us on
0330 1234 150
.
You can use the same contact details to let us know whether you want us to stop using information about how you use our products and services (including your
call
,
browser
and
TV records
) for marketing purposes or profiling you for marketing purposes.
Children
We only enter into contracts with customers who are over the age of 18. Although the account holder will always be an adult, we recognise that some of our products and services, like mobile devices, will be purchased on behalf of children and so we cannot guarantee that every mobile number or service is held by an adult.
Where you have purchased a product or service on behalf of a child we will collect and use the child’s data as part of providing our services to the end user in line with this privacy notice. We have developed safety features for devices that belong to a child as well as educational material to help keep your child safe online. You can find more information on these features for
mobile
and
broadband
.
Information we collect about you and how we use it
The personal information we collect, store and use will depend on the products and services you have with us and how you use them. In most cases we have this information because we collect it directly from you, or because it has been derived from your use of our products and services. In some circumstances we will obtain this information from a third party.
Some of the personal information we collect, store and use is considered more sensitive (for example data about health or biometric data).  We will only collect, store and use this more sensitive information to support you and your use of our products and services, and only where we put additional measures in place to protect this personal information.
Below you can find details of how and why we use your information and our permitted reason in law (known as ‘legal basis’) to use it.  For some products and services, we handle additional information. You can find specific details by looking at the section for the product or service you’ve bought and see an overview in the ways in which we collect and use your personal information during our relationship.
When you create and use your account
When you create an account, we will collect details about you so we can identify you and contact you about your account. As you buy different products and services or contact us these details will be linked to your account so we have a clear record of your relationship with us.
To set up your account
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Email Address
your credentials (which means your password, security questions and answers we have on your account)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to keep business records and prevent fraud)
FURTHER DETAILS
We do not store the original copy of your password. Instead, we keep it in a form that allows us to authenticate you but does not allow us to work out what your original password is.
To send you service messages (confirming your order and telling you about any changes that might affect your service, like when we have infrastructure work planned or we need to fix something)
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Contact details
details of the products and services you’ve bought within the BT Group
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
If you don’t give us the correct information, we might not be able to provide you with the product or service you ordered from us.
To update you on when we’ll deliver, connect or install your products and services
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Contact details
details of the products and services you’ve bought within the BT Group
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
To filter any content you ask us to, through parental control settings (or any content our partners ask us to, such as for a wifi hotspot)
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
account details
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to protect our users and our network)
FURTHER DETAILS
To carry out verification and Identity checks
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
account number
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes (which may include biometric data)
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
legitimate Interests (to prevent fraud)
Substantial public interests, when using your biometric data to identify you (to prevent fraud)
FURTHER DETAILS
To deal with customer service and complaints including:
Technical issues
orders and returns
responding to your queries online
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
information to confirm your identity.
name and title
contact details.
date of birth
payment and financial information including billing history
details of the products and services you’ve bought within the BT Group and how you use them.
details of your query or complaint
your communications with us, including emails, webchats and phone calls
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to run our business)
Contract (where the issue relates to our contractual obligations)
FURTHER DETAILS
To administer your consumer credit agreement – if applicable
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
date of birth
contact details
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
To charge you and make sure your payment reaches us
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
information to confirm your identity
name and title
contact details
date of birth
payment and financial information
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
To manage overdue payments and recover money you owe us including instructing debt-recovery agencies to collect debts (or put in place re-payment plans) either on our behalf, or directly if we transfer your debt to them
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
contact details
date of birth
account details
details of debt
details of additional needs (only if it will affect the way that the debt-recovery agency needs to contact you)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to recover debt)
Where we share details about your additional needs we do this on the basis of substantial public interests
FURTHER DETAILS
We will only share additional needs information if required to tailor the method in which a third-party would need to contact you.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To set up your account
Email Address
your credentials (which means your password, security questions and answers we have on your account)
Legitimate interests (to keep business records and prevent fraud)
We do not store the original copy of your password. Instead, we keep it in a form that allows us to authenticate you but does not allow us to work out what your original password is.
To send you service messages (confirming your order and telling you about any changes that might affect your service, like when we have infrastructure work planned or we need to fix something)
Contact details
details of the products and services you’ve bought within the BT Group
Contract
If you don’t give us the correct information, we might not be able to provide you with the product or service you ordered from us.
To update you on when we’ll deliver, connect or install your products and services
Contact details
details of the products and services you’ve bought within the BT Group
Contract
To filter any content you ask us to, through parental control settings (or any content our partners ask us to, such as for a wifi hotspot)
account details
Legitimate interests (to protect our users and our network)
To carry out verification and Identity checks
name and title
account number
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes (which may include biometric data)
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them
legitimate Interests (to prevent fraud)
Substantial public interests, when using your biometric data to identify you (to prevent fraud)
To deal with customer service and complaints including:
Technical issues
orders and returns
responding to your queries online
information to confirm your identity.
name and title
contact details.
date of birth
payment and financial information including billing history
details of the products and services you’ve bought within the BT Group and how you use them.
details of your query or complaint
your communications with us, including emails, webchats and phone calls
Legitimate interests (to run our business)
Contract (where the issue relates to our contractual obligations)
To administer your consumer credit agreement – if applicable
name
date of birth
contact details
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought
Contract
To charge you and make sure your payment reaches us
information to confirm your identity
name and title
contact details
date of birth
payment and financial information
Contract
To manage overdue payments and recover money you owe us including instructing debt-recovery agencies to collect debts (or put in place re-payment plans) either on our behalf, or directly if we transfer your debt to them
contact details
date of birth
account details
details of debt
details of additional needs (only if it will affect the way that the debt-recovery agency needs to contact you)
Legitimate interests (to recover debt)
Where we share details about your additional needs we do this on the basis of substantial public interests
We will only share additional needs information if required to tailor the method in which a third-party would need to contact you.
To send you marketing and to identify products and services that interest you
We want to make sure that our customers and potential customers know about the great products and services that we offer and that you receive the best offers available, which are tailored and personalised by using the information we know about you.
To send you marketing messages
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
contact details
date of birth
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate Interests (to keep you up to date with our products and services, making them relevant to you and making sure you manage your spend with us)
Consent
FURTHER DETAILS
When you first buy a product or service from us, we add your details to our marketing lists unless you tell us not to.
We will always give you the right to opt out of marketing at any time and remind you of this in any emails or texts we send.  See "
Your Rights
” for more information.
To contact you in relation to a prize draw, competition, or other promotion
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
contact details
date of birth
verification details
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
Legitimate interests
FURTHER DETAILS
We use your information to enter you into the prize draw, or competition, or promotion and to notify you if you have won.
If the promotion terms require it, we will ask for date of birth and details to verify your identity.
We will also anonymise the information in order to create analytics around the success of the prize draw or competition.
To create a profile about you to better understand you as our customer or potential customer. We use your profile to identify the products and services that might interest you, to recommend better ways to manage what you spend with us, to improve your experience when engaging with us and to show you more relevant online advertising (both on our and other parties’ apps and sites) and work with other well-known brands to make theirs more suitable too.
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
date of birth
contact details (including your address, phone number and email address)
payment and financial information
your interactions with us including on our website and app
details of the products and services you’ve bought within the BT Group or have expressed an interest in buying
your communications with us, including emails, webchats and phone calls
information from other organisations such as aggregated demographic data, data brokers (such as Acxiom), our partners and publicly available sources like the electoral roll and business directories
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to personalise your experiences with us, make our offers relevant to you and help you manage your spend with us)
FURTHER DETAILS
...continued
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
information from cookies and tags placed on your connected devices
details of how and where you use our products and services– including your call, browsers (including IP address and static IP address, if it applies) and TV records and location details
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Consent
FURTHER DETAILS
Where you have agreed to our use of cookies and tags (through our cookies consent tool or via the app) we add this information to our profile.  See our
cookie policy
for more details.
Where you have consented to us using data about how you access our network and services, we add this information to your profile to increase the personalised offers you see and receive.
You can withdraw your consent to these types of data or opt out of personalisation at any time. See the “
Your Rights
” section for more information.  You’ll still see offers but they won’t be so personalised for you.
To show you and others more relevant digital advertising (on both our and other parties' apps and sites) and work with other well-known brands to make theirs more suitable too; and to measure the performance of our digital advertising campaigns, so that we can make improvements and find others who may be interested in our products and services
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
We will collect information through online platforms such as:
Facebook
Instagram
TikTok
X (formerly Twitter)
Pinterest
Amazon
We use these platforms for advertising and analytic purposes.
We collect:
social media handles
Social media interactions
public postings
“Like” and other reactions
details you send to us by mentioning us or following our social media posts by using “handles” or “hashtags” in comments
messages you shared with us publicly or privately on social media platforms
name, phone number and email details submitted on our website
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to manage and improve our services, in promoting our brand)
FURTHER DETAILS
We use the advertising tools of online platforms to advertise our products (e.g. Facebook custom audiences).  For that purpose, we may provide your email address to the online platform in hashed form for them to present sponsored adverts.
When you submit information on our website and have accepted cookies, we’ll also share your details in hashed form with our online platforms partners to match and compare sales records, optimise campaigns and target other users with similar profiles to yours. They can only match your details to help us if you already have an account with them. See our
cookie policy
to learn more.
When we use the advertising tools of these online platforms, we are both responsible for your information and sometimes act jointly in making decisions about your data while using these tools. You can ask these companies directly about their use of your data.  See their privacy notices for more details.
Sometimes we use supplier tools to find likely matches of customers on our database (at an aggregated level) with those of our trusted publisher partners. Sharing the results from this process allows our partners to identify customers we may have in common so we can show more relevant advertising when you’re using their platforms, sites or apps. These partners may also use their own techniques to identify additional customers of theirs who share similar characteristics to any group we are targeting to help extend the reach of our personalised advertising.
To run surveys and market research about our products and/or receive feedback on our services/products
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
contact details
details of the products and services you've bought
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests to manage and improve our business
FURTHER DETAILS
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To send you marketing messages
name and title
contact details
date of birth
Legitimate Interests (to keep you up to date with our products and services, making them relevant to you and making sure you manage your spend with us)
Consent
When you first buy a product or service from us, we add your details to our marketing lists unless you tell us not to.
We will always give you the right to opt out of marketing at any time and remind you of this in any emails or texts we send.  See "
Your Rights
” for more information.
To contact you in relation to a prize draw, competition, or other promotion
name
contact details
date of birth
verification details
Contract
Legitimate interests
We use your information to enter you into the prize draw, or competition, or promotion and to notify you if you have won.
If the promotion terms require it, we will ask for date of birth and details to verify your identity.
We will also anonymise the information in order to create analytics around the success of the prize draw or competition.
To create a profile about you to better understand you as our customer or potential customer. We use your profile to identify the products and services that might interest you, to recommend better ways to manage what you spend with us, to improve your experience when engaging with us and to show you more relevant online advertising (both on our and other parties’ apps and sites) and work with other well-known brands to make theirs more suitable too.
name and title
date of birth
contact details (including your address, phone number and email address)
payment and financial information
your interactions with us including on our website and app
details of the products and services you’ve bought within the BT Group or have expressed an interest in buying
your communications with us, including emails, webchats and phone calls
information from other organisations such as aggregated demographic data, data brokers (such as Acxiom), our partners and publicly available sources like the electoral roll and business directories
Legitimate interests (to personalise your experiences with us, make our offers relevant to you and help you manage your spend with us)
...continued
information from cookies and tags placed on your connected devices
details of how and where you use our products and services– including your call, browsers (including IP address and static IP address, if it applies) and TV records and location details
Consent
Where you have agreed to our use of cookies and tags (through our cookies consent tool or via the app) we add this information to our profile.  See our
cookie policy
for more details.
Where you have consented to us using data about how you access our network and services, we add this information to your profile to increase the personalised offers you see and receive.
You can withdraw your consent to these types of data or opt out of personalisation at any time. See the “
Your Rights
” section for more information.  You’ll still see offers but they won’t be so personalised for you.
To show you and others more relevant digital advertising (on both our and other parties' apps and sites) and work with other well-known brands to make theirs more suitable too; and to measure the performance of our digital advertising campaigns, so that we can make improvements and find others who may be interested in our products and services
We will collect information through online platforms such as:
Facebook
Instagram
TikTok
X (formerly Twitter)
Pinterest
Amazon
We use these platforms for advertising and analytic purposes.
We collect:
social media handles
Social media interactions
public postings
“Like” and other reactions
details you send to us by mentioning us or following our social media posts by using “handles” or “hashtags” in comments
messages you shared with us publicly or privately on social media platforms
name, phone number and email details submitted on our website
Legitimate interests (to manage and improve our services, in promoting our brand)
We use the advertising tools of online platforms to advertise our products (e.g. Facebook custom audiences).  For that purpose, we may provide your email address to the online platform in hashed form for them to present sponsored adverts.
When you submit information on our website and have accepted cookies, we’ll also share your details in hashed form with our online platforms partners to match and compare sales records, optimise campaigns and target other users with similar profiles to yours. They can only match your details to help us if you already have an account with them. See our
cookie policy
to learn more.
When we use the advertising tools of these online platforms, we are both responsible for your information and sometimes act jointly in making decisions about your data while using these tools. You can ask these companies directly about their use of your data.  See their privacy notices for more details.
Sometimes we use supplier tools to find likely matches of customers on our database (at an aggregated level) with those of our trusted publisher partners. Sharing the results from this process allows our partners to identify customers we may have in common so we can show more relevant advertising when you’re using their platforms, sites or apps. These partners may also use their own techniques to identify additional customers of theirs who share similar characteristics to any group we are targeting to help extend the reach of our personalised advertising.
To run surveys and market research about our products and/or receive feedback on our services/products
name and title
contact details
details of the products and services you've bought
Legitimate interests to manage and improve our business
To give additional help or support where needed
We understand that some customers may need additional help and support from us. We want to ensure that we are here for you and so have in place processes to support those customers who may have additional needs.
Were you have told us that you have additional needs when you purchase a product or service from us, through your interactions with us during our relationship with you (for example if you tell an advisor of your change of circumstances), or if a family member, or carer provides this information on your behalf, we record this to tailor our services to those needs.
You can find more information about what we mean by additional needs and on how we
support these customers here
.
To help with managing your account and ensuring we use the best means to communicate with you
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Additional needs details
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to manage our business)
Substantial public interests
Consent
FURTHER DETAILS
To ensure we provide you with products and services that are appropriate to your needs
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Additional needs details
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to manage our business)
Substantial public interests
Consent
FURTHER DETAILS
To allow a third party to manage your account on your behalf
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
contact details
additional needs
supporting documents (e.g. power of attorney)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to manage our business)
Substantial public interests
Consent
FURTHER DETAILS
Where applicable we will share your information with debt-recovery agencies
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Additional needs details
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to manage our business)
Substantial public interests
Consent
FURTHER DETAILS
To make sure they can communicate with you in the most appropriate way.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To help with managing your account and ensuring we use the best means to communicate with you
Additional needs details
Legitimate interests (to manage our business)
Substantial public interests
Consent
To ensure we provide you with products and services that are appropriate to your needs
Additional needs details
Legitimate interests (to manage our business)
Substantial public interests
Consent
To allow a third party to manage your account on your behalf
name
contact details
additional needs
supporting documents (e.g. power of attorney)
Legitimate interests (to manage our business)
Substantial public interests
Consent
Where applicable we will share your information with debt-recovery agencies
Additional needs details
Legitimate interests (to manage our business)
Substantial public interests
Consent
To make sure they can communicate with you in the most appropriate way.
To perform credit and fraud prevention checks
Before we provide you with a product or service (including upgrades or renewals), or sometimes when you use our products and services, we’ll use the personal information you have given us together with information we have collected from
credit reference agencies
(such as Experian or Equifax), and
fraud prevention agencies
(such as TransUnion) to carry out credit and fraud checks.
If we, a credit reference or fraud prevention agency (such as TransUnion), decide that you are a credit, fraud or money laundering risk, we may refuse to provide the services or financing you have asked for, or we may stop providing existing services to you.
If you give us false or inaccurate information which we identify as fraudulent, we’ll pass that on to fraud prevention agencies. We might also share it with law enforcement agencies, as may the agencies we have shared the information with.
To check details on applications for products and services
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
address
date of Birth
contact details
financial information
employment details
device identifiers (including IP address)
details about your account and bills, including how you manage them.
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
When we carry out checks for credit and fraud prevention, we will use methods that automatically decide whether you pose a fraud or money laundering risk. If your behaviour is consistent with money laundering or known fraudulent conduct, is inconsistent with previous applications, or you appear to have deliberately hidden your true identity your application may be rejected. For more information on automated processing, please see the '
Automated Decision Making
' below.
To make credit and affordability assessments to decide whether to accept your application and set credit limits
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
address
date of Birth
contact details
financial information
employment details
device identifiers (including IP address)
details about your account and bills, including how you manage them.
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to prevent fraud and protect our business)
FURTHER DETAILS
When we carry out checks for credit and fraud prevention, we will use methods that automatically decide whether you pose a fraud or money laundering risk. If your behaviour is consistent with money laundering or known fraudulent conduct, is inconsistent with previous applications, or you appear to have deliberately hidden your true identity your application may be rejected. For more information on automated processing, please see the '
Automated Decision Making
' below.
To create ‘modelling tools’, (for example methods of assessing how likely it is that a customer will default on a payment, take a new product or help us to improve our products and services for customers
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
address
date of Birth
contact details
financial information
employment details
device identifiers (including IP address)
details about your account and bills, including how you manage them.
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to prevent fraud and protect our business)
FURTHER DETAILS
When we carry out checks for credit and fraud prevention, we will use methods that automatically decide whether you pose a fraud or money laundering risk. If your behaviour is consistent with money laundering or known fraudulent conduct, is inconsistent with previous applications, or you appear to have deliberately hidden your true identity your application may be rejected. For more information on automated processing, please see the '
Automated Decision Making
' below.
To manage our credit risk and prevent/detect fraud including sharing data with credit reference agencies
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
address
date of Birth
contact details
financial information
employment details
device identifiers (including IP address)
details about your account and bills, including how you manage them.
updates from credit reference agencies
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate Interests (to prevent fraud and protect our business and to enable quick and fair and efficient decisions)
FURTHER DETAILS
We reassess your eligibility for credit limits on a monthly basis while you are a customer to ensure this remains accurate and reflects your current financial situation. See more details below.
To check your identity
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
facial recognition (which is considered biometric data) which we use for the purpose of uniquely identifying you
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate Interests (to prevent fraud and protect our business)
Substantial public interest
FURTHER DETAILS
Where we process details that are considered to be sensitive, we do this under the lawful basis of substantial public interest.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To check details on applications for products and services
name
address
date of Birth
contact details
financial information
employment details
device identifiers (including IP address)
details about your account and bills, including how you manage them.
Contract
When we carry out checks for credit and fraud prevention, we will use methods that automatically decide whether you pose a fraud or money laundering risk. If your behaviour is consistent with money laundering or known fraudulent conduct, is inconsistent with previous applications, or you appear to have deliberately hidden your true identity your application may be rejected. For more information on automated processing, please see the '
Automated Decision Making
' below.
To make credit and affordability assessments to decide whether to accept your application and set credit limits
name
address
date of Birth
contact details
financial information
employment details
device identifiers (including IP address)
details about your account and bills, including how you manage them.
Legitimate interests (to prevent fraud and protect our business)
When we carry out checks for credit and fraud prevention, we will use methods that automatically decide whether you pose a fraud or money laundering risk. If your behaviour is consistent with money laundering or known fraudulent conduct, is inconsistent with previous applications, or you appear to have deliberately hidden your true identity your application may be rejected. For more information on automated processing, please see the '
Automated Decision Making
' below.
To create ‘modelling tools’, (for example methods of assessing how likely it is that a customer will default on a payment, take a new product or help us to improve our products and services for customers
name
address
date of Birth
contact details
financial information
employment details
device identifiers (including IP address)
details about your account and bills, including how you manage them.
Legitimate interests (to prevent fraud and protect our business)
When we carry out checks for credit and fraud prevention, we will use methods that automatically decide whether you pose a fraud or money laundering risk. If your behaviour is consistent with money laundering or known fraudulent conduct, is inconsistent with previous applications, or you appear to have deliberately hidden your true identity your application may be rejected. For more information on automated processing, please see the '
Automated Decision Making
' below.
To manage our credit risk and prevent/detect fraud including sharing data with credit reference agencies
name
address
date of Birth
contact details
financial information
employment details
device identifiers (including IP address)
details about your account and bills, including how you manage them.
updates from credit reference agencies
Legitimate Interests (to prevent fraud and protect our business and to enable quick and fair and efficient decisions)
We reassess your eligibility for credit limits on a monthly basis while you are a customer to ensure this remains accurate and reflects your current financial situation. See more details below.
To check your identity
facial recognition (which is considered biometric data) which we use for the purpose of uniquely identifying you
Legitimate Interests (to prevent fraud and protect our business)
Substantial public interest
Where we process details that are considered to be sensitive, we do this under the lawful basis of substantial public interest.
How credit reference and fraud prevention agencies use your information:
There are different credit reference agencies in the UK (for example, TransUnion, Equifax and Experian). Each one might hold different information about you. If you want to find out what information they have on you, they may charge you a small fee.
Whenever credit reference and fraud prevention agencies transfer your personal information outside of the UK, they place contractual responsibilities on the organisation receiving it to protect your information to the standard required in the UK. They may also make the organisation receiving the information subscribe to ‘international frameworks’ aimed at sharing information securely.
You can find more information on how they use your personal information by reading their privacy notices. Here are the links for each of the three main Credit Reference Agencies.
TransUnion
Equifax
Experian
When credit reference agencies receive a search from us, a 'footprint' goes on your file which other organisations might see when they carry out a credit check.
The credit reference and fraud prevention agencies will keep a record of any fraud or money laundering risk and this may result in other organisations refusing to provide services, financing or employment to you. If you have any questions about this, please contact us using the details below.
Fraud prevention agencies can hold your personal information for different periods of time, and if you are considered to pose a fraud or money laundering risk, your information can be held by us and the organisations we share it with for up to six years.
Linked accounts:
If you tell us you’re associated with someone else financially (for example, by marriage or civil partnership), we’ll link your records together. You must make sure you have their agreement to share information about them. The agencies we share the information with also link your records together and these links will stay on your and their files – unless you or your partner successfully asks the agency to break that link.
If you don’t become one of our customers, we’ll still keep the result of our credits checks about you if we have a legal obligation and it’s in our legitimate interests to help prevent or detect fraud.
We might also share the information with other organisations. We do this because it’s in our, and the organisations’, legitimate interests to prevent fraud and money laundering, and to check identities, to protect our business and to keep to laws that apply to us.
To protect our business, our customers and the public
We use your information to prevent and detect attacks on our network or against your equipment.  This helps protect our business, our customers and the wider public.
To prevent and detect criminal activity on our network or against your equipment
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them including Call records, Browser records and TV records
content of SMS you send and receive using our network
CCTV footage in our shops and buildings
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests in protecting our network and business from attacks and to prevent and detect crime and fraud.
We may also share it with other organisations (such as other communications providers and banks) who have the same legitimate interests.
FURTHER DETAILS
To monitor traffic over our network
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them including Call records, Browser records and TV records
content of SMS you send and receive using our network
CCTV footage in our shops and buildings
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests in protecting our network and business from attacks and to prevent and detect crime and fraud.
We may also share it with other organisations (such as other communications providers and banks) who have the same legitimate interests.
FURTHER DETAILS
To trace nuisance and malicious calls or messages
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them including Call records, Browser records and TV records
content of SMS you send and receive using our network
CCTV footage in our shops and buildings
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests in protecting our network and business from attacks and to prevent and detect crime and fraud.
We may also share it with other organisations (such as other communications providers and banks) who have the same legitimate interests.
FURTHER DETAILS
To track Malware and cyber-attacks
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them including Call records, Browser records and TV records
content of SMS you send and receive using our network
CCTV footage in our shops and buildings
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests in protecting our network and business from attacks and to prevent and detect crime and fraud.
We may also share it with other organisations (such as other communications providers and banks) who have the same legitimate interests.
FURTHER DETAILS
To help detect and stop crime, prosecute offenders, and protect national security
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
contact details
name and title
date of birth
passwords and credentials (needed to confirm your identity and your communication with us)
your communications with use, such as calls, emails and webchats
payment and financial information
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them – including your call, browser (including IP address and TV records)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legal obligation
FURTHER DETAILS
Under investigatory powers legislation we might have to share this information with government and law-enforcement agencies – such as police.
We are obliged to comply with court orders requiring us to disclose information.
We may also disclose information to regulators.
We have strong oversight of what we do and get expert advice to make sure we’re doing the right thing to protect your privacy. We always make sure when we do share information it is proportionate.
You can read about our approach to investigatory powers in our report on
Privacy and free expression in UK communications
and, you can see the terms of reference for our oversight body
here
.
To make and defend claims
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
contact details
date of birth
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them.
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interest
FURTHER DETAILS
To route communications through parts of our network, equipment and systems
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
call records
browser records (including IP address)
TV records
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legal obligation
FURTHER DETAILS
Required by our regulator.
To assist partner organisations with fraud checks under our API service:
To help external organisations confirm your identity
To help external organisations check your age bracket
To help external organisations check outbound calls are going to their intended number
To check your mobile phone account isn’t compromised
To allow organisations to check account settings before a one-time passcode via SMS or voice is sent
Confirm whether a customer is part of the BT network or a BT MVNO
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
MSISDN
IMEI
age bracket
Simswap timestamp
device change timestamp
lost/stolen
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests
FURTHER DETAILS
We may share your personal information with other companies who you have a relationship with – like your bank – or with those companies that process information on their behalf – so that they can ensure that their customer records are up to date, and also in some cases prevent fraud – for example by checking whether a transaction, such as an online payment or a cash withdrawal, is definitely being requested by you, and not a fraudster.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To prevent and detect criminal activity on our network or against your equipment
name and title
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them including Call records, Browser records and TV records
content of SMS you send and receive using our network
CCTV footage in our shops and buildings
Legitimate interests in protecting our network and business from attacks and to prevent and detect crime and fraud.
We may also share it with other organisations (such as other communications providers and banks) who have the same legitimate interests.
To monitor traffic over our network
name and title
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them including Call records, Browser records and TV records
content of SMS you send and receive using our network
CCTV footage in our shops and buildings
Legitimate interests in protecting our network and business from attacks and to prevent and detect crime and fraud.
We may also share it with other organisations (such as other communications providers and banks) who have the same legitimate interests.
To trace nuisance and malicious calls or messages
name and title
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them including Call records, Browser records and TV records
content of SMS you send and receive using our network
CCTV footage in our shops and buildings
Legitimate interests in protecting our network and business from attacks and to prevent and detect crime and fraud.
We may also share it with other organisations (such as other communications providers and banks) who have the same legitimate interests.
To track Malware and cyber-attacks
name and title
contact details
date of birth
password and credentials
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them including Call records, Browser records and TV records
content of SMS you send and receive using our network
CCTV footage in our shops and buildings
Legitimate interests in protecting our network and business from attacks and to prevent and detect crime and fraud.
We may also share it with other organisations (such as other communications providers and banks) who have the same legitimate interests.
To help detect and stop crime, prosecute offenders, and protect national security
contact details
name and title
date of birth
passwords and credentials (needed to confirm your identity and your communication with us)
your communications with use, such as calls, emails and webchats
payment and financial information
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them – including your call, browser (including IP address and TV records)
Legal obligation
Under investigatory powers legislation we might have to share this information with government and law-enforcement agencies – such as police.
We are obliged to comply with court orders requiring us to disclose information.
We may also disclose information to regulators.
We have strong oversight of what we do and get expert advice to make sure we’re doing the right thing to protect your privacy. We always make sure when we do share information it is proportionate.
You can read about our approach to investigatory powers in our report on
Privacy and free expression in UK communications
and, you can see the terms of reference for our oversight body
here
.
To make and defend claims
name and title
contact details
date of birth
payment and financial information
valid form of identification for verification purposes
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them.
Legitimate interest
To route communications through parts of our network, equipment and systems
call records
browser records (including IP address)
TV records
Legal obligation
Required by our regulator.
To assist partner organisations with fraud checks under our API service:
To help external organisations confirm your identity
To help external organisations check your age bracket
To help external organisations check outbound calls are going to their intended number
To check your mobile phone account isn’t compromised
To allow organisations to check account settings before a one-time passcode via SMS or voice is sent
Confirm whether a customer is part of the BT network or a BT MVNO
MSISDN
IMEI
age bracket
Simswap timestamp
device change timestamp
lost/stolen
Legitimate interests
We may share your personal information with other companies who you have a relationship with – like your bank – or with those companies that process information on their behalf – so that they can ensure that their customer records are up to date, and also in some cases prevent fraud – for example by checking whether a transaction, such as an online payment or a cash withdrawal, is definitely being requested by you, and not a fraudster.
To develop our business and services and to create aggregated and anonymised information for further use
We use your information to maintain, develop and test our products and services although we’ll always try to use anonymised information for this purpose.
To train our people and suppliers to provide you with products and services and to continuously improve our customer services (but we make the information anonymous beforehand wherever possible)
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
contact details
payment and financial information
your communications with us, including emails, webchats and phone calls (and any recordings made).
information from cookies and tags placed on your connected devices
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them - including your call, browsers (including IP address and static IP address, if it applies) and TV records.
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests to develop our business and build a better understanding of what you want
FURTHER DETAILS
We will share this information with the BT Group for reporting and administrative purposes.
To ensure our network is working properly and to continuously improve and develop our network, products and services for our customers
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
address
information about what you buy from us (how you ordered it and how you pay for it – e.g., broadband ordered online and paid for on a monthly basis)
information from cookies and tags placed on your computer
information from other organisations who provide aggregated demographic information, data brokers (such as Acxiom), our partners and publicly available sources like the electoral roll and business directories
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them – including you call, browser (including IP address) and TV records
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests to provide and improve your service
FURTHER DETAILS
We will typically anonymise and aggregate this information to carry out these uses. If we’re trying to fix a fault that you’ve reported, we may need to use identifiable data to help identify the specific problem.
To run management and corporate reporting, research and analytics to improve our business
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
address
information about what you buy from us (how you ordered it and how you pay for it – e.g., broadband ordered online and paid for on a monthly basis)
information from cookies and tags placed on your computer
information from other organisations who provide aggregated demographic information, data brokers (such as Acxiom), our partners and publicly available sources like the electoral roll and business directories
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them – including you call, browser (including IP address) and TV records
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests to provide and improve your service
FURTHER DETAILS
We will typically anonymise and aggregate this information to carry out these uses. If we’re trying to fix a fault that you’ve reported, we may need to use identifiable data to help identify the specific problem.
To provide other organisations with aggregated and anonymous reports
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name and title
address
age bracket
information about what you buy from us (how you ordered it and how you pay for it – e.g., broadband ordered online and paid for on a monthly basis)
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them – including you call, browser (including IP address) and TV records
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests to generate insights that help us operate our network and business or would be useful to other organisations
FURTHER DETAILS
We collect data about how our networks are used and about our customers.  We then aggregate and anonymise this data so no individual can be identified and to provide statistical reports to other organisations to use for planning purposes (for example to show volumes of traffic on different roads).
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To train our people and suppliers to provide you with products and services and to continuously improve our customer services (but we make the information anonymous beforehand wherever possible)
contact details
payment and financial information
your communications with us, including emails, webchats and phone calls (and any recordings made).
information from cookies and tags placed on your connected devices
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them - including your call, browsers (including IP address and static IP address, if it applies) and TV records.
Legitimate interests to develop our business and build a better understanding of what you want
We will share this information with the BT Group for reporting and administrative purposes.
To ensure our network is working properly and to continuously improve and develop our network, products and services for our customers
name and title
address
information about what you buy from us (how you ordered it and how you pay for it – e.g., broadband ordered online and paid for on a monthly basis)
information from cookies and tags placed on your computer
information from other organisations who provide aggregated demographic information, data brokers (such as Acxiom), our partners and publicly available sources like the electoral roll and business directories
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them – including you call, browser (including IP address) and TV records
Legitimate interests to provide and improve your service
We will typically anonymise and aggregate this information to carry out these uses. If we’re trying to fix a fault that you’ve reported, we may need to use identifiable data to help identify the specific problem.
To run management and corporate reporting, research and analytics to improve our business
name and title
address
information about what you buy from us (how you ordered it and how you pay for it – e.g., broadband ordered online and paid for on a monthly basis)
information from cookies and tags placed on your computer
information from other organisations who provide aggregated demographic information, data brokers (such as Acxiom), our partners and publicly available sources like the electoral roll and business directories
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them – including you call, browser (including IP address) and TV records
Legitimate interests to provide and improve your service
We will typically anonymise and aggregate this information to carry out these uses. If we’re trying to fix a fault that you’ve reported, we may need to use identifiable data to help identify the specific problem.
To provide other organisations with aggregated and anonymous reports
name and title
address
age bracket
information about what you buy from us (how you ordered it and how you pay for it – e.g., broadband ordered online and paid for on a monthly basis)
details of the products and services you’ve bought and how you use them – including you call, browser (including IP address) and TV records
Legitimate interests to generate insights that help us operate our network and business or would be useful to other organisations
We collect data about how our networks are used and about our customers.  We then aggregate and anonymise this data so no individual can be identified and to provide statistical reports to other organisations to use for planning purposes (for example to show volumes of traffic on different roads).
Specific products and services
Website and App
To facilitate your use of our app and to personalise your online or in-app experience
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
registration details
information from cookies and tags placed on your devices
information from your purchase history
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to ensure a personalised and relevant experience and to check the app is working)
Consent (for cookies data)
FURTHER DETAILS
You can find details about the cookies and similar technologies we use on our app by reading our
cookie policy
on the app.
To assist with network management
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
location data (collected from the app)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Consent
FURTHER DETAILS
We use a third-party service to assist us with network management by analysing call quality and location data to identify areas with poor network quality.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To facilitate your use of our app and to personalise your online or in-app experience
registration details
information from cookies and tags placed on your devices
information from your purchase history
Legitimate interests (to ensure a personalised and relevant experience and to check the app is working)
Consent (for cookies data)
You can find details about the cookies and similar technologies we use on our app by reading our
cookie policy
on the app.
To assist with network management
location data (collected from the app)
Consent
We use a third-party service to assist us with network management by analysing call quality and location data to identify areas with poor network quality.
Phone and Mobile
To run our coverage checker
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Phone number
Address
Device type
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests
FURTHER DETAILS
The coverage available to you is often dependent on the device you use. We use your device type to ensure we provide you with accurate results of our network.
To assist with installation/set up
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
address
date of birth
contact details
your communications with us including emails, webchats and phone calls.
national Insurance number (for our social tariff)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
If you are one of our social tariffs (e.g. home essentials) we collect your national insurance number to check with the Department of Work and Pensions that you are eligible.
To set up your smart benefits:
informing our third party partners that you have purchased their subscription through us (when it is purchased as an add-on to your mobile account)
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
phone number
details of the subscription/product you have purchased
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
To manage your smart benefits:
managing the subscription and billing – including changes to the subscription (when it is purchased as an add-on to your mobile account)
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
phone number
details of the subscription/product you have purchased (including call, IP address, browser records)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
To compile our phone directory (when you have purchased a landline service)
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
address
phone number
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legal obligation
FURTHER DETAILS
We are required by Ofcom to hold a directory of the numbers we have issued. When you purchase a landline service, we will ask you whether you want to be in our public phone book. If you are in our phone book, we’ll publish your details and share that information with other providers of directory services. Ex-directory numbers are not shown in the public phone book.
You can ask to be removed from the public phone book at any time If you ask to be removed, we will remove you from any future issues of the phone book but are unable to remove you from historic published issue.
To allow you to send and receive Rich Communication Services (“RCS”) messages from a compatible Apple device
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
device identifiers
phone number
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (in enabling the service you’ve asked for)
FURTHER DETAILS
We'll share your personal information with our partner, Google, who provides the service. See their
privacy notice
for more information about how they handle your data.
You can opt out of using RCS messages at any time by going to the Messages setting in your device.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To run our coverage checker
Phone number
Address
Device type
Legitimate interests
The coverage available to you is often dependent on the device you use. We use your device type to ensure we provide you with accurate results of our network.
To assist with installation/set up
name
address
date of birth
contact details
your communications with us including emails, webchats and phone calls.
national Insurance number (for our social tariff)
Contract
If you are one of our social tariffs (e.g. home essentials) we collect your national insurance number to check with the Department of Work and Pensions that you are eligible.
To set up your smart benefits:
informing our third party partners that you have purchased their subscription through us (when it is purchased as an add-on to your mobile account)
phone number
details of the subscription/product you have purchased
Contract
To manage your smart benefits:
managing the subscription and billing – including changes to the subscription (when it is purchased as an add-on to your mobile account)
phone number
details of the subscription/product you have purchased (including call, IP address, browser records)
Contract
To compile our phone directory (when you have purchased a landline service)
name
address
phone number
Legal obligation
We are required by Ofcom to hold a directory of the numbers we have issued. When you purchase a landline service, we will ask you whether you want to be in our public phone book. If you are in our phone book, we’ll publish your details and share that information with other providers of directory services. Ex-directory numbers are not shown in the public phone book.
You can ask to be removed from the public phone book at any time If you ask to be removed, we will remove you from any future issues of the phone book but are unable to remove you from historic published issue.
To allow you to send and receive Rich Communication Services (“RCS”) messages from a compatible Apple device
device identifiers
phone number
Legitimate interests (in enabling the service you’ve asked for)
We'll share your personal information with our partner, Google, who provides the service. See their
privacy notice
for more information about how they handle your data.
You can opt out of using RCS messages at any time by going to the Messages setting in your device.
Broadband and Wi-Fi
In order to deliver the connection and manage the network
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
device identifiers
IP address
parental control information
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (in delivering and protecting the network)
FURTHER DETAILS
To deliver Smart Hub Plus Wi-Fi controls and threat protection software within the BT app
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
device identifiers (including ‘friendly name’ where this is detected)
time a device has been connected to the network
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests
Consent (where the data is used for marketing)
FURTHER DETAILS
This section only applies where use is made of the Wi-Fi controls feature within the BT app (applicable to Smart Hub 2,3,4 and 5 only).
Devices (including their ‘friendly name’ and the time spent connected) will be displayed to the accountholder who uses these controls.   If the accountholder has opted in to push notifications they will also be notified when a device connects for the first time and if that device is affected by threats or viruses.
To connect you to our public Wi-Fi (including account registration)
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
email address
password (this will be the same login details for your account)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests (to run our business and protect our network)
FURTHER DETAILS
Wi-Fi voucher purchases
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
contact details
confirmation you are over 18
e-mail address
passwords and credentials (such as security questions and answers we have on your account)
payment and financial information
your communications with us, including emails, webchats and phone calls. We’ll also keep records of any settings or communication preferences you choose.
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
Voucher purchases are available for individuals who are not current broadband customers.
To manage our Wi-Fi services
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
contact details
confirmation you are over 18
MAC address to re-authenticate you on subsequent visits
e-mail address
social media handle where you login via single sign-on
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests
FURTHER DETAILS
We provide public Wi-Fi through our business customers. If you access our network through one of these third parties (e.g. hotels/cafes/airports) They will act as a separate controller and you should check their privacy policy for more details about how they use your personal information.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
In order to deliver the connection and manage the network
device identifiers
IP address
parental control information
Legitimate interests (in delivering and protecting the network)
To deliver Smart Hub Plus Wi-Fi controls and threat protection software within the BT app
device identifiers (including ‘friendly name’ where this is detected)
time a device has been connected to the network
Legitimate interests
Consent (where the data is used for marketing)
This section only applies where use is made of the Wi-Fi controls feature within the BT app (applicable to Smart Hub 2,3,4 and 5 only).
Devices (including their ‘friendly name’ and the time spent connected) will be displayed to the accountholder who uses these controls.   If the accountholder has opted in to push notifications they will also be notified when a device connects for the first time and if that device is affected by threats or viruses.
To connect you to our public Wi-Fi (including account registration)
email address
password (this will be the same login details for your account)
Legitimate interests (to run our business and protect our network)
Wi-Fi voucher purchases
name
contact details
confirmation you are over 18
e-mail address
passwords and credentials (such as security questions and answers we have on your account)
payment and financial information
your communications with us, including emails, webchats and phone calls. We’ll also keep records of any settings or communication preferences you choose.
Contract
Voucher purchases are available for individuals who are not current broadband customers.
To manage our Wi-Fi services
name
contact details
confirmation you are over 18
MAC address to re-authenticate you on subsequent visits
e-mail address
social media handle where you login via single sign-on
Legitimate interests
We provide public Wi-Fi through our business customers. If you access our network through one of these third parties (e.g. hotels/cafes/airports) They will act as a separate controller and you should check their privacy policy for more details about how they use your personal information.
TV
We work with YouView, who provide your Set Top Box and YouView may in some circumstances provide data to us that we process as set out in more detail below. YouView are a data controller of your data in their own right. For more information about how YouView processes your personal data see
YouView’s privacy policy
.
To provide personalised content and recommendations for example ‘most popular’, ‘trending’ and ‘recommendations for you’
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Customer viewing data across our channels and other channels available on our TV services (what you have previously watched)
device identifier
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests to personalise your experience or Consent (where required).
FURTHER DETAILS
We may recommend content to you on our TV services based on your previous viewing history.
To provide you with targeted ads
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
device identifier
customer viewing data across our channels and other channels available on our TV services (what you have previously watched)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests to make advertising more relevant to you or Consent (where required).
FURTHER DETAILS
We may provide you with targeted ads on our TV services or we may link your viewing data with other data we hold on you to provide you with targeted ads on both our and other parties’ apps and sites.
For analytics purposes to understand how our TV Services are used and how they are performing
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
device identifier
customer viewing data across our channels and other channels available on our TV services (what you have previously watched)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests in order to improve our services and our business
FURTHER DETAILS
For operational purposes to resolve technical issues/troubleshooting on set-top boxes, to maintain and improve the platform and track successful delivery and installation and to improve customer experience
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
device identifier
details the technical issues on the set-top box
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract (for resolving technical issues)
Legitimate interests in improving our services and improving customer experience
FURTHER DETAILS
To send push notifications
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
device identifiers
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Consent
FURTHER DETAILS
To enable us or TV partners to deliver personalised content and recommendations and targeted adverts
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
device identifiers
postcode
customer viewing data across our channels and other channels available on our TV services (what you have previously watched)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests in personalising your experience or Consent (where required)
FURTHER DETAILS
We may share data that we hold about you including data about your viewing history and the postcode linked to your Broadband account with our TV Partners to enable those partners to provide you with personalised content and recommendations and targeted adverts. In doing so, those TV partners will be processing your data as a controller in their own right in accordance with their own privacy policies:
ITV
Channel 4
BBC
If you wish to opt out of your personal data being shared with our TV partners for this purpose you can do so:
by visiting the privacy settings in your YouView set top box;
or
by visiting the privacy settings in Apple TV Set top box settings menu.
To enable you to access third party apps or content which you add to your TV service
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
email
customer identifier
IP address
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
Where you purchase add-ons such as Netflix or Now, we will share basic details with the relevant provider so that you can set up your account with them and access the purchased content. For more information about how they handle please see their privacy notices.
In order to determine royalty payments and to ensure that licensing obligations are met
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
Viewing data
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interest in order to manage our contracts and improve our services
FURTHER DETAILS
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To provide personalised content and recommendations for example ‘most popular’, ‘trending’ and ‘recommendations for you’
Customer viewing data across our channels and other channels available on our TV services (what you have previously watched)
device identifier
Legitimate interests to personalise your experience or Consent (where required).
We may recommend content to you on our TV services based on your previous viewing history.
To provide you with targeted ads
device identifier
customer viewing data across our channels and other channels available on our TV services (what you have previously watched)
Legitimate interests to make advertising more relevant to you or Consent (where required).
We may provide you with targeted ads on our TV services or we may link your viewing data with other data we hold on you to provide you with targeted ads on both our and other parties’ apps and sites.
For analytics purposes to understand how our TV Services are used and how they are performing
device identifier
customer viewing data across our channels and other channels available on our TV services (what you have previously watched)
Legitimate interests in order to improve our services and our business
For operational purposes to resolve technical issues/troubleshooting on set-top boxes, to maintain and improve the platform and track successful delivery and installation and to improve customer experience
device identifier
details the technical issues on the set-top box
Contract (for resolving technical issues)
Legitimate interests in improving our services and improving customer experience
To send push notifications
device identifiers
Consent
To enable us or TV partners to deliver personalised content and recommendations and targeted adverts
device identifiers
postcode
customer viewing data across our channels and other channels available on our TV services (what you have previously watched)
Legitimate interests in personalising your experience or Consent (where required)
We may share data that we hold about you including data about your viewing history and the postcode linked to your Broadband account with our TV Partners to enable those partners to provide you with personalised content and recommendations and targeted adverts. In doing so, those TV partners will be processing your data as a controller in their own right in accordance with their own privacy policies:
ITV
Channel 4
BBC
If you wish to opt out of your personal data being shared with our TV partners for this purpose you can do so:
by visiting the privacy settings in your YouView set top box;
or
by visiting the privacy settings in Apple TV Set top box settings menu.
To enable you to access third party apps or content which you add to your TV service
name
email
customer identifier
IP address
Contract
Where you purchase add-ons such as Netflix or Now, we will share basic details with the relevant provider so that you can set up your account with them and access the purchased content. For more information about how they handle please see their privacy notices.
In order to determine royalty payments and to ensure that licensing obligations are met
Viewing data
Legitimate interest in order to manage our contracts and improve our services
Buying from our online BT Shop/EE Store
To arrange for delivery of your products with our courier
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
address
phone number
email address
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
Our courier will use your mobile number and email to provide you with updates on the delivery of you order.
To send you electronic marketing specific to BT Shop/EE Store
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
name
email address
phone number
products you have bought via BT/EE Shop
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Legitimate interests
FURTHER DETAILS
When you first buy a product from us, we add your details to our Shop marketing lists unless you tell us not to.
We will always give you the right to opt out of marketing at any time and remind you of this in any emails or texts we send.  See "
Your Rights
" for more information.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
To arrange for delivery of your products with our courier
name
address
phone number
email address
Contract
Our courier will use your mobile number and email to provide you with updates on the delivery of you order.
To send you electronic marketing specific to BT Shop/EE Store
name
email address
phone number
products you have bought via BT/EE Shop
Legitimate interests
When you first buy a product from us, we add your details to our Shop marketing lists unless you tell us not to.
We will always give you the right to opt out of marketing at any time and remind you of this in any emails or texts we send.  See "
Your Rights
" for more information.
Home or Cyber security products
Whilst you purchase the services through us, our partners deliver the service. Our cyber security product is provided by Norton and our Home security product is provided by Verisure.
Below sets out how we will use your personal information in relation to these products. When you are using the service, our partners determine what personal information they collect from you and how they use that information. You can find out more details on how they use your information by reading their privacy notice or by contacting them directly.
Provide information to our partners who are providing the service
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
account number
customer ID
name and title
address
phone number
date of birth
e-mail address
the product you’ve selected and any relevant information for our partner to deliver the service (e.g. any restrictions to accessing your house)
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Contract
FURTHER DETAILS
Whilst you purchase the service through us, our partners deliver and manage the service you can find more details on how they use your personal information by visiting their privacy notices.
Verisure
Norton
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION WE USE
OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
FURTHER DETAILS
Provide information to our partners who are providing the service
account number
customer ID
name and title
address
phone number
date of birth
e-mail address
the product you’ve selected and any relevant information for our partner to deliver the service (e.g. any restrictions to accessing your house)
Contract
Whilst you purchase the service through us, our partners deliver and manage the service you can find more details on how they use your personal information by visiting their privacy notices.
Verisure
Norton
Sharing your information
Who do we share your personal information with, why and how?
We share your personal information with other companies within the BT Group for administrative purposes. We have a group-wide arrangement, known as binding corporate rules, to make sure your personal information is protected, no matter which company in the BT Group holds that information.
We share your personal information with other organisations for the following reasons:
With our insurance providers, for example if there is a claim made against us
With credit reference agencies and collection companies to carry out fraud and credit checks and collect debts
With third parties whose products and services we market to you (where you have given consent to receive such messages)
With third parties whose products you have bought from us as an add-on to your broadband or mobile service
With other communications companies (for example where you switch provider)
With local authorities and alarm providers to identify vulnerable customers affected by the
All-IP Programme
and the switch to
Digital Voice
.
With the Department of Work and Pensions to check if you’re eligible for our social tariffs
With other organisations, such as spam detection, or operating system providers, for the purposes of fraud prevention
If you enter into a handset and airtime agreement or consumer credit agreement with us, we may need to share details of that agreement and its administration with our third-party finance provider for reporting purposes.
We may also share your information:
With any public authority or law enforcement agency (if they ask for it)
To comply with law or regulations, or for possible legal proceedings
If there's an emergency and we think you or other people are at risk (including for example with the Environment Agency for flood warnings or if you call the emergency services we’re required to give them information about where you are)
If there’s a change in who owns us or any of our assets, we might share personal information to the new (or prospective) owner and our advisors.
When we share your information with other organisations we’ll make sure it’s protected, as far as is reasonably possible.
Using third party service providers
We use other providers to carry out services on our behalf or to help us provide services to you. We also use them to:
provide customer-service, marketing, infrastructure and information-technology services;
personalise our service and make it work better;
process payment transactions;
analyse and improve the information we hold (including about your interactions with our service);
assist with fraud prevention and detection; and
run surveys.
Where we use another organisation, we still control your personal information. And we have strict controls in place to make sure it’s properly protected.
The countries we share personal information to
BT Group
is a large multinational organisation. Our
binding corporate rules
reflect how we operate and make sure we respect your rights and keep your information safe no matter which company in the BT Group is handling that data.
After the UK and wider EU, India and the Philippines are where most of our processing of personal information takes place. Your personal information is used for customer or IT support or operations purposes in these countries.
If we use third party service providers to assist us in handling your data, we may need to transfer your personal information to a country that doesn’t have the same protections as the UK.  We make sure we have approved contracts in place with our suppliers who are operating outside the UK so that they are required to keep your data safe.
Automated decision making and profiling
We want to make sure decisions we make about you such as credit approval or which product or service to offer you are quick, fair and correct based on what we know about you. We use technology to make decisions automatically and to build profiles about you. This technology uses logic that analyses your preferences and how you use our products and services, which helps us to improve your customer experience, making it more relevant for you and allowing you to get the most out of our products and services. This means you’ll regularly receive from us personalised content whether in our marketing emails or when you browse our app or website or watch TV.
We also use technology to make decisions automatically based on your credit score analysis, which allows us to guarantee your regular payments for our products and services. This means we’ll decide your eligibility for our products and services based on your credit history.
You have the right to object to our use of automated decision making in some circumstances.  Please remember that if you object to certain types of automated decision making, it may affect our ability to provide you with the optimum level of customer service and our ability to provide you with certain products, financing and services.
Please see "
Your rights
" section above for more information on how to object.
Protecting your information and how long we keep it
How do we protect your personal information?
We have strict security measures to protect your personal information. We check your identity when you get in touch with us, and we follow our security procedures and apply suitable technical measures, such as encryption, to protect your information.
How long do we keep your personal information?
We’ll keep details about your account and the products and services you’ve bought and paid for while you’re a customer.  In particular we’ll keep the following:
Data Type
How long we keep it
Your general account details, including information contained in your customer profile, contact details and purchase history
6 years from the date on which your account is closed
Authentication details for fraud checks (identity document and facial recognition)
Original details for 6 months and details extracted from ID document for 6 years, both from the date of the check
Financial and payment information, including the information you provide us to carry out credit and affordability checks (if applicable)
Up to 6 years from the date of creation
A summary copy of your bills
6 years from the date of the bill
Customer service records, including calls to our call centres and online chats
Up to 6 years from the date of the interaction, depending on the purpose of the interaction
Marketing preferences, including contact details
27 months from the date your account is closed or, if you’re not a customer, from the date we collected your personal details
Details relating to any dispute
6 years from the date on which the case was closed
SMS content and data relating to calls
7 days from when the SMS is sent (longer if scams or malware are identified) and up to 12 months after the call
If you have itemised billing, we’ll keep a record of your outgoing calls for 2 years from the date of the call
In other cases we’ll store personal information for the periods needed for the reason we collected it or need to use it. And sometimes we’ll keep it for longer if we need to, for example if we’re required to retain data to comply with our legal obligations such as obligations to HMRC, or if we need to retain it for the purpose of dealing with legal claims. Otherwise, we delete it. You can ask us for specific information on retention periods using the details below.
How to contact us and further details
If you are unhappy about how we have handled your personal information you can make a complaint to our data protection officer
here
who will investigate the matter and report back to you.
If you are still not satisfied after our response or believe we are not using your personal information in line with the law, you have the right to complain to the Information Commissioner, the regulator in the UK. You can find details of how to contact them on their website at https://ico.org.uk/.
If you’d like any more details, or you have comments or questions about our privacy notice, contact us
here
or write to us at:
Data Privacy Team
Pp Floor 16
1 Braham Street
London E1 8EE
Glossary
We have included a description of how the technical terms we use are generally interpreted
We have included a description of how the technical terms we use are generally interpreted.
Account Holder
means the individual(s) we have entered into an agreement for the product or service with.
Additional needs
refers to any information in relation to an adjustment that may need to be made in order for us to appropriately support you.
You can find more information about what we mean by additional needs and on how we support customers
here
Aggregated data
means grouped information, for example the total number of calls made in a month or total number of minutes called.
Anonymised data
means data which has had all personally identifiable information removed.
Apps
means an application, such as one you’ve downloaded to your mobile or portable device.
BT
means British Telecommunications Plc.
Binding corporate rules
are designed to allow multinational companies to transfer personal information from the UK to their affiliates outside of the UK and to keep to data-protection legislation (there is also a version that allows transfers from the European Union).
Browser records
means the types of websites that you visit, as well as the date, time, length of your internet session,
cell site
and network used, device information, your data usage, your
IP address
, and the nature of the websites you view.
Call records
means the date, time, length and cost of your communications, device information, the location the call was made to and from, the network used and the type of communication, including when you make calls abroad.
Cell site
means the place where we keep the antennae and communications equipment we use to create a cellular network over which we transmit communications.
Content
means any part of a communication which shares the meaning of the communication. This could be the title of an email, the content of a text message or a recording of a voicemail.
Cookies
are small text files (up to 4KB) created by a website and stored in the user's connected device – either temporarily for that session only or permanently on the hard disk (called a persistent cookie). Cookies help the website recognise you and keep track of your preferences.
Data usage
means the volume of data you’ve used or what’s included under your service agreement with us. This can be a download or upload volume.
Device information
means the
MAC address
,
MSISDN
,
IMEI
,
IMSI
and advertising identifiers for your device. Device information also means the hardware manufacturer, model and operating system version for the device.
EE
means EE Limited.
Encryption
means scrambling information into an unreadable form that can only be translated back using a special key.
IMEI
(international mobile equipment identity) is a unique number given to every single mobile-phone handset.
IMSI
(international mobile subscriber identity) a unique number identifying a mobile subscriber.
IP address
is a unique string of numbers that identifies each device using the internet or a local network.
MAC address
(media access control address) is a unique identifier assigned to a network connection made to a device.
MSISDN
(mobile station international subscriber directory number) means a mobile phone number that uniquely identifies a service subscription.
Personal information
means information that identifies you as an individual, or is capable of doing so.
MVNO
means Mobile Virtual Network Operator Partners; communications providers that use our network.
Postal Address File
means the Royal Mail address database, containing over 30 million UK postal addresses.
Power of attorney
refers to the option to choose a trusted friend or relative (or more than one if you want) to act on your behalf. The person you appoint, called an 'attorney', can then use your money to pay bills, sell assets on your behalf and make gifts. In the UK an ‘attorney’ must be registered with the Office of the Public Guardian to be valid.
Regulatory obligations
means our obligations to regulators such as Ofcom and the Information Commissioner’s Office.
TV records
means details of the devices you use (including the
device information such as MAC address or IMSI
), the channels, programmes and adverts you watch on them, the services you access, how long you watch and what actions you take when doing so, including how you view, record and fast-forward programmes.
Tags
are an instruction inserted on a website that specifies how the site, or a part of the site, should be formatted and how it’s performing.
We and our
mean either British Telecommunications plc or EE Limited.
Sub-policy 9
https://www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Broadband
Compare Broadband Deals
Full Fibre
Fibre Broadband
Online Security
Our Wi-Fi Hub
Amazon eero
TV
TV and Fibre Broadband
Calls
Call Plans
Call Security
Digital Voice
About
Choose TalkTalk
Types of Broadband
Privacy Policy
Talk Talk Privacy Policy
Hello, and welcome to the TalkTalk Privacy Policy page.
We appreciate you stopping by to read the TalkTalk Privacy Policy; it's important that you do. We've tried to keep our privacy policy as straight forward as possible.
View, download and print the TalkTalk Privacy Policy
[PDF: 729KB]
When given consent to store cookies from this site, Google may use your personal data. To find out how Google uses this data, click here to view
Google’s Privacy & Terms
TalkTalk SuperSafe App Privacy Policy
The SuperSafe app is a security solution based on F-Secure TOTAL to protect computers, tablets, and smartphones. More recent versions also include a management portal, F-Secure Avenue, to help you better manage your licenses across your devices and those of your family members.
To summarize the SuperSafe app and privacy:
We ask for your name, email, and phone number.
We collect anonymous security data to protect your device.
We collect installed application names to enable the use of parental controls.
The focus of our data collection is not on you, but on your device and our service; and
The portal provides limited visibility among those who share the same subscription.
Full
F-Secure TOTAL privacy policy
applies to the SuperSafe app.
TalkTalk TV 4K App Privacy Policy
The TalkTalk TV 4K app is a mobile companion app for your TalkTalk TV 4K Box, enabling you to watch live channels, as well as search across content, and create playlists of your favourite channels and shows. You can also cast content from the mobile application to your TalkTalk TV 4K Box when at home (requires both devices to be connected via the same Wi-Fi network).
To summarise the TalkTalk 4K TV App privacy policy:
We ask for email, or authentication via social networks (Facebook, Google, etc).
We collect usage data to improve your experience and provide personalisation features.
The focus of our data collection is not on you, but on your device and our service.
Full
Netgem privacy policy
applies to the TalkTalk TV 4K app.
TalkTalk Digital Voice App Privacy Policy
The TalkTalk Digital Voice App is a Voice Over IP application based on a Microsoft voice platform. Its purpose is to allow TalkTalk Digital Voice customers to take and make phone calls using their landline phone number, from their connected mobile device. In-app features allow the customer to sync their mobile device contacts, control their inbound call behaviour and ring tones, and access voicemail.
To summarise the TalkTalk Digital Voice App privacy policy:
We ask for your IP address, email address & unique identifiers associated with the Apps.
The focus of our data collection is not on you, but on your device and our service; and
The portal provides limited visibility among those who share the same subscription.
Full
Metaswitch Privacy Policy
applies to the TalkTalk Digital Voice app.
Talk Talk Privacy Policy
Hello, and welcome to the TalkTalk Privacy Policy page.
We appreciate you stopping by to read the TalkTalk Privacy Policy; it's important that you do. We've tried to keep our privacy policy as straight forward as possible.
View, download and print the TalkTalk Privacy Policy
[PDF: 729KB]
When given consent to store cookies from this site, Google may use your personal data. To find out how Google uses this data, click here to view
Google’s Privacy & Terms
TalkTalk SuperSafe App Privacy Policy
The SuperSafe app is a security solution based on F-Secure TOTAL to protect computers, tablets, and smartphones. More recent versions also include a management portal, F-Secure Avenue, to help you better manage your licenses across your devices and those of your family members.
To summarize the SuperSafe app and privacy:
We ask for your name, email, and phone number.
We collect anonymous security data to protect your device.
We collect installed application names to enable the use of parental controls.
The focus of our data collection is not on you, but on your device and our service; and
The portal provides limited visibility among those who share the same subscription.
Full
F-Secure TOTAL privacy policy
applies to the SuperSafe app.
TalkTalk TV 4K App Privacy Policy
The TalkTalk TV 4K app is a mobile companion app for your TalkTalk TV 4K Box, enabling you to watch live channels, as well as search across content, and create playlists of your favourite channels and shows. You can also cast content from the mobile application to your TalkTalk TV 4K Box when at home (requires both devices to be connected via the same Wi-Fi network).
To summarise the TalkTalk 4K TV App privacy policy:
We ask for email, or authentication via social networks (Facebook, Google, etc).
We collect usage data to improve your experience and provide personalisation features.
The focus of our data collection is not on you, but on your device and our service.
Full
Netgem privacy policy
applies to the TalkTalk TV 4K app.
TalkTalk Digital Voice App Privacy Policy
The TalkTalk Digital Voice App is a Voice Over IP application based on a Microsoft voice platform. Its purpose is to allow TalkTalk Digital Voice customers to take and make phone calls using their landline phone number, from their connected mobile device. In-app features allow the customer to sync their mobile device contacts, control their inbound call behaviour and ring tones, and access voicemail.
To summarise the TalkTalk Digital Voice App privacy policy:
We ask for your IP address, email address & unique identifiers associated with the Apps.
The focus of our data collection is not on you, but on your device and our service; and
The portal provides limited visibility among those who share the same subscription.
Full
Metaswitch Privacy Policy
applies to the TalkTalk Digital Voice app.
Small Print (22 items)
Full On Fibre, Low On Price
Monthly price increases every April by £3. See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details. Subject to local availability. Prices from £27 a month for Full Fibre 65, 24 month plan. Up to 944Mb/s refers to Full Fibre 900, £42 a month. 24 month plan. See
talktalk.co.uk/reliable
for more information.
Fibre 35
From £28.00 a month. Increasing to £31.00 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract with no set up fees.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
This plan has fibre broadband with average speeds of 38Mb/s. Average speeds are based on the download speeds of at least 50% of our customer base at peak time (8pm-10pm). Speeds will vary depending on a number of different factors. Your exact speed estimate will be given at point of sale.
Fibre 65
From £28.00 a month. Increasing to £31.00 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract with no set up fees.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
Pricing may include a discount based on your location, enter your postcode to see deals in your area.
This plan has fibre broadband with average speeds of 67Mb/s. Average speeds are based on the download speeds of at least 50% of our customer base at peak time (8pm-10pm). Speeds will vary depending on a number of different factors. Your exact speed estimate will be given at point of sale.
Full Fibre 65
From £27.00 a month. Increasing to £30.00 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract with no set up fees.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
You need to sign a new contract and will be subject to certain terms. All plans are subject to certain conditions (including location) and you need to pay by Direct Debit.
Fibre 65 data only broadband will require installation by an engineer. An appointment date and arrival time slot will be agreed when you place your order, this can be changed up to 48 hours prior to the appointment date. The installation typically takes 1-2 hours. If the appointment is missed due to the engineer being unable to get access to your property you may be charged.
Fibre 65 data only broadband average speed: TalkTalk's Fibre 65 Data Only average download speeds are based on providing an Openreach 80Mb/s download product to the connection point in the home with an adjustment made based on the typical performance seen across our broadband products. You can check the estimated speed to your property prior to purchasing.
Fibre 150
From £35.00 a month. Increasing to £38.00 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract with no set up fees.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
This plan has fibre broadband with average speeds of 152 Mb/s. Average speeds are based on the download speeds of at least 50% of our customers based at peak times (8-10pm). Speeds will vary depending on a number of factors. Your predicted speeds, including minimum guaranteed speed, will be given at point of sale.
Fibre 150 Ultrafast will require installation by an Openreach engineer. An appointment date and arrival time slot will be agreed when you place your order, this can be changed up to 48 hours prior to the appointment date. The installation typically takes 1-2 hours. If the appointment is missed due to the engineer being unable to get access to your property you may be charged.
You need to sign a new contract and will be subject to certain terms. All plans are subject to certain conditions (including location) and you need to pay by Direct Debit.
TalkTalk Wi-Fi Hub included and is limited to one per household.
Fibre 250
From £39.00 a month. Increasing to £42.00 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract with no set up fees.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
This plan has fibre broadband with average speeds of 290 Mb/s. Average speeds are based on the download speeds of at least 50% of our customers based at peak times (8-10pm). Speeds will vary depending on a number of factors. Your predicted speeds, including minimum guaranteed speed, will be given at point of sale.
Fibre 250 Ultrafast will require installation by an Openreach engineer. An appointment date and arrival time slot will be agreed when you place your order, this can be changed up to 48 hours prior to the appointment date. The installation typically takes 1-2 hours. If the appointment is missed due to the engineer being unable to get access to your property you may be charged.
You need to sign a new contract and will be subject to certain terms. All plans are subject to certain conditions (including location) and you need to pay by Direct Debit.
TalkTalk Wi-Fi Hub included and is limited to one per household.
Offer is available to new customers and existing customers upgrading to Fibre 250. Customers need to be active for at least 30 days on a Plan before taking up a new offer. If you’re still within the minimum term of your old contract and you cancel your Plan during your cooling off period, you’ll be put back onto the equivalent of your previous package and contract term.
For full terms & conditions please visit talktalk.co.uk/legal. Registered in England: Company number 4633015.
Full Fibre 150
From £28.00 a month. Increasing to £31.00 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract with no set up fees.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
Full Fibre 150 will require installation by an Openreach engineer. An appointment date and arrival time slot will be agreed when you place your order, this can be changed up to 48 hours prior to the appointment date. The installation typically takes 1-2 hours. If the appointment is missed due to the engineer being unable to get access to your property you may be charged.
You need to sign a new contract and will be subject to certain terms. All plans are subject to certain conditions (including location) and you need to pay by Direct Debit.
Single Amazon eero 6 router included with your package, though supplementary eeros can be purchased by contacting TalkTalk (subject to local availability). The eero device is restricted use and can only be used on the TalkTalk broadband network and with TalkTalk eero enabled packages (currently Full Fibre 150, 500 and 900 only), otherwise they may be deactivated.
A compatible mobile phone is required to use the eero app and install your eero device and will be confirmed at point of sale. You will need to agree to Amazon eero Terms and Conditions and read their Privacy Policy.
Up to 13x faster than standard fibre broadband: when compared to average download speeds on our standard Fibre 35 with average download speeds of 35Mb/s.
UK's fastest most reliable broadband technology: For more detailed information about the UK's fastest most reliable broadband,
click here for our Ofcom report.
Full Fibre 500
No setup fee. Latest offer £35.00 a month, Increasing to £38.00 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
Full Fibre 500 will require installation by an Openreach engineer. An appointment date and arrival time slot will be agreed when you place your order, this can be changed up to 48 hours prior to the appointment date. The installation typically takes 1-2 hours. If the appointment is missed due to the engineer being unable to get access to your property you may be charged.
You need to sign a new contract and will be subject to certain terms. All plans are subject to certain conditions (including location) and you need to pay by Direct Debit.
Single Amazon eero Pro 6 router included with your package, though supplementary eeros can be purchased by contacting TalkTalk (subject to local availability). The eero device is restricted use and can only be used on the TalkTalk broadband network and with TalkTalk eero enabled packages (currently Full Fibre 150, 500 and 900 only), otherwise they may be deactivated.
A compatible mobile phone is required to use the eero app and install your eero device and will be confirmed at point of sale. You will need to agree to Amazon eero Terms and Conditions and read their Privacy Policy.
Up to 13x faster than standard fibre broadband: when compared to average download speeds on our standard Fibre 35 with average download speeds of 35Mb/s.
UK's fastest most reliable broadband technology: For more detailed information about the UK's fastest most reliable broadband,
click here for our Ofcom report
Full Fibre 900
From £42.00 a month. Increasing to £45.00 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract with no set up fees.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
Full Fibre 900 will require installation by an Openreach engineer. An appointment date and arrival time slot will be agreed when you place your order, this can be changed up to 48 hours prior to the appointment date. The installation typically takes 1-2 hours. If the appointment is missed due to the engineer being unable to get access to your property you may be charged.
You need to sign a new contract and will be subject to certain terms. All plans are subject to certain conditions (including location) and you need to pay by Direct Debit.
One eero Pro 6 router will be included with your package with an additional router supplied if Total Home Wi-Fi is included. Supplementary eero(s) can be purchased by contacting TalkTalk subject to availability. The eero device is restricted use and can only be used on the TalkTalk broadband network and with TalkTalk eero enabled packages (currently Full Fibre 150, 500 and 900 only), otherwise they may be deactivated.
A compatible mobile phone is required to use the eero app and install your eero device and will be confirmed at point of sale. You will need to agree to Amazon eero Terms and Conditions and read their Privacy Policy.
Up to 24x faster than standard fibre broadband: when compared to average download speeds on our standard Fibre 35 with average download speeds of 35Mb/s.
UK's fastest most reliable broadband technology: For more detailed information about the UK's fastest most reliable broadband,
click here for our Ofcom report
.
Full Fibre 900 includes Total Home Wi-Fi as standard (subject to location for a small number of locations a single eero Pro 6 will be supplied. Confirmation given at point of sale). Terms for Total Home Wi-Fi apply.
Click here to find out how multiple eeros work.
Fast Broadband
£29.95 a month. Increasing to £32.95 from April 2026, on a 24 month contract with no set up fees.
See
www.talktalk.co.uk/legal/annual-price-change
for more details.
This plan has broadband with average speeds of 11 Mb/s. Average speeds are based on the download speeds of at least 50% of our customer base at peak time (8pm-10pm). Speeds will vary depending on a number of different factors. Your exact speed estimate will be given at point of sale.
TalkTalk TV
TalkTalk TV is available to all TalkTalk Fibre and Full Fibre customers. TalkTalk TV Access Fee to be paid on a rolling monthly basis. TalkTalk TV can be added at any time and broadband contract will be unaffected. Minimum commitment is 30 days and can be cancelled with 48 hours notice any time thereafter (broadband contract length still applies and cannot be cancelled mid contract). If TalkTalk TV Access Fee is cancelled part way through a billing cycle, a credit for the remaining part of the month will be applied in the next cycle.
TalkTalk TV Hub
TalkTalk TV Hub should be connected to the internet and to a TV aerial. Features pause and rewind (for up to 90 minutes), and access to over 70 Freeview channels with 15 in HD and 7 day catch up. Number of SD and HD channels may vary over time. 7 day catch up available on certain channels, however may not be possible for all programmes on these channels. Please visit the Freeview coverage checker for expected channel availability.
TV Hub provides access to on demand content and subscription apps (additional subscriptions may be required). Available apps include BBC iPlayer, ITV Hub, Netflix, Prime Video, NOW and YouTube plus access to the Google Play Store to download other apps and streaming services. Use of TV Hub requires agreement to YouView terms. Use of the available apps may require you to sign up to additional terms and conditions before use, as well as to sign up to an account. You will need to have a Google Account and agree to their terms and conditions before accessing Google Play. Please note that use of any applications downloaded on Google Play may require additional sign-up and terms and conditions agreements. Terms apply. Google and Google Play are trademarks of Google LLC.
Total Home Wi-Fi
Eligibility for TalkTalk plans with Total Home Wi-Fi depends on location. For those properties outside eligible locations, customers will not be able to receive Total Home Wi-Fi.
The Total Home Wi-Fi add-on is an upgrade available to all customers on the Openreach footprint. If you don’t achieve Total Home Coverage (as detailed below) with your Fibre / Full Fibre service, we’ll provide you with additional configuration and technical support and, where necessary, additional Amazon eeros or Boosters to achieve it.
Our Total Home Coverage Promise: Total Home Coverage means you have a download speed of at least 10Mbps in all eligible rooms on Full Fibre 150/500/900 & 3Mbps on Fibre 35/65 and Full Fibre 65. We’ll help you achieve Total Home Coverage, where your home falls within the following parameters: (i) up to 6 bedrooms; (ii) no basements, cellars or below street level rooms; (iii) no outbuildings or garden rooms; and (iv) any other reasonable parameters notified by us from time to time. Where you aren’t achieving Total Home Coverage, you agree we may send an engineer to investigate.
The Total Home Wi-Fi add-on is subject to an initial phone or online home assessment. If your home doesn’t pass our assessment, you won’t be eligible for our Total Home Coverage Promise as we may be unable to help you achieve Total Home Coverage. However, we may still be able to help you improve your home broadband coverage. If you still wish to purchase the Total Home Wi-Fi add-on despite such ineligibility, you may, but you won’t be able to use the cancellation option noted in the optimisation period section below.
A new 18 or 24 month minimum period will apply to your Full Fibre service and Total Home Wi-Fi add-on from your upgrade date, as agreed with you and detailed in your order confirmation email.
We won’t charge you for the remaining duration of your current Full Fibre service or apply an upgrade fee, but you’ll have to pay the ongoing monthly charges for your Full Fibre service and Total Home Wi-Fi add-on for the new minimum period, as agreed with you and detailed in your order confirmation email.
What you must do: Provide any reasonable information requested by us, and follow reasonable instructions given by us, regarding the Total Home Wi-Fi add-on.
Optimisation period: If you don’t achieve Total Home Coverage in the first 45 days of your upgrade, you may cancel your Total Home Wi-Fi add-on (but not any other service) without paying a contract breakage fee, provided: (i) you tell us before 5.30pm on day 45; (ii) if requested by us, you let us conduct an in-person home assessment to validate the failure to achieve Total Home Coverage; and (iii) any Amazon eeros or Boosters provided as part of the Total Home Wi-Fi add-on are returned to us in accordance with our instructions, and in the condition they were provided. If you cancel your Total Home Wi-Fi add-on within your minimum period after day 45, or you do not return the applicable Amazon eeros or Boosters in accordance with the above, you’ll be charged a contract breakage fee equal to £8 for each full month remaining in your minimum period. If you cancel any other services, other contract breakage fees may apply.
SuperSafe
Award-winning online security
The anti-virus technology that is used in SuperSafe, powered by F-Secure has consistently been awarded the Best Protection award by AV-Test, a leading independent organisation, for six out of the last eight years – more than any other company.
Calling Boosts
Calling Boosts
Monthly Boost charges are additional to your Plan and are subject to change. All Boosts have minimum duration of 1 month. Once added, you'll continue to receive the Boost until you opt-out or your broadband service ends (we need 48 hours' notice to terminate). We'll have the Boost activated as soon as possible but will confirm when it goes live with an activation email. Boosts are billed in advance.
International Max Calling Boost
1500 inclusive anytime minutes to 55 international destinations plus the Channel Islands. Applies to calls made to standard price landline and mobile numbers, and excludes calls to international premium satellite calls and non-geographic numbers.
Click here for list of destinations
the Boost applies to. If you go over your allowance you'll be charged at a discounted rate. All non-inclusive international landline and mobile calls will be charged at a discounted rate with a per call connection fee applies.
Unlimited UK Calling Boost
Unlimited calls to UK landline numbers starting 01, 02, 03, and standard UK mobile numbers only (excluding 070 and 076). Excludes calls to the Channel Islands, dial-up internet, indirect access, premium mobile services & all other numbers. The maximum call time is 60 minutes per call.
Evening and Weekend Calls Boost.
Unlimited calls to UK landline numbers starting 01, 02, 03, and mobile numbers only (excluding 070 and 076). Excludes calls to the Channel Islands, dial-up internet, indirect access, premium mobile services & all other numbers. The maximum call time is 60 minutes per call and the call must start between 7pm and 7am on weekdays or anytime at the weekend.
Router Entitlement
Our TalkTalk Wi-Fi Hub is included with Fibre 35 and Fibre 65, Ultrafast 150 and 250, and Fibre 65 Full Fibre plans and limited to one per household.
Amazon eero mesh router available on Full Fibre 150, 500 and 900 full fibre plans only. One eero included with Full Fibre 150 and 500, though supplementary eeros can be purchased by contacting TalkTalk. The eero device is restricted use and can only be used on the TalkTalk broadband network and with TalkTalk eero enabled packages, otherwise they may be deactivated.
A compatible mobile phone is required to use the eero app and install your eero device and will be confirmed at point of sale. You will need to agree to Amazon eero Terms and Conditions and read their Privacy Policy.
Pricing Information
For full terms & conditions please visit
talktalk.co.uk/legal
Speed Information
BROADBAND SPEED CODE OF PRACTICE
In TalkTalk we have voluntarily signed the residential version of Ofcom’s Code of Practice. By this we are sharing speed information, for both upload and download, factors affecting speed,  upfront or after sale with our customers. For speeds in specific, they are based on actual performance metrics of customers on the same product, during peak hours and according to the Ofcom methodology, so that our customers can take an informed decision on selecting our products. These speeds are from TalkTalk to your router/hub and are not inclusive of Wi-Fi speeds between your hub and your wireless device.  More specifically we provide, in different touchpoints, the following:
Speeds: Normally available (download and upload), minimum (download and upload),  maximum (download and upload), advertised/headline (download and upload).
Traffic: Explanation around actual speeds, impacting factors, speeds required for common uses and any policy that could impact speed.
The code gives the right to our customers to exit their contract without penalty if the speed falls below the Guaranteed Minimum Download Speed we promised and more specifically if the customer’s actual download speed falls below the minimum guaranteed download speed given at point of sale on a daily basis for at least three successive days, whether continuously or intermittently, after reporting of a speed problem, and we can’t fix the problem within 30 days. If you're a new customer on the Fibre 35/65 or Ultrafast 150/250, your line will go through a stabilisation period of 10 days, when your speeds may fluctuate. Read more details about how the methodology, our commitments and customer rights coming from our voluntary signing of the
code
.
If you are using an eero device provided by TalkTalk, we suggest your using the speed test provided within the eero app, or
visit our speed test page
for other devices.
In order to define the right speed for your needs,
please check our relevant page
.
Please note that The Broadband Speed Code of Conduct after 1st March 2019 protects you if your
throughput speed
is lower than what we promised when you signed up with us. The Broadband Speed Code of Conduct before 1st March 2019 protects you if your
sync speed
is lower than what we promised when you signed up with us.
Monthly Allowance
There is a monthly billing allowance on all TalkTalk packages. If you go over your allowance you will be barred from making outgoing calls from your TalkTalk landline (excluding calls to the emergency services) and you will be unable to select on-demand TV services. You will still need to pay for all charges in excess of your allowance limit. Please check My Account for further details.
Fibre Speeds
Unlimited Fibre 35 Broadband - On average 4x faster
Compared to TalkTalk’s average download speed on Fast Broadband. TalkTalk’s average download speeds are based on the download speeds of at least 50% of our customer base at peak time 
(8pm to 10pm). Speeds will vary depending on a number of different factors. You can check the estimated speed to your property prior to purchasing.
Unlimited Fibre 65 - On average over 6x faster
Compared to TalkTalk’s average download speed on Fast Broadband. TalkTalk’s average download speeds are based on the download speeds of at least 50% of our customer base at peak time 
(8pm to 10pm). Speeds will vary depending on a number of different factors. You can check the estimated speed to your property prior to purchasing.
Your Details
We may contact you about our product and services. If you do not wish your details to be used for this purpose, please write to us at; The Data Protection Officer, TalkTalk, Soapworks, Colgate Lane, Salford, M5 3TT,  stating your full name, address, account number and mobile phone number.
30 Day Great Connection Guarantee
You can cancel your Faster Fibre contract within 30 days of your line being connected provided that you cancel by calling 0345 172 0088.
You will be charged for the period prior to your cancellation, including any set up or delivery charges. This does not affect your cooling off period. Offer does not apply to existing customers.
Digital Voice/VOIP
Digital Voice, also known as VOIP (Voice over Internet Protocol), is a phone service that operates over your internet connection, rather than traditional phone lines. As this service is provided through your broadband router be aware that in the event of a power outage your router and subsequently your Digital Voice service will not function. This means you won't be able to make or receive calls, including emergency calls to 999 Additionally, services that rely on a traditional phone line, such as care alarms or burglar alarms, will no longer work with Digital Voice. This service is not suitable for customers who require these functions.
We recommend that all customers have access to a mobile phone for use in emergencies, but if you are reliant on your landline phone to make emergency calls and have no mobile phone or have no mobile phone signal in your home, talk to us about our free battery back up option, which will keep your broadband router powered for an hour in the case of a power cut in your home. For customers on our Full Fibre eero packages, a digital voice adapter will be provided, which connects your router (eero) to your handset. This setup will require four available power sockets. Customers on Wi-Fi Hub packages can plug their handset directly into their router and will need three available power sockets. If you choose to keep your current phone number, we will port it from your existing supplier. Alternatively, we can provide you with a new number if required.
CallSafe can be added via MyAccount after your broadband connection has gone live.
Sub-policy 10
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 11
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Technologies
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
How Google uses cookies
How Google uses location information
How Google uses credit card numbers for payments
How Google Voice works
Google Product Privacy Guide
How Google retains data we collect
Google advertising services are experimenting with new ways of supporting the delivery and measurement of digital advertising in ways that better protect people’s privacy online via the
Privacy Sandbox
initiative on Chrome and Android. Users with the relevant Privacy Sandbox settings enabled in Chrome or Android may see relevant ads from Google’s advertising services based on
Topics
or
Protected Audience
data stored on their browser or mobile device. Google’s advertising services may also measure ad performance using
Attribution Reporting
data stored on their browser or mobile device.
More information on the Privacy Sandbox
.
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Many websites and apps use Google services to improve their content and keep it free. When they integrate our services, these sites and apps share information with Google.
For example, when you visit a website that uses advertising services like AdSense, including analytics tools like Google Analytics, or embeds video content from YouTube, your web browser automatically sends certain information to Google. This includes the URL of the page you’re visiting and your IP address. We may use the IP address, for example, to identify your general location, to measure the effectiveness of ads, and, depending on your settings, to improve the relevance of the ads you see. We may also
set cookies on your browser
or read cookies that are already there. Apps that use Google advertising services also share information with Google, such as the name of the app and a unique identifier for advertising.
Google uses the information shared by sites and apps to deliver our services, maintain and improve them, develop new services, measure the effectiveness of advertising, protect against fraud and abuse, and personalize content and ads you see on Google and on our partners’ sites and apps. See our
Privacy Policy
to learn more about how we process data for each of these purposes and our
Advertising
page for more about Google ads, how your information is used in the context of advertising, and how long Google stores this information.
Our
Privacy Policy
explains the legal grounds Google relies upon to process your information — for example, we may process your information with your consent or to pursue legitimate interests such as providing, maintaining and improving our services to meet the needs of our users.
Sometimes, when processing information shared with us by sites and apps, those sites and apps will ask for your consent before allowing Google to process your information. For example, a banner may appear on a site asking for consent for Google to process the information that site collects. When that happens, we will respect the purposes described in the consent you give to the site or app, rather than the legal grounds described in the Google Privacy Policy. If you want to change or withdraw your consent, you should visit the site or app in question to do so.
Ad personalization
If ad personalization is turned on, Google will use your information to make your ads more useful for you. For example, a website that sells mountain bikes might use Google's ad services. After you visit that site, you could see an ad for mountain bikes on a different site that shows ads served by Google.
If ad personalization is off, Google will not collect or use your information to create an ad profile or personalize the ads Google shows to you. You will still see ads, but they may not be as useful. Ads may still be based on the topic of the website or app you're looking at, your current search terms, or on your general location, but not on your interests, search history, or browsing history. Your information can still be used for the other purposes mentioned above, such as to measure the effectiveness of advertising and protect against fraud and abuse.
When you interact with a website or app that uses Google services, you may be asked to choose whether you want to see personalized ads from ad providers, including Google. Regardless of your choice, Google will not personalize the ads you see if your ad personalization setting is off or your account is ineligible for personalized ads.
You can see and control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your
ad settings
.
How you can control the information collected by Google on these sites and apps
Here are some of the ways you can control the information that is shared by your device when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services:
Ad Settings
helps you control ads you see on Google services (such as Google Search or YouTube), or on non-Google websites and apps that use Google ad services. You can also
learn how
ads are personalized, opt out of ad personalization, and block specific advertisers.
If you are signed in to your Google Account, and depending on your Account settings,
My Activity
allows you to review and control data that’s created when you use Google services, including the information we collect from the sites and apps you have visited. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Many websites and apps use Google Analytics to understand how visitors engage with their sites or apps. If you don’t want Analytics to be used in your browser, you can
install the Google Analytics browser add-on
. Learn more about
Google Analytics and privacy
.
Incognito mode in Chrome
allows you to browse the web without recording webpages and files in your browser or Account history (unless you choose to sign in). Cookies are deleted after you've closed all of your incognito windows and tabs, and your bookmarks and settings are stored until you delete them. Learn more about
cookies
. Using Incognito mode in Chrome or other private browsing modes does not prevent the collection of data when you visit websites that use Google services, and Google may still collect data when you visit websites using these browsers.
Many browsers, including Chrome, allow you to block third-party cookies. You can also clear any existing cookies from within your browser. Learn more about
managing cookies in Chrome
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 12
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Sub-policy 13
https://www.privacyshield.gov/welcome:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 14
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/international-transfers/adequacy/index_en.htm:
Skip to main content
An official website of the European Union
An official EU website
How do you know?
All official European Union website addresses are in the
europa.eu
domain.
See all EU institutions and bodies
The page you requested could not be found. This might have happened because
the page has moved
the page no longer exists
Return to the homepage
Sub-policy 15
https://gdprprivacypolicy.org/:
Products
Testimonials
FAQ
Login
Now powered by AI
All-in-one tool to
Ensure Compliance and Build Trust
Privacy Policies are required by law. Be compliant today by generating a policy from our privacy policy generator. Keep your business safe!
Start building your policy
1500+
Policies generated
1000+
Satisfied customers
100
Countries covered
Explore our products
And become compliant today
Privacy Policy
The hassle-free way to create a comprehensive and customized Privacy Policy for your website or app. Our user-friendly tool takes the guesswork out of creating a Privacy Policy by generating a tailored document that meets the legal requirements for your specific industry and jurisdiction. With our Privacy Policy template generator, you can rest assured that your users' data is being handled ethically and transparently, while also protecting your business from legal liabilities. Try it out now and get peace of mind knowing that your Privacy Policy is in good hands.
Make Privacy Policy
Refund Policy
The easiest way to create a clear and concise Refund Policy for your online business. Our tool guides you through the process of generating a refund policy that meets the unique needs of your business while also ensuring compliance with relevant regulations. With our Refund Policy template generator, you can provide your customers with the necessary information regarding refunds and returns, while also protecting your business from disputes and chargebacks. Our tool is simple to use and can save you valuable time and effort. Start creating your Refund Policy today and enjoy the peace of mind that comes with having a professional and effective policy in place.
Make Refund Policy
CCPA - California Consumer Privacy Act
Introducing our CCPA - California Consumer Privacy Act template generator, the hassle-free way to create a comprehensive and compliant Privacy Policy for businesses operating in California. Our user-friendly tool takes the guesswork out of creating a CCPA-compliant Privacy Policy by generating a tailored document that meets the legal requirements of the CCPA. With our CCPA Privacy Policy template generator, you can rest assured that your users' data is being handled ethically and transparently, while also protecting your business from legal liabilities. Our tool is simple to use and can save you valuable time and effort. Try it out now and get peace of mind knowing that your Privacy Policy is in good hands.
Make CCPA - California Consumer Privacy Act
Terms & Conditions Generator
The simple and efficient way to create a comprehensive and customized Terms & Conditions agreement for your website or app. Our user-friendly tool takes the guesswork out of creating a Terms & Conditions agreement by generating a tailored document that meets the legal requirements for your specific industry and jurisdiction. With our Terms & Conditions generator, you can protect your business from legal liabilities, establish clear guidelines for users, and provide transparency in your business practices. Our tool is easy to use and can save you valuable time and effort. Try it out now and enjoy the peace of mind that comes with having a professional and effective Terms & Conditions agreement in place.
Make Terms & Conditions Generator
Why our customers love our product
Testimonials
Don't just take our word for it, read from our extensive list of case studies and customer testimonials.
I am immensely pleased with gdprprivacypolicy.org! This GDPR Privacy Policy Generator is a game-changer for small business owners like myself. Its user-friendly interface allowed me to create a robust, compliant privacy policy in mere minutes, with easy-to-understand guidance at every step. The platform turns the daunting task of understanding and implementing GDPR requirements into a breeze, allowing me to focus more on growing my business. It’s the perfect blend of simplicity, customization, and compliance. Highly recommended for peace of mind in data protection!
Hannah, Asoft Group
Gdprprivacypolicy.org made GDPR compliance a breeze! User-friendly and quick, I crafted a tailored privacy policy in minutes. A must-have tool for any online business. Total game-changer. Highly recommend!
Tim, TailorSuits
Frequently Asked Questions
Here are some of the most common frequently asked questions
How does GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org ensure GDPR compliance?
GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org integrates advanced AI technology to meticulously craft privacy policies, aligning each one with the latest GDPR requirements, ensuring that users receive a compliant, up-to-date privacy policy.
How user-friendly is the GDPR Generator for non-technicals?
GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org features an intuitive, step-by-step interface, designed to be accessible to individuals with varying levels of technical proficiency. Our system guides users through each phase, making the process seamless and straightforward.
Can I customize my generated GDPR privacy policy?
Absolutely! Our platform offers various customization options allowing users to tailor their policies to precisely fit their business needs and preferences, ensuring both uniqueness and compliance.
Is GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org suitable for all types of businesses?
Yes, our generator is versatile and designed to cater to a myriad of business models, sizes, and industries, whether you operate a small blog or a large e-commerce platform.
How long does it take to generate a GDPR compliant privacy policy?
With GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org, users can swiftly generate a standard, compliant privacy policy in minutes, saving valuable time and effort.
Is there a fee to use GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org?
Our platform offers a range of pricing options, starting with free standard templates. For more advanced, AI-generated policies, the cost begins at $10, with additional charges applicable for extra options.
Can I update my privacy policy after generating it?
Yes, users have the flexibility to modify and update their generated privacy policies as required, ensuring their policies remain current and adaptable to changing business needs.
Does GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org provide support and guidance on GDPR compliance?
We provide extensive support and a rich knowledge base to educate users on GDPR compliance, helping them navigate through the complex landscape of data protection regulations.
Is the generated privacy policy legally binding?
The privacy policies generated by GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org are crafted to meet legal standards, but we recommend having your policy reviewed by a legal professional to ensure complete compliance and legal adequacy.
How does GDPRPrivacyPolicy.org stay updated with GDPR amendments?
Our platform continually monitors for any amendments to the GDPR legislation and updates its AI algorithms and knowledge base accordingly, ensuring our users receive the most current and compliant policies.
GDPR Compliant Privacy Policy Generator
Privacy Policy
Disclaimer
Terms
© 2025
Close
Make new
App
Website
Close
Make new
Physical Products
Digital Products